
CD 



125368 



Judgment and Reasoning 
in the Child 



International Library of Psychology 
Phil0sd$hy arid .SctetajSc Method 



. - PHILOSOPHICAL t 

XHE MISU.SE F MIND; . ' . 

CONFLICT' A'ND #REAM ' ' fc 

PSYCHOLOGY AND POLITICS . 
MEDICINE, MAGXP AND RELIGION 
PsYCHOL3Gv NE> ETHNOLOGY . 
TRACTATES LOG^CO-PHILOSOPHICUS 
THE MEASUREMENT OF EMOTION 
PSYCHOLOGICAL TYPES 



C.*$C. OGDE-N, M.A. (Magdalen College^ C 

. by G. E. MOORE, Litt.D. 
by KARIN STEPHEN 
by W. H, R. RIVERS, F.R.S. 
by W. H. R. RIVERS, F.R.S. 
by W. H. R. RIVERS, F.R.S. 
by W. H. R. RIVERS, F.R.S. 
by L. WITTGENSTEIN 
by W. WHATELY SMITH 
by C. G. JUNG, M.D., LL.D. 



K 



CONTRIBUTIONS TO ANALYTICAL PSYCHOLOGY by C. G. JUNG,M. D. ,LL. D, 
-- - by A. D. RITCHIE 

. by C. D. BROAD, Litt.D. 
. by C. D. BROAD, LitLD, 
OGDEN and I. A. RICHARDS 
. by J. H. VAN DER HOOP 
by ALFRED ADLER 
. by C. S, PKIRCE 
by T. K. HULMIS 
by EUGENIO RIGXAXO 
by EUGENIO RIGNANO 
by H. VAIHINGER 
by]. C. GREGORY 
. by L. L. THURSTONE 
by R, TISCHNER 
by K. KOFFKA 
. by W. KOHLER 
, by J. H. LEUBA 
by SANTE DE SANCTIS 
. by W. POLE, F.R.S. 
by G. RKVKSZ 
edited by MAX SCHOEN" 
. by I. A, RICHARDS 
by E. A. BURTT, Ph.D. 
by M. COLLINS, Ph.D. 
&.y H, PitfRON 
by ERNST KRKTSCHMER 
6y J. T. MACCQRDY, M.D. 
in honour of MORTON PRINCE 
by K. ROHDE 
by M. STORT 
Zcjy F. A. LANG3K 



SCIENTIFIC METHOD 
SCIENTIFIC THOUGHT . 
MIND AND ITS PLACE IN NATURE 
THE MEANING OF MEANING . by C. 
CHARACTER AND THE UNCONSCIOUS . 
INDIVIDUAL PSYCHOLOGY . 
CHANCE, LOVE AND LOGIC . 
SPECULATIONS (Preface by Jacob R stein} 
THE PSYCHOLOGY OF REASONING 

BIOLOGICAL MEMORY 

THE PHILOSOPHY OF ' As IF 
THE NATURE OF LAUGHTER 
THE NATURE OF INTELLIGENCE . 
TELEPATHY AND CLAIRVOYANCE . 
THE GROWTH OF THE MIND 
THE MENTALITY OF APES . 
PSYCHOLOGY OF RELIGIOUS MYSTICISM 

RELIGIOUS CONVERSION 

THE PHILOSOPHY OF Music 

THE PSYCHOLOGY OF A MUSICAL PRODIGY 

THE EFFECTS OF Music . 

PRINCIPLES OF LITERARY CRITICISM . 

METAPHYSICAL FOUNDATIONS OF SCIENCE 

COLOUR-BLINDNESS 

THOUGHT AND THE BRAIN 

PHYSIQUE AND CHARACTER 

PSYCHOLOGY OF EMOTION 

PROBLEMS OF PERSONALITY 

PSYCHE .... 

PSYCHOLOGY OF TIME . 

THE HISTORY OF MATERIAL SM 

EMOTION AND INSANITY 

PERSONALITY . 

NEUROTIC PERSONALITY 

PROBLEMS IN PSYCHOPATHOLOGY 

EDUCATIONAL PSYCHOLOGY . 

LANGUAGE AND THOUGHT OF THE CHILD . 

JUDGMENT AND REASONING IN THE CHILD 

CRIME AND CUSTOM IN SAVAGE SOCIETY 

SEX AND REPRESSION IN SAVAGE SOCIETY , 

COMPARATIVE PHILOSOPHY . 

THE PSYCHOLOGY OF CHARACTER 

SOCIAL LIFE IN THE ANIMAL WORLD . 

How ANIMALS FIND THEIR WAY ABOUT 

THE SOCIAL INSECTS .... 

THEORETICAL BIOLOGY . 

POSSIBILITY 

DIALECTIC 

THB TECHNIQUE OF CONTROVERSY . 
THE SYMBOLIC PROCESS 
POLITICAL PLURALISM .... 
SOCIAL BASIS OF CONSCIOUSNESS 
THE ANALYSIS OF MATTER . 
PLATO'S THEORY OF ETHICS 



by S. THALIUT7.ICK 

. by K. G. GORDON, M.D. 
- by R. G. GORDON, M.D. 
by T. \v, MITCHELL, M.D. 
by CHARLES Fox 
by J. PIAGKT 
by J. PIAGKT 
by B. MALINOWSKI, D.Sc* 
by B, MALINO\VSKI D.Sc. 
by P. MASsax~Ot?RSBL 
by A. A. ROBACK 
/jy K. ALVKRI>E 
by K. RAKACD 
6y W. MORTON WHBKLKR 
, . . by J, vox UEXKCLL 
. by SCOTT BUCHANAN 
. by MORTIMER J. ADX.KK 
by B. B. Bor.osLOVSKY 
by ]. F. MARKEY 
. by K. C . HSIAO 
by TRJGANT BURRO\V M.I>. 
by BERTRAND RUSSELL, F.R.S, 
. by R, C, 



IN PREPARATION 

INTRODUCTION TO MODERN PSYCHOLOGY . . . by G. MORPHY 
COLOUR AND COLOUR THEORIES . by CHRISTINE LADD-FRANXUN 
EMOTIONS OF NORMAL PEOPLE . . . , by W. M* MAXSTON 
REPRESENTATION IN THE CHILD . . . fry J. PIAGET 



Judgment and ileasonrng 
in the Child 



By 

JEAN PIAGET 

Doctor of Science, Director of the Institut Rousseau 

and Professor at the University of Geneva 
Author of Language and Thought of the Child 

In collaboration with 

MLLES E. CARTALIS, S. ESCHER, A. HANHART, L. HAHNLOSER, 
O. MATTHESj S. PERRET, 

And 

M. ROUD 




NEW YORK 

HARCOURT, BRACE AND COMPANY 

LONDON: KEGAN PAUL, TRENCH, TRUBNER & CO., LTD. 

1928 



Translated by 
MARJORIE WARDEN 



PRINTBO IK CRKAT BRITAIN BY 
XHJffi EDINBURGH PRESS, 9 A NO J 3t YOUJMG STHKB1T, 



CONTENTS 



PAGE 



CHAPTER I. GRAMMAR AND LOGIC i 

I. CONJUNCTIONS OF CAUSALITY AND LOGICAL 

RELATIONS 5 

Types of relation expressed by the conjunction 
'Because/ 6. Hypotheses drawn from the 
analyses of children's talk, 9. Juxtaposition 
and the empirical 'Because/ 15. The relation 
of implication and the logical ' Because ' and 
'Since/ 23. The conjunctions 'Therefore* and 
'Then/ 30. 

II. CONJUNCTIONS OF DISCORDANCE . . . .37 

Numerical results and types of mistake, 40. 
Failure to understand discordance, 43. Dis- 
cordance and the expression 'But/ 48. 

III. CONCLUSIONS 54 

CHAPTER II. FORMAL THOUGHT AND RELA- 
TIONAL JUDGMENTS 62 

Formal -Reasoning, 64. The three brothers 
test, 74. Counter- test : Conversation with the 
child, 83. 

CHAPTER III. THE GROWTH OF RELATIVITY 

IN IDEAS AND NOTIONS . . ." . .96 
I. SOME TESTS OF THE LOGIC OF RELATIONS . -97 

Method of experiment and numerical results, 98. 
Brothers and Sisters, 101, Definition of the 
word ' Brother/ 104. Right and left, 107. 

II, SOME DEFINITIONS OF THE IDEAS OF FAMILY 

AND COUNTRY 113 

The family, 115. Country, 119, Conclusion, 125. 

III. CONCLUSIONS 13 

vii 



viii CONTENTS 



PAGE 



CHAPTER IV. HOW THE CHILD REASONS . 135 

Is the child capable of introspection ? 137. 
Definitions and concepts of children : logical 
Addition and Multiplication, 146. Contradiction 
in child thought, 163. The psychological equi- 
valent of non-contradiction and the notion of 
mental reversibility, 169. Transduction, 180. 
Conclusion: Ego-centrism and Logic, 195. 

CHAPTER V. SUMMARY AND CONCLUSIONS . 199 

Ego-centrism of thought in the child, 201 The 
difficulties of conscious realization, and the shift- 
ing of operations on to the plane of thought, 209. 
Synthetic incapacity and juxtaposition, 221. 
Syncretism, 227. Transduction and insensibility 
to contradiction^ 233. Modality of child thought, 
intellectual realism and incapacity for formal 
reasoning, 244. Precausality in the child, 253. 

APPENDIX. NOTE ON THE COEFFICIENT OF 

EGO-CENTRISM 257 



INDEX 



259 



CHAPTER I 
GRAMMAR AND LOGIC 

CONJUNCTIONS EXPRESSING CAUSAL, LOGICAL, 
AND DISCORDANT RELATIONS, AS USED BY 
CHILDREN BETWEEN THE AGES OF THREE 

AND NINE. 1 

WE have endeavoured to show in an earlier work that 
thought in the child is ego-centric, i.e. that the child 
thinks for himself without troubling to make himself 
understood nor to place himself at the other person's 
point of view. We tried, above all, to show that these 
ego-centric habits have a considerable effect upon the 
structure of thought itself. Thus it is chiefly because he 
feels no need to socialize his thought that the child is 
so little concerned, or at any rate so very much less 
concerned than we are, to convince his hearers or to 
prove his point. 

If this be the case, we must expect -childish reasoning 
to differ very considerably from ours, to be less deductive 
and above all less rigorous. For what is logic but the art 
of proof ? To reason logically is so to link one's proposi- 
tions that each should contain the reason for the one 
succeeding it, and should itself be demonstrated by the 
one preceding it. Or at any rate, whatever the order 
adopted in the construction of one's own exposition, it 
is to demonstrate judgments by each other. Logical 

i With the collaboration of Mile Olga Matthes. We wish to take the 
opportunity of expressing our warmest thanks to M. Dottrens and the 
staff of the school in which we worked, for the kindness and hospitality 
that were shown to us. 

A l 



2 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

reasoning is always a demonstration. If, therefore, the 
child remains for a long time ignorant of the need for 
demonstration, this is bound to have an effect upon his 
manner of reasoning. As we have already pointed out 
(L.T., 1 Chap. Ill, 5), the child is not really aware of 
the necessity of arranging his sentences in logical order. 

But how are we to enquire into the nature of logical 
relations in children, while retaining our hold upon 
reasoning as revealed in direct psychological observation, 
and yet avoid making use of the necessarily artificial 
framework of the logicians ? 

We may begin by a method, tentative but natural, 
which consists in seeing how the child behaves when 
confronted with those conjunctions which denote causality 
or logical relations (because, for, therefore, etc.) and 
with those expressing antithetical relations (in spite of, 
even though, although, etc.). In this connexion two 
courses seem to be indicated. The first consists in 
inducing the child, by means of appropriate experiments, 
to make use of these conjunctions, to make him under- 
stand or invent, for example, sentences in which the 
required conjunctions are used. The second consists in 
noting in the child's spontaneous talk all the sentences 
in which the said conjunction is used. For instance, in 
studying the conjunctions of causality as used .between 
the ages of 6 and 7 we shall have to note down every 
c because/ every ' since/ and every ' why ' occurring in 
the corresponding questions. 

In one of the chapters of our last volume we made a 
certain contribution to this question by analysing, not 
the conjunctions of causality in the child, but the ques- 
tions corresponding to these conjunctions (the ' whys '). 
The analysis of these ' whys ' yielded as a first important 
result the fact that before the age of 7 there seems to be no 
pronounced desire for logical justification. What the 
* whys ' bear witness to is a need to explain and justify 

1 The initials " L.T. '* refer to the author's The Language and Thought 
of the Child, unif orm -with this volume. 



IN THE CHILD 3 

material phenomena, human actions, the rules of school 
and society, etc., far rather than a wish to justify judg- 
ments, i.e. a wish to deduce or demonstrate anything. 
The present chapter is partly intended to confirm the 
following conclusion : if the absence or rarity of " whys of 
logical justification " really has the significance which 
we have attributed to it, we must expect to find in childish 
idiom on the one hand a correspondingly rare occurrence 
of the "because of logical justification/' and on the other 
a persistent difficulty on the part of the child in finding 
the correct justification for simple propositions which he 
is asked to demonstrate. This is what we shall try to 
establish. 

Now, if such are the habits of childish thought, childish 
idiom ought to display a discontinuous and chaotic 
character in contrast to the deductive style of the adult, 
logical relations being omitted or taken for granted. 
In a word, there will be ' juxtaposition ' and not relating 
of propositions. The study of juxtaposition will therefore 
constitute the second object of this chapter. 

The phenomenon of juxtaposition is very frequent in 
child thought. A well-known and particularly striking 
example has been signalled in the case of children's draw- 
ings, and has been referred to as ' synthetic incapacity/ x 
M. Luquet has pointed out that one of the most uni- 
versal characteristics of these children's drawings is the 
inability shown by their authors to portray the relations 
existing between the different parts of the model. The 
thing is not there as a whole, the details only are given, 
and then, for lack of synthetic relations, they are simply 
juxtaposed. Thus an eye will be placed next to a head, 
an arm next to a leg, and so on. 

This synthetic incapacity covers more ground than 
one would think, for it is really the mark of the whole 
of childish thought up to a certain age. We have already 
observed it (L.T., Chap. Ill) in connexion with under- 
standing between children. We have tried to show that 

l Luquet, Les Dessins d'un enfant, Paris, Alcan., 1913. 



4 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

occasions abound when, instead of expressing the relation 
between two propositions by the word ' because ' (as had 
been done in the corresponding adult communication) 
or in any other way, the child was content to juxtapose 
these propositions without any further ado, whether or 
no he had been conscious of any causal connexion between 
them. Now, in three-quarters of such cases, the child 
who was spoken to did not realize that such a connexion 
was in question, and could therefore see nothing more 
than two statements which were independent of each 
other. 

Juxtaposition is therefore, in a certain sense, the con- 
verse of the process which we studied under the name of 
' syncretism.' Syncretism is the spontaneous tendency 
on the part of children to take things in by means of a 
comprehensive act of perception instead of by the detection 
of details, to find immediately and without analysis 
analogies between words or objects that have nothing 
to do with each other, to bring heterogeneous phenomena 
into relation with each other, to find a reason for every 
chance event ; in a word, it is the tendency to connect 
everything with everything else. Syncretism is therefore 
an excess of relating while juxtaposition exhibits a 
deficiency in the same function. The two seem in 
complete opposition to each other. In drawing, children 
give only the detail and neglect the synthesis, but 
childish perceptions seem to be formed by general schemas 
rather than by analysis. In thinking, the child is ignorant 
of logical justification, he juxtaposes propositions instead 
of connecting them, but he is able to give a reason for 
everything, to justify every phenomenon and every 
coincidence. How exactly are these contradictory phen- 
omena related to each other ? This is the question to 
which we must find an answer. 

To sum up, the object of this chapter will be i to form 
an introduction to the study of childish reasoning by means 
of an analysis of the types of relation involved in the 
conjunctions of causality, of logical connexion, and of 



IN THE CHILD 5 

discordance ; 2 to draw from this study an analysis of 
the phenomenon of juxtaposition ; and 3 to show the 
relations existing between juxtaposition and syncretism. 

I. CONJUNCTIONS OF CAUSALITY AND LOGICAL 
RELATIONS. 

The method we have adopted is extremely simple. 
In the first place, we are in possession of a number of 
records of the actual conversation of children of different 
ages who were under observation for about a month each 
(see L.T., Chap. I). We have selected from these records 
the sentences which contain conjunctions, and we have 
analysed them from the point of view which concerns 
us at .present. In the second place, we have made experi- 
ments in the Elementary schools of Geneva, which con- 
sist in asking the children to invent or to complete 
sentences containing the word ' because ' or other causal 
conjunctions. 

To do this, you begin by asking the child if he knows 
how to invent sentences with a given word (table, etc.). 
When he has understood he is asked to invent a phrase 
containing the word ' because/ etc. Sometimes the child 
is bored, in which case you pass straight on to the second 
part of the experiment. You tell the subject that you 
are going to give him an unfinished sentence : " Then 
you must make up the end yourself, so that it should 
go nicely with the beginning, so that the sentence should 
be true, etc." You then give a list of sentences to com- 
plete after the following pattern: "The man fell off 
his bicycle because . . .," and the child must make up 
an ending. As a rule this game is quite popular to 
begin with. You can also take the child's answer as 
a new starting-point. For instance, if the subject 
answers, " Because he slipped," you ask : " And he 
slipped because . . ./' and so on, as long as it makes 
sense. You must at the same time try to avoid boredom 
or automatism. 



6 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

In order to study the use of the conjunction ' because ' 
we used this method to experiment on about 40 children 
from 6 to 10 who were examined individually. In addition 
to this, we carried out a collective enquiry on 200 
children from 7 to 9 by writing the sentences to be com- 
pleted on the black-board. The simultaneous use of 
collective enquiry and personal examination is a method 
that has much in its favour in the experiments in question : 
the first supplies one with statistical data in a short time, 
and the second enables one to check the results by analysis. 
In this way we collected about 500 sentences by means 
of personal interrogatory, and about 2000 by means of 
collective enquiry. 

i. TYPES OF RELATION EXPRESSED BY THE CON- 
JUNCTION 'BECAUSE/ Before describing our results we 
must begin by distinguishing between the two main types 
of relations which are denoted by the conjunction ' because 7 
[parce que], viz. the relation of cause and effect, or causal 
relation, and the relation of reason and consequent or the 
logical relation. 

The causal because ' is the mark of a relation of 
cause and effect between two phenomena or two events. 
In the sentence which we gave to the child, " The man 
fell off his bicycle because . . ./' the 'because' calls for 
a causal relation, since it is a question of connecting an 
event (a fall) with another event (e.g. " someone got in 
his way ;> ), and not of connecting one idea with another. 

The logical ' because/ on the other hand, denotes a 
relation, not of cause and effect, but of ' implication/ of 
reason and consequent ; what the * because ' connects here 
is no longer two observed facts, but two ideas or two judg- 
ments. For instance, " Half 9 is not 4, because 4 and 4 
make 8." Or, " That animal is not dead, because (or 
since) it is still moving." 

Difficulties, from the logical point of view, undoubtedly 
face us at this juncture, but we shall try to exclude them 
from these purely genetic studies. When does implication 
begin and when does the causal relation end? Have 



IN THE CHILD 7 

not the relations just mentioned the same right to be 
named causal as those that were given first ? Or at any 
rate, is not the half of a number as much a datum of 
empirical observation for the child as is a fall from a 
bicycle ? But to take such a standpoint is to forget that 
in order to explain why. half 9 is not 4, we have to appeal 
to definitions and relations which are not causes, but 
logical relations, whereas to explain a bicycle accident 
there is really no need to appeal to anything beyond facts* 
It is therefore primarily in virtue of the type of explanation 
which they admit of that these two kinds of explanation 
differ ; the one is (logical) demonstration, the other (causaty 
explanation. 

This criterion, which naturally raises difficulties in its 
turn, is nevertheless justifiable on psychological and not 
only on logical grounds. It is clear to observation that 
logical justification or proof appears at a much later date 
than causal explanation. When you ask him to complete 
the sentence : " The man fell off his bicycle because . . .," 
the child experiences no difficulty. When you ask him : 
"Half 9 is not 4 because . . .," the question strikes him 
as absurd. He is even tempted to give a causal explanation 
as an answer : " because he can't rount." The distinction 
we are making here does obviously refer to something. 
It may even be said to depend upon a very universal law 
of mental development, viz. that the desire to check 
results comes very much later in point of time than the 
faculty for inventing explanations. 

In addition to this, it is necessary to distinguish a third 
type of relation, which may be considered as intermediate 
between the last two, and which we shall call the relation 
of motive for action or the psychological relation. The 
' because ' which denotes this relation establishes a relation 
of cause and effect, not between any two facts, but 
between an action and an intention, between two psycho- 
logical actions. For instance : " I slapped Paul's face, 
because ... he was laughing at me." The relation here 
is empirical in a sense, since it is a question of two facts 



8 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

and of a causal explanation. In another sense, however, 
it is logical, since it introduces a reason, an intelligent 
motive as cause. We have here as much a justification 
as an explanation. 

We have distinguished this third type because children 
have a tendency to replace logical by psychological 
relations. We gave an example of this just now. " Half 9 
is not 4, because he can't count." 

It was necessary to bring in these distinctions since 
it is our intention in this chapter to point to some of the 
difficulties which a child experiences in establishing 
correct relations. These difficulties will of course vary 
considerably according as we are dealing with one type 
of relation or another. An excellent reason, moreover, 
for allowing the utility of these distinctions is the good 
work which they did in connexion with the ' whys ' of 
children (L.T., Chap. 'V). To each one of our classes of 
' because ' there will be seen to correspond a class ' whys ' : 
the ' whys of causal explanation ' (" Why do boats stay 
on the water?"), the 'whys of motivation' ("Why are 
you going? "), the 'whys of logical justification' ("Why- 
is it a dog and not a wolf ? "). Now, both the respective 
appearance and the functional importance of these three 
kinds of question are subject to singular variations, as 
we have already shown at some length. Hence the 
desirability of keeping to this classification. 

Finally, it may be wondered in connexion with each 
of our experiments, what is the exact relation which 
subsists between language and reasoning. When a child 
fails to complete one of our sentences, is it because he 
does not know the conjunction, or because he cannot 
handle the mental relation which it presupposes ? It is 
impossible to settle this question a priori. We shall see 
later, with regard to the conjunctions of discordance, 
that some of them, such as ' although, 7 may not be under- 
stood, even though the relation of discordance is under- 
stood when other words are used. The matter is not the 
same when it comes to ' because/ Between the years of 



IN THE CHILD 9 

6 and 9, when the relation indicated by ' because ' is 
incorrect, one can always assume that reasoning has been 
at fault ; the word ' because ' [parce que] is used spon- 
taneously by the child from the age of 3 to 4 onwards. 

2. HYPOTHESES 1 DRAWN FROM THE ANALYSIS OF 

CHILDREN'S TALK. Before passing on to the examination 
of such experiments as we have made, it will be well to 
take our stand upon actual observation, and to ask our- 
selves in what sense and how often children make use 
of the conjunction ' because/ The results obtained in 
this way will constitute very useful hypotheses, which 
will serve to guide us in the interpretation of later 
material. 

To help us in this task we have at our disposal eight 
homogeneous samples of observation. Three of them 
are familiar to us the language of Lev and of Pie at 
the age of 6 and the language of Lev at the age of 7 
(language dealt with in Chapter I of the volume L.T.). 
Since then Miles Buerguer, Fiaux and Gonet have taken 
a record, according to the same method, of a collection of 
remarks, of which mention will be found in the Appendix. 

We are now in possession of nearly 10,000 remarks 
taken down in identical circumstances from eight children 
only, it is true (counting Lev and Ad who were each 
studied on two separate occasions as four;, but scattered 
between the ages of 3 and 7 in such a manner as to yield 
at least a few working hypotheses. 

The first question to be asked is that of the absolute 
frequency of ' because/ To these statistics may be added 
the few occasions on which use was made of ' since ' [alors], 
and which number 3 out of the 1500 sentences spoken by 
Dan (age 3) and i out of the 1500 spoken by Ad (age 4). 
Here is the table which we obtained. The combined 
numbers of ' because ' and ' since ' are expressed in per- 
centages, i.e. relatively to the number of sentences consti- 
tuting our material. Thus 1-2% means that out of 100 
remarks 1-2 contain the term ' because/ 

1 See note on p. 61. 



' Because ' and 


Coefficient of 


' Since/ 


Ego-centrism. 


1-2% 


0-56 


I5% 


0-56 


1-2% 


0-6o 


2% 


0-46 



io JUDGMENT AND REASONING 



Dan, age 3 . 

Jan, age 3 . 

Ad, age 4 . 

Ad, age 5 . 

Pie, age 6 . . . 2% 0-43 

Lev, age 6 . . . 2-4% 0-47 

Clau, age 7 . . 3-5% 0-30 

Lev, age 7 . . . 6-1% 0-27 

Such a table undoubtedly enables us to make three 
hypotheses subject to verification by wider statistics 
and other methods which we shall develop later on. 

The first is that the number of appearances of ' because ' 
and ' since ' increases with age and seems to increase 
considerably round about 7, after having been more or 
less stationary just before. In other words, if the phenom- 
enon of * juxtaposition ' is defined as the lack of explicit 
relation between propositions which imply such a relation, 
there are strong reasons for assuming that juxtaposition 
is sufficiently present up till the age of 7 to 8 (Lev being 
a child 6 months or a year in advance of the normal) 
for it to diminish after that age. As this is a conclusion 
which we have already reached in another way (L.T., 
Chap, III), we may be permitted to retain it with a 
certain degree of confidence. 

The second hypothesis is that ' because ' and ' since ' 
increase in number with the socialization of thought, 
or if it is preferred, that juxtaposition diminishes as the 
child emerges from ego-centrism. This point of view has 
already been made known to us elsewhere. 1 It must be 
admitted that the evolution undergone by Lev speaks in 
favour of this hypothesis ; his coefficient of ego-centrism 
passes from 0*47 to 0*27 in a year, while the number of 
' because ' and ' since ' increases from 2*4% to 6-1%. 
But it goes without saying that the only way of really 
i L.T., Chap. Ill, 4 and 5. 



IN THE CHILD n 

verifying it would be to look for the correlation between 
these two kinds of coefficients in a large number of children 
of the same age. 

Our third hypothesis is concerned with the nature of 
juxtaposition. It seems permissible to ask whether ego- 
centrism of thought does not necessarily involve a certain 
incoherence or, as Bleuler calls it, a certain ' absence of 
direction ' in the succession of images and judgments. 
If this were so, juxtaposition would be explained. Now 
M. Bleuler has shown in his well-known studies on psycho- 
analysis that a connexion exists between the degree of 
socialization and the degree of ' direction/ or let us say 
of conscious direction of thought. Dreams, delirium, or 
even day-dreaming, in short, every manifestation of 
'autistic' or incommunicable thought appear to us as 
' undirected ' in this sense, that the images and ideas 
which succeed one another in consciousness seem to lack 
any connecting links, any implication, even any causal 
relation (dreams have no way of explaining causality 
except by juxtaposition). Now what is the origin of 
this lack of conscious direction ? Is it some deep and 
genuine disharmony ? Not at all. For analysis shows 
that the various images and ideas which seem so dis- 
connected are in reality grouped together by one and the 
same tendency or by one and the same desire. Thus 
there is always direction in thought, but in cases like 
these the direction is unconscious and is more akin to 
simple motor or affective tendencies than to willed and 
conscious direction. If, therefore, there is an apparent 
lack of direction, this means that autistic thought does 
not take cognizance of the motives which guide it. But 
this ignorance is precisely the result of the autistic charac- 
ter of thought ; it is because it is not detached from the 
ego that this sort of thinking does not know itself. Only 
by means of friction against other minds, by means of 
exchange and opposition does thought come to be con- 
scious of its own aims and tendencies, and only in this 
way is it obliged to relate what could till then remain 



12 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

juxtaposed. This is why every act of socialized intelligence 
implies not only consciousness of a definite thought 
direction (as, for instance, of problem) but also conscious- 
ness of the successive statements of a narrative (relations 
of implication) or of those between successive images 
of the objects of thought (causal relations). 

This, then, is how we can riake clear to ourselves the 
connexion between ego-centrisfti and juxtaposition. There 
is nothing in ego-centrism which tends to make thought 
conscious of itself (since this self - consciousness only 
arises through some shock with another mind), and this 
unconsciousness enables the objects of thought to succeed 
one another in an unrelated fashion. Juxtaposition is 
therefore the result of absence of direction in the successive 
images and ideas, and this absence of direction is itself the 
outcome of that lack of self-consciousness which charac- 
terizes all ego-centric thought. 

Let us turn to the analysis of ' because ' and ' since ' 
as they were noted in the talk of those few children. 
Out of the 134 relations shown by Jan, Dan, Ad, Pie and 
Lev at 6 years old, 112 are psychological, 10 causal, and 
12 logical. 

The frequent appearance of the psychological ' because ' 
is particularly striking. Here are some examples : 

"Look, he's laughing! Why? Because lie wants to 
catch the apple " (Dan). " I don't want them to open that 
because it would be a pity " (Dan). " But Rend isn't here 
yet, he'll be late . . . because he always comes slowly, he 
plays on the way " (Dan). 

"Look out there, 'cos it goes round" (Ad). "/ want to 
make a stove. Why ? Because for [parce que pour] the 
heating" (Ad). "/ must hurry up, because Mummy is 
coming " (Ad). 

" I'm going to sit here, because my drawing is here " 
(Pie). " / say, Ez ! Come here, because we'll both have the 
same thing " (Pie). 

It will have been noticed that the psychological ' because ' 
sometimes gives a genuine psychological explanation ("he's 
laughing . , . because . . .") and sometimes expresses 



IN THE CHILD 13 

the motive of an action or of a command (" I don't want 
to ... because "). There are many intermediate forms 
between these two, hence the name relations of motivation 
which can be used in this connexion. As a rule it is easy 
to distinguish between logical justification and motivation. 
The former always gives the motive for a judgment or 
statement, the latter for a desire, a command, or an act. 
Thus the first alone constitutes a proof, the second is only 
subjective motivation. 

The genuinely causal ' because ' is rare. This, as we 
have seen (L.T., Chaps. I and III), is due to the fact that 
there is very little attempt on the part of children to 
socialize their search for the causal explanation of external 
phenomena. This does not mean that they do not feel the 
need for explanation ; on the contrary, an examination 
of the questions asked"by children shows that at the age 
of 6, 18% of the questions refer to physical causality 
^L.T., Chap. V). 

Here are some examples of this way of relating : " [It 
is broken] because it wasn't properly stuck." (Dan). " The 
train cari't get past there. . . . Because there is too much 
sand up there" (Ad). "One of them would like to get 
into the nest, but he can't, because it (the nest) is too small " 
(Pie), etc. 

Logical relations number only 12 out of 134, which is 
a useful confirmation of the result obtained from our 
study of ' why ' (L.T., Chap. V). These relations can be 
easily recognized by the fact that they constitute neither 
causal explanations nor subjective motivations but always 
proofs or the beginnings of proof. Here are some examples : 

" No, it's a boat, beca^^,se it hasn't any wheels " (Dan). 
" It's badly done [a staircase]. Why ? Because you don't 
make them that way, you make them this way" (Dan). 
[Dan sets out some Loto cards.] " Yes, it's that one, since 
it's at the bottom." 

" How can you tell that they are going to school? 
Going to school? Because the satchel is behind " (Pie). 



I 4 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

It may be noticed that in some cases the ' because * 
is not spontaneous, but is given in answer to an adult's 
question. Be that as it may, the problem remains as 
to how the need for justification develops with age. In 
the following table we shall place Jan, Dan and Ad in 
one group, Ad, Lev, and Pie at 5 and 6 in the other, and 
we shall add the results of 100 instances of ' because ' 
taken at random from the table-talk of two adults in the 
course of a few consecutive days. The numbers show the 
proportion of times when c because ' expresses a logical 
relation to the total number of occasions on which the 
word ' because ' is used at all. 

Jan, Dan and Ad . . . 0-04 Age, 3-4 

Ad (age 5), Pie and Lev . o-io Age, 5-6 

Clau and Lev . . . 0-18 Age, 7 

XandY 0-33 Adult 

We must, of course, beware of forming any hasty 
conclusion from statistics which cover, it is true, nearly 
10,000 childish sentences, but are drawn from the talk 
of eight children only. But we repeat once more that our 
only object is to frame hypotheses which shall be tested 
later on by a different method of procedure. And it is 
the mark of a sound method that the hypotheses which 
guide its experiments should have been born of the crude 
facts of observation such as .those which make up the 
body of the statistics given above. 

These data seem to point to some period in time 
between the ages of 7 and 8 as that after which the chief 
development of logical justification sets in. And we shall 
see later on in connexion with our collective enquiry that 
the unfinished sentences were successfully completed in 
a proportion of cases which increased rapidly from the 
age of 7-8. 

If this is so, then we are warranted in making the 
hypothesis that the need for logical justification is con- 
comitant with the decline of ego-centrism on the one hand 



IN THE CHILD 15 

and with the diminution of juxtaposition in general on 
the other, since we have already shown that it is during 
his seventh year that Lev's coefficient of ego-centrism 
goes from 0-47 to 0-27, and that his 'because' goes from 
2-4% to 6-1%. This solitary but closely observed case 
seems therefore to indicate that the decline of ego-centrism, 
that of juxtaposition in general, and the development of 
logical justification are all of a piece. 

It will be easy enough to see how this mutual depend- 
ence works out, if the sequel proves it to exist. We have 
on many occasions stressed the point that the need for 
checking and demonstration is not a spontaneous growth 
in the life of the individual ; it is on the contrary a social 
product. Demonstration is the outcome of argument and 
the desire to convince. Thus the decline of ego-centrism 
and the growth of logical justification are part of the same 
process (of. in particular, L.T., Chap. II). On the other 
hand, we saw just now that ego-centrism entails a certain 
lack of direction in thinking, owing to the fact that there 
is nothing here which tends to make thought conscious of 
itself and consequently to systematize or ' direct ' its 
successive judgments. It is therefore no mere coinci- 
dence that all these phenomena should group themselves 
around the age of 7-8, which forms a definite stage in the 
development of the socialization of thought. 

But once again, these are only hypotheses. Let us now 
try to verify them by experiment. 

3. JUXTAPOSITION AND THE EMPIRICAL ' BECAUSE/ 
We have shown what is to be understood by juxtaposition 
in childish idiom ; it is the fact that the successive judg- 
ments which constitute the child's talk are not connected 
by explicit relations but are simply stuck together. If 
this phenomenon really lasts up till the age of 7-8, we 
must expect to find, even at this age, that when the 
children are asked to complete a sentence which implies 
a definite relation, there is a certain amount of confusion 
between the various possible relations. Only this element 
of confusion will prove that the relation was not implicit in 



16 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

the child's mind, and that the child was really incapable 
of establishing the correct relation. 

For we must beware of confusing juxtaposition with 
mere ellipsis. We do not ourselves express every ' because ' 
that enters into our explanations, and it is even the mark 
of good style to bring out causal relations by a mere string 
of statements : " It is raining. The thunder has ionized 
the air, and the ions have brought about the formation 
of rain-drops." But this style is the result of art. It is 
only after having become conscious of causal relations 
that we can omit them, and our own elliptical style 
does not deceive us. In the same way an artist will 
contrive to express himself by means of a few pencil- 
strokes, juxtaposed like those of children who are labouring 
under c synthetic incapacity ' ; but here again the apparent 
juxtaposition is the result of art. 

Now, if the scarcity of the word ' because ' up till the 
age of 7-8 is really a proof that the child's mind is devoid 
of certain relations, experiment should reveal a whole 
series of confusions when the child is pressed to find the 
correct relation. And this, as a matter of fact, is what 
proves to be the case. The data show that up to the age 
of 7- 8 the word ' because ' is occasionally an equivocal 
term which is used for all purposes, and covers a number 
of heterogeneous types of relation causal, consecutive, 
and even finalistic, the child being apparently quite 
undisturbed by this heterogeneity. Sometimes there 
seems to be no need for the use of ' because ' at all ; it will 
be placed at the beginning of a proposition which bears 
no relation whatever except that of simultaneity to the 
principal proposition of the sentence. This is all the more 
significant in view of the fact that we are concerned here 
only with the ' because ' of empirical relation, leaving 
aside for the moment the logical ' because ' which offers 
additional difficulties of its own. 

Here are some examples of these heterogeneous relations 
as made by children who are otherwise quite capable of 
handling the word ' because/ but who, in regard to our 



IN THE CHILD 17 

uncompleted sentences, use the word sometimes in a 
correct sense, sometimes in a sense akin to ' in such a 
manner that ' (consecutive relation), and sometimes in 
the sense of ' and/ 

Ga (age 7), after having correctly invented such sen- 
tences as : " There is a window broken, because a boy 
threw a stone" finishes other sentences in the following 
manner : "A man fell down in the street, because he fell 
ill.' 3 x Now Ga does not mean that the man fell down 
because he was ill, but that he fell, and that was 
what made him ill : " He fell down. They took him to the 
chemist's. Why did he fall ? Someone had put some ice 
on the pavement." 'Because' might here be replaced by 
' and ' or by ' in such a manner that/ The causal relation 
seems to have been changed over into a consecutive 
relation. 

Similarly, Sci (age 7 ; 2) : "A man fell down in the 
road, because he broke his leg, he had a bit of wood stuck 
on [a wooden leg]/' Kel (8 ; 6) : " The man fell from his 
bicycle, because he broke his arm" Brico (7; 6) and 
Je (8 ; o) : " because he broke his leg." 

Berne (6J) : " I teased that dog, because he bit me." 
(Berne means : First I teased the dog, and then he bit me.) 

Leona (7^) : "I had a bath, because afterwards I was 
clean" " There was a draught because the draught gave 
me a cold" " I went to the cinema, because it was pretty." 
(We found out that he did not know it was pretty before 
going to the cinema ; he did not go because it was pretty, 
but he went and it was pretty.) 

Don (age 6) : " I've lost my pen because I'm not 
writing." " I went for a message yesterday, because I went 
on my bike" " They are playing music (in the next 
room), because you can hear it." 

Hour (6 ; 10) : " That boy threw me a stone, because 
he is in prison." " The man fell off his bicycle, because 
afterwards he was ill and they picked him up in the street" 
Of course this does not prevent Hour from correctly 
completing other sentences such as : "I shan't go to 
school to-morrow, because it is cold" Or " I hurt myself, 
because I fell off my bicycle." 

Berg (age 6), among many correct propositions, brings 
out such statements as : "He fell off his bike, because 

1 The sentence to be completed is in Roman type, the child's answer 
is in italics. 
B 



i8 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

he fell and then he hurt himself." Mor (9 ; i) [backward] 
tells us " I am not well, because I'm not going to school" 

Finally, let us recall the point brought out earlier, that 
Dan (3^) in his spontaneous language, uses the word 
' because ' sometimes correctly and sometimes as follows : 
" / want to make a stove . . . because for the heating" 
' Because ' stuck in this way on to 'for/ or ' so that ' is 
frequently met with in the talk of children from 3 to 4 
years old. One also meets with the expression " because 
because of/' 1 

What interpretation are we to put on all this ? At first 
sight it would seem simply that the child is hesitating 
indefinitely between causal explanation and logical justifi- 
cation. His ' because ' seems at times to be a genuine 
' because/ sometimes it resembles a ' since ' ; and the reason 
for this is that the child does not realize when he is being 
required to explain, and when to justify. 

Roughly speaking, this interpretation is the true one, 
but it must be qualified by two additional remarks. In 
the first place, the child (as we have already seen and as 
we shall show in the following section) is in no way 
conscious of proving what he says or what is said to him. 
For instance, it is certainly not from any love of justifica- 
tion as such that the above answers were given to us ; 
they are due simply to the desire to make up a relation 
since the child has been asked for one, and in these cases, 
it turns out that the first relation which comes into his 
head refers to the consequence of the event, not to its 
cause, thus giving the impression that the child was trying 
to justify the sentence to be completed. After all, it is 
the consequence of an event which constitutes the logical 
justification of the judgment which affirms the event. 
The fact that he has broken his leg is both the consequence 
of the fact that the man fell off his bicycle and the justi- 
fication of the judgment : " That man fell off his bicycle/' 
(The French word for since, ' puisque/ is derived from 

1 French " parce qu* & cause " [Translator's note]. 



IN THE CHILD 19 

words which originally expressed nothing but sequence 
' et puis . . . que ' ' and then . . . that '.) 

The simplest interpretation is therefore that the child, 
realizing that there is a vague connexion between a 
proposition such as " The man fell off his bicycle " and 
another such as " He was ill afterwards/' does not enquire 
whether this connexion is causal, consecutive, or logical 
(relation of justification) but simply expresses this relation 
by ' because/ 

Now, since we are concerned here with sentences to be 
completed and not with material taken from the spon- 
taneous talk of the child, the conclusion to be drawn from 
these data is not that the child confuses cause and effect, 
but rather that before the age of 7-8 he is perhaps in- 
capable whether in narrative, argument, or in any of his 
relations with other people of differentiating between 
the various types of possible relations (cause, conse- 
quence, or logical justification), and of handling them to 
good effect. 

The best proof that this is no fanciful reading of the 
facts is that the same phenomena are to be found in the 
spontaneous idiom of children. When a child constructs 
his own sentences instead of completing half-formed 
sentences, inversions similar to those which we have 
described may be observed, though naturally they occur 
in a smaller proportion. We have already discussed this 
matter in connexion with understanding between children 
(L.T., Chap. Ill, 5). For example, Pour (7 ; 6), instead 
of saying : " The water stays there because the pipe is 
so placed/' or in his own style, " The water stays there 
because the pipes can't get there/' reverses the relation and 
says : " Because the water stays there, the pipes can't get 
there!' Mart (age 8), instead of saying : " Why does the 
water run out there and not run out here ? Because the 
tap is open there and shut here," says : " Why is the tap 
open there . . . etc.? [because] the water runs out there, 
and here . . . etc" See also in connexion with the turn- 
ing of 'because' into 'why/ Chapter V of vol. L.T, 



20 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

( 5 to the end). In a word, these facts are exactly 
similar to those which we have just elicited by means of 
experiment. 

But it is chiefly in interrogatories referring to natural 
phenomena or machines that one can note at every turn 
these inversions due to the lack of direction in thought. 
For example, Schnei (4^) tells that an engine which has 
been lighted before him goes because of the fire. The fire is 
put out : " It's not going now Why is it not going any 
longer ? Because it has stopped. Why has it stopped ? 
Because it [the wheel] is not going round fast. But 
why is it not going round any longer ? . . .," etc. This 
type of answer is extremely frequent between the ages of 
7 and 8. It cannot be due to any desire to justify the 
statements, since these are self-evident. Nor is it due to 
any difficulty in giving a causal explanation, since the 
child knows the cause in question. It is simply a case of 
lack of direction or order in thinking ; the different 
relations are interchangeable at any moment, because 
they have no fixed function in the subject's speech. 

These phenomena of non-differentiation are probably 
connected with what was revealed by our examination 
of 'why.' We were able to show (L.T., Chap. V) that 
many of the ' whys ' of children under 7-8 bear witness 
to an undifferentiated state where cause is confused 
with reason, with motive, and hence, in a sense, with 
consequence. 

The proof then of the true importance attaching to the 
phenomenon of juxtaposition would seem to lie in these 
apparent inversions of the causal relation : the habit 
which children have of merely juxtaposing their successive 
statements instead of binding them together betrays a 
genuine difficulty in the management of relations as they 
occur in speech. Originally, it would seem, the child 
refrains from voicing any explicit relations, because his 
experience is limited to what may be called ' relational 
feelings/ among which, however, he is incapable of 
distinguishing one kind from another. Then from among 



IN THE CHILD 21 

these vague relations those are gradually differentiated 
which we call causal, consecutive, and finalistic. And 
only once those three relations have been separately 
established (round about 7-8) would that of implication 
(logical justification) seem to have any claim to an autono- 
mous and distinct existence. 

We shall see, moreover, that the same thing holds good 
in the case of all conjunctions with which the child is 
unfamiliar. When he is asked to complete a sentence 
containing e.g, 'although/ the child, instead of saying 
that he does not know the word, feels that it must mean 
some sort of relation, and therefore chooses the simplest 
and most undifferentiated, that which could be rendered 
by a mere ' and/ Consequently, it is only natural that 
the same principle should hold for a long time in the case 
of ' because ' occasionally in the child's spontaneous 
idiom (though rarely, since explicit relations are just 
those which the child does his best to eliminate from his 
idiom) but chiefly in such experiments as those of the 
uncompleted sentences. 

It might be claimed that mistakes such as we have been 
discussing are purely grammatical and have no concern 
with the child's thought. This reading of the facts could 
be maintained with regard to ' for ' and the conjunctions 
of discordance, but it falls to the ground as regards the 
spontaneous ' because ' in the talk of the child from 3-4. 
To examine this problem it is necessary to analyse chil- 
dren's concrete ideas of things, to get them to talk about 
nature, or arrange little experiments with them which they 
can discuss afterwards, etc. Whether or not there is in such 
cases any confusion between cause and effect, or between 
cause and logical reason, etc., is quite another matter. What 
we are examining now is simply the verbal expression of 
causality or rather the narration of causal sequences. All 
that we claim is that in such narration the child is incapable 
of differentiating clearly between relations of causality, of 
sequence and of justification (however clearly he may have 
distinguished them in concrete observation) ; which means 



22 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

that he is incapable of assigning a fixed function in speech 
to each of these relations. In a word it comes to this, 
that the child cannot give an account of facts. He 
follows neither the order of logical demonstration nor that 
of causal sequence, but mixes the one up with the other. 
And this is exactly what we found to be the case with 
regard to the structure of the explanations which take 
place between one child and another (L.T., Chap. Ill, 

5)- 1 
Finally, the question may be raised as to when we are 

to date the disappearance of this stage during which the 
child mixes up all empirical relations into one undiffer- 
entiated relation. In other words, from what age onwards 
are children able to complete a sentence correctly which 
contains an empirical ' because ' ? According to our 
qualitative analyses there would seem to be a diminution 
of juxtaposition at the age of 7 to 8. Is it possible to verify 
this hypothesis by means of a collective enquiry? In 
order to carry this out we gave the two following sentences 
to 180 children of 7-8, taken from the Elementary schools 
in Geneva, and asked them to complete them in writing : 

1. I shan't go to school to-morrow, because . . . 

2. That man fell off his bicycle, because . . . 

The first sentence was successfully finished by about 
85% of the 7-year old boys and by 95% of the boys be- 

1 A possible way of verifying the hypothesis that ' because * still 
indicates a relation of simple juxtaposition in the child might be to ask 
our subjects straight away what the word ' because ' means. But all 
definition presupposes the awareness of subconscious operations, and 
we know from M. Claparede's law of prise de conscience that the more 
automatically a relation is used, the more difficult it is to bring it into 
consciousness. We saw in the last paragraph, moreover, to what 
extent childish ego-centrism blocks the way to awareness of thought 
as such. These conclusions can easily be verified with regard to the 
word ' because/ When children from 7 to 9 are asked what the word 
' because ' means in such sentences as " I shall not go to school to-morrow 
because I am ill/' most of them answer : " It means that he is ill." 
Others maintain that " It means that he won't go to school." In short, 
these children have no idea of the definition of the word ' because/ in 
spite of the fact that they can manipulate it spontaneously, at any rate 
in the sense we have specified. 



IN THE CHILD 23 

tween 8 and 9. It will be remembered that a test is 
said to have been successful when 75% of the children of 
a certain age can pass it. The second sentence is from this 
point of view not successfully completed at seven (70%), 
but is so with children of eight (77%). 

It may therefore be assumed that on an average the 
correct use of the empirical ' because ' takes its start at 
the age of 7-8. 1 

4. THE RELATION OF IMPLICATION AND THE LOGICAL 
' BECAUSE ' AND ' SINCE/ If the confusion with regard 
to the empirical relations denoted by the word ' because ' 
is really such as we have shown it to be, no correct manage- 
ment of the relation of implication can be expected to 
appear before the age of 7-8. For the implicative or 
logical relation connects not one fact with another, but 
reason with its consequent, or rather a judgment with its 
proof or logical antecedent. The hypothesis may therefore 
be advanced that logical implication has a double origin, 
or at any rate presents two complementary features. 

On the one hand, as was shown by our examination of 
' why ' (L.T., Chap. V) and of the empirical ' because/ 
the child, before reaching the age of 7-8, simply has a 
tendency to confuse logical and causal relations. He 
conceives the world as being the work of a human and 
entirely reasonable agency (excluding, for example, all 

1 We shall say nothing about the word ' for ' [Fr. ' car '] which belongs 
almost exclusively to written language and is, as such, used only to a 
very limited extent before the age of 7-8. The few experiments we 
made in connexion with it, however, gave results analogous to those 
which we have just been describing. Besides, ' for ' is occasionally 
not understood at all, in which case it signifies, according to the context, 
' and ' or even ' but.' For example : " It is hot to-day, for to-morrow 
it will be cold " (Boz, age 7). " She is a very nice little girl, for she has a 
bad fault " (Guign, age 9), etc. 

It is difficult, therefore, to separate logical and grammatical factors. 
In so far as it was possible for us to do so, we met with the same 
phenomena as in connexion with ' because/ and at an age when 
' because * was already used correctly (ages 8-10) . This shifting of 
difficulties is perfectly natural. It often happens that a fresh obstacle 
resuscitates difficulties previously overcome in connexion with a different 
obstacle. 



24 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

idea of chance, etc.) and he consequently draws no dis- 
tinction between the causes of phenomena and the psycho- 
logical or logical motives which would have actuated men 
if they had been the creators of these phenomena. It is 
therefore only after the age of 7-8, i.e. after the decline 
of this naive realism has set in that the different types of 
relations come to be clearly distinguished, and that 
logical implication can become autonomous. 

In the second place, logical implication arises mainly 
out of psychological motivation ; to justify a judgment is, 
after all, to give the motive for an act or at any rate for 
a certain kind of act, viz. that which consists in narrating 
the action instead of carrying it out. In this way the 
more conscious the child becomes of himself, the 
greater will be the importance of the ' because ' of justifi- 
cation as against the ' because ' of purely psychological 
motivation. Now we saw above that the decisive factor 
in causing a child to become conscious of himself was 
contact and above all contrast with the thought of 
others. Before society has administered these shocks, the 
child inclines to believe every hypothesis that comes 
into his head, feeling no need for proof and incapable if 
he did feel such a need of becoming conscious of the 
motives which really guided his thought. 

To sum up, logical implication is doubly rooted in 
psychological motivation, whether, as is the case before 
the age of 7-8, the child attributes motives and intentions 
to nature and thus confuses causal with psychological 
relations, or whether, as is again the case before 7-8, the 
child's ego-centrism prevents the desire for objective 
proof (i.e. proof that is valid for all) to supplant that for 
simple subjective motivation. 

If these deductions are right, the use of logical relations 
will be seen to develop after the age of 7-8 (as was shown 
to be the case in 2 and also in Chapters II, III and IV of 
the volume L.T.), and analysis will show that this develop- 
ment coincides with that by which the child becomes 
aware of his thought-processes as such. 



IN THE CHILD 25 

In order to verify the first of these assertions, let us 
see at what age children are able to finish sentences which 
imply logical justification. We experimented on the same 
180 children mentioned in the last paragraph by means of 
the two following propositions : 

1. Paul says he saw a little qat swallowing a big dog. 
His friend says that is impossible (or silly) because . . . 

2. Half 9 is not 4 because . . . 



Sentence i 
Sentence 2 
Together 



Sentence i , 
Sentence 2 , 
Together 

Alongside of the net percentages we have placed in 
brackets the wider percentages which contain, in addition 
to entirely correct answers, answers which are simply 
incomplete but show signs, nevertheless, of implicit 
logical justification. Later on we shall see what is the 
nature of these answers. 

This table therefore shows very clearly that logical 
justification is a far more difficult matter than handling 
the empirical ' because/ For example, the same boys 
whose success was 80% in the case of the sentences men- 
tioned in the last paragraph only achieved a success of 
35% or 47% in the case of the first of our two sentences, 
easy though it might appear to be. The table also shows 
that progress between the ages of 7 and 9 is fairly rapid 
from our present point of view. To what then are we to 
attribute the peculiar difficulty with regard to logical 
justification ? The clue is to be found in an analysis 
of the results obtained in individual examination. 



AGE 


7- 




AGE 8. 


Boys. 


Girls. 


Boys. 


Girls. 


36% (47) 


38% (60) 


50% (77) 


54% (72) 


8% (41) 


6% (44) 


30% (57) 


14% (46) 


21% (44) 


22% (52) 


4% (67) 


34% (59) 




AGE 9. 






Boys. 


Girls. 


Boys. 


Girls. 


88% (88) 


6x% (72) 


88% (88) 


61% (72) 


25% (62) 


17% (48) 


25% (62) 


17% (48) 


56% (75) 


39% (60) 


56% (75) 


39% (60) 



26 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

The least satisfactory answers are of the following 
type: 

Gue (age 6) tells us : " Ernest has 4 francs. He buys 
with his 4 francs 2 francs worth of chocolate and a ball 
that cost 3 francs. This is impossible, because he had 
stolen them/' 

Tacc (age 9) : " Half 9 is not 4, because he can't count!' 
" Half 6 is 3, because he divides it." " Paul says that 2 + 2 
= 5. That's silly, because he doesn't know how to count," etc. 

Gue (age 6) : " Paul says he saw a little cat . . . etc. 
It's impossible, because it isn't true." 

Mour (age 6) : " Ernest has 4 francs. He buys, with 
these 4 francs, . . . etc. It's impossible, because it's 
silly, because you could never do that" Maz (8 ; o) : 
" Paul was given 12 apples to share with Jean. Paul 
will take 6, because he's^ quite right." Aub (8 ; 2) : " Paul 
says 2 + 2 = 5. It's impossible, because it's wrong." 
" Half 7 is not 4 because it's not right." Mart (8 ; 10) : " Half 
6 is 3, because it's right." 

We need not add any more examples, though the supply 
is abundant. The mechanism is always the same. In 
the simplest cases the child confines himself, by way of 
logical justification, to giving a psychological explanation 
of the action which he is asked to justify or invalidate : 
" he stole it," or " he can't count," or " he divides," etc. 
In such cases there is still obvious confusion between 
logical justification and psychological motivation. In 
the more advanced cases the child appeals not so much 
to individual as to collective motives : " it's right/' " you 
can or you cannot do that," " he is quite right," etc. 
But there is clearly no considerable progress ; the child 
makes no attempt to analyse the ' why ' of the questions 
submitted to him. He invokes, not as yet a logical 
reason, but a collective reason, the decits, so to speak 
(a thing is ' done ' or is not ' done '), and in this way puts 
logical and social rules on an equal level. In Baldwin's 
words the child recognizes 'syndoxic' but not yet 
' synnomic ' laws. These children therefore justify their 
judgments in the same way as children under the age of 
7-8 argue (L.T., Chaps. I-II), i.e. by simply affirming, or 



IN THE CHILD 27 

by appealing to authority, but never by really sub- 
stantiating their statements. 1 

It is now perfectly easy to see why the logical reasons 
given by a child of 7-8 are incomplete. It is in no way 
because the child lacks the knowledge or information 
necessary for demonstration. For example, in the two 
sentences which we used for our collective enquiry it 
would be quite easy for the children to say with regard to 
the first sentence that ''little animals don't eat big ones/' 
It is less easy for them (and the statistics make this very 
clear) to say that 4 and 4 make 8, in order to prove that 
half 9 is not 4. But this does not mean that the notion 
of half is foreign to them. Other lines of investigation, it 
is true, have given rise to various difficulties connected with 
the idea of half, but all the Geneva children of 7, 8 and 9 
know that half of 8 is 4 and half of 10 is 5, and that every 
half is the result of division into two equal parts. When 
we say that they ' know ' this, we mean that they know 
how to find half of a number, and are therefore able to 
handle certain notions as though they were conscious 
of their definitions. But this is just what they are not 
conscious of, and that is why, as soon as one tries, in 
connexion, for example, with some verbal expression, to 
make them conscious of such definitions, the attempt 
provokes all sorts of intellectual difficulties. One might 
say then that it is for lack of possessing definitions that 
the child can make no use of logical justification ; but 
that would involve us in a vicious circle, for it is just this 
need for logical justification that causes the mind to 
become conscious of the definition of notions which it 
previously was content merely to make use of. 

In a word, it is not for lack of knowledge that the child 
fails to deal adequately with logical justification. The 
reason is far simpler and lies in the fact that owing to 

1 Note in this connexion expressions like " they say that " which 
are found in children who have discovered true logical relations. Gia 
(age 8) : " Half 6 is 3 because they say that 3 and 3 make 6." " Half 
9 is not 4 because 4 and 4 make 8 and you can't say that 4 and 4 make 9." 



28 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

his ego-centrism he does not realize the need for it. The 
examples given above show that the supreme appeal which 
children are tempted to make when asked to justify a 
statement is the appeal to public opinion. But as often 
happens in such cases the appeal to public opinion is 
always accompanied by the conviction that one is 
its mouthpiece ; the subject is ignorant of possible 
divergencies, and consequently has a tendency to avoid 
any analysis of the reasons, valid or invalid, which alone 
would make this public opinion legitimate. Chapter III of 
volume L.T. showed that children, in so far as they are 
ego-centric, always believe themselves to be in immediate 
agreement with every one else. They believe that the 
other person always knows what they are thinking about 
and is acquainted with their reason for doing so ; in a 
word, they always believe themselves to have been 
completely understood. This is why, in primitive argu- 
ments, each speaker confines himself to mere statement 
without motivation (L.T., Chap. II) or with only such 
embryonic and rudimentary motivation as leaves the 
essentials of the matter unsaid. 

Highly instructive in this connexion are the justifica- 
tions which we classified as ' incomplete ' when we sorted 
out the results of our collective enquiry. A separate 
analysis of these shows very clearly that each one con- 
tains implicitly a perfectly valid reason, but one which 
the child cannot express, just because it is not the kind 
of reason which he ever tries to give. Here are some 
examples : 

Maz (age 8) : " Half 6 =3, because it has been divided." 
' To be divided ' obviously means to be divided into two 
equal parts, but that is just what Maz forgets to say, so 
that he is really only repeating the original statement. 

Ber (age 6) : " Half 6 =3, because half of six makes 3." 
The same remark applies here. It should be noted that 
the few correct answers obtained are very clear (" because 
3 and 3 make 6," etc.), which proves that they are not 
beyond the general level of the children in question. 

Maz (age 8) : " Half 9 is not 4, because there i$ one 



IN THE CHILD 29 

more!" The answer is right, but once again it takes 
for granted the argument : 4 and 4 make 8, " and there 
is one more " wanted to make 9. 

Bazz (age 8) : " Paul says he saw a little cat eating a 
big dog. His friend says that's impossible, because the 
litte cat ate the big dog." As we found out by talking to 
him, Bazz has understood the problem, but he considers 
the impossibility in question to be so much a matter of 
course that he contents himself with repetition. Similarly, 
Mor (7 ; n) : " Because the little cat is little, and the big 
dog is big." 

The same Mor (7 ; n) : " Paul says that the road from 
his house goes down all the way to school and goes down 
all the way back from school. Jean says that's impossible, 
because on the way there the road goes up." The same 
applies here : Mor states without justifying, because he 
feels no need to do otherwise. 

We need press the point no further. Even when the 
child has reasoned correctly (and this is the only case that 
we are concerned with now, in contrast to the cases dealt 
with above), he cannot justify his reasoning, because he 
is accustomed to take the essential point for granted. 

We are now in a position to ask a question, the answer 
to which will either confirm or destroy our hypothesis 
that difficulty in handling logical justification arises 
from inability to be conscious of one's own reasoning 
process. That ' essential,' that logical reason which 
always remains implicit because it is taken for granted 
is the child conscious of it himself ? Has he had clearly 
in his mind the propositions " Little cats do not eat big 
dogs," or " A road cannot go down both on the way there 
and on the way back," or " Half 8 is 4, because 4 and 4 
make 8 ? " It is obvious that he has not. The child 
has been conscious only of the particular cases to which 
his answer referred, and was unable to express the corre- 
sponding general laws. Now it goes without saying that if 
a proposition cannot be expressed, we cannot be conscious 
of it. When we say that the child can handle a notion 
before having become conscious of it, what we mean is 
that there has been gradually built up in the child's mind 



30 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

(i.e. in his various forms of incipient activity a schema), 
(i.e. a unique type of reaction) which can be applied 
every time mention is made of a little cat, or of a half, or 
of a road, etc., but which does not yet correspond to a 
verbal expression. The verbal expression alone can 
bring this schema into consciousness and transform it into 
a general proposition or a definition. The conscious 
realization of one's own thought is dependent upon its 
communicability, and this communicability is itself 
dependent upon social factors, such as the desire to con- 
vince, etc. 

To sum up, we claim to have substantiated, in so far 
as our present knowledge of the facts will allow, the 
hypotheses advanced in 2. In the first place we showed 
in 3 that juxtaposition came from the absence or poverty 
of ' direction ' in the child's mind, that is to say, from 
a lack of clear relations between successive judgments. 
In the second place, we have just shown that the incapacity 
for logical justification is definitely the outcome of a 
certain unconsciousness, an inability to attain conscious 
realization. And both absence of direction and difficulty 
in conscious realization are well known to be, if not the 
product (for many other factors intervene), at least the 
indirect result of childish ego-centricity. 

5. THE CONJUNCTIONS 'THEREFORE' AND 'THEN/ 1 
We have still to deal with a problem closely related to those 
which have been occupying us, the problem of ' therefore ' 
[done] , which touches on the question of deductive reasoning 
and consequently on that of logical justification. 

After all, if our hypotheses concerning juxtaposition 
and logical justification are correct, they must admit of 
verification by a study of the term ' therefore/ which is 
only an inversion of ' because/ ' Therefore/ instead of 
denoting like ' because/ the relation of cause to effect or 

1 The classifications of the grammarians are, in the confessed opinion 
of contemporary students of linguistics, extremely arbitrary. The 
reader must therefore not be surprised to see the word ' then ' placed 
among conjunctions, as it frequently fulfils the functions of such* 



IN THE CHILD 31 

of reason to logical consequent, marks a relation of effect 
to cause or a relation of causal or logical sequence. " It is 
hot, because the sun is shining." "The sun is shining, 
therefore it is hot," or ' ' Half 4 is 2 because 2 and 2 make 4." 
" 2 and 2 make 4, therefore half 4 is 2." But a great 
difficulty in studying this relation, which the adult denotes 
by the word ' therefore/ is that there is no word in the 
child's language which marks it in an unambiguous manner. 
The word ' therefore ' [done] does not exist in childish 
idiom before an age which we cannot as yet determine 
statistically, but which our observations leads us to fix 
above 11-12, i.e. (cf. Chap. II) at the moment when formal 
thought makes its first appearance. The word ' then ' [alors] 
which in childish talk is the equivalent of ' therefore ' 
has, however, far too many different meanings to be 
regarded as synonymous with * therefore ' and to serve 
in an experimental study of the relation indicated by this 
word. This will be shown in greater detail later on. 

What we shall attempt to find out, however, is in the 
first place why the word ' therefore ' does not exist in 
the language of the child, and in the second place, in what 
sense it is that the child makes spontaneous use of the 
term ' then/ 

The first of these questions is easy enough to answer. 
Whatever the particular shade of meaning indicated by 

* therefore * in the adult, it is almost invariably used in 
the establishment of a proof. At least it always serves to 
connect to an uncontested proposition, a proposition of 
which one was supposedly ignorant or of which one did 
not know the logical necessity. In the sentence : " The 
sun is shining, therefore it is hot," the relation indicated is 
certainly empirical (the heat is the result of the fact that 
the sun is shining), but it is also logical, because deduction, 
and even necessary deduction has taken place. The word 

* therefore * is a sign that we are in a position to prove 
that the sun always produces heat, etc. To turn a 
' because ' into a ' therefore ' is consequently to add some- 
thing to it, it is to add to the causal relation, the possibility 



32 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

of a deduction, and of a necessary deduction into the 
bargain. 

We are now in a position to see quite clearly why this 
word is absent from the language of the child. In the 
first place, up to the age of 7-8 the use of logical justifica- 
tion remains at a very imperfect stage, which is a very 
good reason why the word ' therefore ' should have found 
no place. Secondly, between the moment when the need 
for proof is felt for the first time and the moment when 
necessary deduction can be properly handled there must 
be a long transitional period of learning. For in order 
to be necessary, a deduction must be formal or hypothetico- 
deductive, i.e. its conclusions must be held to be true 
only by reason of its premises and quite independently 
of the empirical truth of these premises. " If such and 
such a condition be admitted, . . . then such and such 
other conditions will necessarily follow." Now, as we 
have shown elsewhere, 1 and as the next chapter will prove, 
the possibility of such a train of thought does not appear 
till about the age of 11-12. This seems a sufficient 
explanation for the absence of the word * therefore ' 
from the child's vocabulary until he has reached the stage 
of development acquired at the age of 11-12. 

Even so, however, it is none the less interesting to 
enquire into the different meanings which children ascribe 
to the word. For, although they do not use it themselves, 
they are constantly hearing it used even by uneducated 
adults. One of us noticed, for example, that in the 
conversation of some Savoyard peasants who were arguing 
in a cafe, the word ' therefore ' (' done ') appeared very 
frequently. All the more reason then for the word being 
used by the parents and more especially by the teachers 
of our school-children. A word heard frequently by chil- 
dren must come to stand in their minds for one or several 
more or less stable types of thought-relation, and this 
fact will free us from the charge of artificiality in employing 

1 J. Piaget, " Essai sur la multiplication logique et les debuts de 
la pense formelle chez I'enfajat," Jouvn. de Psych*, xix. (1922), p. 222. 



IN THE CHILD 33 

the same method for studying ' therefore ' as we used in 
the case of ' because.' 1 

The results of this experiment proved highly suggestive. 
The different meanings which the children gave to the 
word ' therefore ' turned out to correspond exactly to the 
different meanings of ' because/ Just as the word 
' because ' fluctuated between the relation of causality 
and that of consequence or implication, so in the same way 
we shall see that ' therefore ' fluctuates between the rela- 
tion of consequence and, curiously enough, the actual 
causal relation. In other words, ' therefore/ instead of 
being s for the child the symmetrical counterpart of 
' because/ points on the contrary, like ' because/ to an 
' and ' which originally stands for mere juxtaposition 
accompanied by a relation which is felt but not yet clearly 
differentiated. 

Here, to begin with, are a few examples of ' therefore ' 
taken in the sense of * and ' (simple juxtaposition) : 

Mus (8 ; 4) : " Fernand has lost his pen, therefore 
he had a lovely pen, ' ' (Now Mus is not completely incapable 
of understanding the word ' therefore/ as he often takes 
it in the adult sense, i.e. in the sense of ' consequently ' : 
" It will be fine to-morrow, therefore I shall go for a walk.") 
Bab (age 9) : " Fernand has lost his pen, therefore it was 
a new tine." (The same applies here. Some of the sen- 
tences are correct : " To-morrow I shall have a holiday, 
therefore it will be Sunday"') 

Here are some more examples in which ' therefore ' 
indicates the continuation of the narrative, the relation 
of antecedent and consequent, but of a purely temporal 
kind, free from any admixture of causal or logical sequence : 

" Fernand has lost his pen, therefore he has found it 
(again)/' Schm. (7 ; 10). Cf. use of ' then ' : " Fernand 
has lost his pen, then he has found it again." Mus (8 ; 4) 
". . . . therefore he hasn't found it again (Ga, age 7), etc. 

1 For the difference between understood and spoken vocabulary, see 
Bovet, Interm. des Eduo., 1916 (Nos. 34-35), p- 35* 
C 



34 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

Finally, here are a few examples where ' therefore J 
is made to show, not the consequence, but the explanation 
of what is given. ' Therefore ' might here be replaced 
by ' because/ so that these cases are strictly analogous 
to the apparent inversions of ' because ' which we studied 
in 3. 

Tacc (age 9) : " Fernand has lost his pen, therefore 
he has given it to another kid, he has lost it in the play-room." 
and " I can't ride my bicycle, therefore it is broken" 

Same example, Leo (age 8) : ". . . . therefore it is 
broken." 

These last sentences could naturally be regarded as 
correct if they were not said by children who on other 
occasions used the word ' therefore ' in a purely fanciful 
sense. Indeed, for these children, ' therefore ' means either 
nothing at all, or it means ' because/ 

In conclusion, our study of ' therefore/ short as it is, 
seems in no way to invalidate the results obtained from 
our study of ' because/ Out of the 30 children between 
6 and 9, whom we examined individually, not one proved 
capable of handling the word ' therefore ' in unambiguous 
manner nor of bringing out the particular relations which 
are indicated by the adult use of the term. In a word, the 
child possesses no special and unambiguous word for the 
relation of consequence. (The expression ' in such a 
manner that ' is naturally quite beyond him.) 

This lack of differentiation between the different mean- 
ings of ' therefore ' will now enable us to understand why 
the childish term which serves as an equivalent for ' there- 
fore ' is the word ' then * [alors]. For even in adult speech 
the word ' then ' is still vague and undifferentiated. It 
can express localization in time (" It was then eight 
o'clock") ; localization in discourse ("Let us then appeal 
to the following reasons ") ; logical consequence (" All 
x's are y's, then this x is a y ") ; psychological motivation 
( u The weather is fine, then let us go for a walk ") ; logical 
sequence (" The temperature is too low, then the reaction 



IN THE CHILD 35 

cannot have taken place/') Sometimes the meaning is 
so vague as to be unclassifiable (" Oh bother, then! "). 1 
But even when the relation indicated is classifiable, it is 
far vaguer than when it is expressed by ' therefore ' or 
' consequently/ 

This character of vagueness is naturally more pro- 
nounced in the child, and probably also explains why 
the use of the word ' then ' seems to be quite independent 
of age. Some children, even very young ones, use it for 
all purposes, and their talk is full of it, while others are 
far more sparing in their use of the term. Thus in the 
case of the five children who showed regular progress in 
the use of ' because/ the distribution of ' then ' seems to be 
haphazard. 

Logical "thens" 
[alors] 

0-12% 





"Because " 


" Then 




[parce que] 


[dors] 


Dan, age 3 


I'2% 


2-06-j 


Jan, age 3 


i*5% 


I*IO [ 


Ad, age 4 


1-2% 


2-80 J 


Ad, age 5 


2-0% 


0-50^1 


Pie, age 6 


2-0% 


0-86 


Lev, age 6 


2-4% 


1-78 J 



* - - 0-11% 
Lev, age 7 6-1% 2-80 



Clan, age 7 3-9% i'33 " ' ' ' 24/ 

As before, the number of ' thens ' is calculated in % ; 
thus 2-06 means that out of 100 sentences 2-06 on an 
average contain ' then '. 

We tried, moreover, to pick out from among these 
different ' thens/ those which it would not be too arbitrary 
to interpret as ' theref ores ' indicating logical sequence 
(the relation of implication in deduction). As will be seen, 
the number of these logical ' thens * seems to increase 
after the age of 7. 

In view of this proportion of logical ' thens ' it would 
seem that the child showed more aptitude than we were 

1 French, " Zut alors." This peculiar exclamatory use of ' alors ' 
has no counterpart in English and is only very feebly rendered by 
' then ' [Translator's note]. 



36 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

willing to allow him for a certain degree of deduction. 
But we must avoid hasty conclusions and enquire more 
carefully into the nature of the deduction in question. 

Here are the most clearly marked cases in which ( then ' 
expresses a ' therefore ' of logical implication. 

Dan (3j) : " And where'shall I go? In the next room 
Then I shall be alone ? " " [Turning over a sheet of paper] 
Then that's on the wrong side" " [Drawing] Why am I 
making smoke? Then it's a train" "A name has been 
torn up there It is Denise Then it is her desk." 

Ad (4!) : "7s that yours ? No Then it's mine" 

Pie (age 6) : " Then for 22 you must have . . . you 
must have 2. For 22 you must have 2 and 2." 

Lev (age 6) : " If you lose one, then there's one left" 
" No, it's not mine [that pencil], because it has No. 2 and 
that writing. Then I've lost mine" " [He turns a drawing 
round] : That's the way ! Then that's the head." 

Lev (age 7) : " He is tiny Like me then." [He is search- 
ing a box for something he cannot find] : " Then it must be 
in that box there. I saw it in a big box." 

These implications, which are the most explicit deduc- 
tions we came across in the 6700 sentences spoken by 
children, are obviously of a significant type. The very 
first glance at them reveals the fact that the deductions 
in question are applied only to individual cases ; the 
conclusion proceeds from one particular to another by 
means of immediate relations and without any appeal to 
the general case. This is a feature of childish deductions 
which has often been noted ; and which Stern takes as 
the characteristic mark of transduotion. Transduction 
would then proceed from particular to particular, just 
as induction proceeds from particular to general and 
deduction from general to particular. But the whole 
formulation of deduction and induction is notoriously in 
need of revision. The adult often deduces from particular 
to particular, as M. Goblot has maintained in connexion 
with mathematical reasoning. But even if M. Goblot's 
claim be admitted, general propositions still play an 
important part as rules for deduction. For though we 



IN THE CHILD 37 

may be comparing two diagrams or two equations, or 
reasoning in a general way about particular objects, we 
are still, in deduction, constantly appealing to previously 
established laws or definitions, which are in fact general 
propositions. And this is just what is lacking in our 
childish transductions ; at no point do they ever 
appeal to proofs of this kind, nor require any awareness 
of general propositions. 

The problem of childish transduction is a big one, 
and will be dealt with later on in the book (Chap. IV, 
5) ; for the moment we must content ourselves with 
the conclusion that the child's use of the word ' then ' 
is extremely elastic, and in no way implies the use of 
necessary deduction. And this confirms the results reached 
earlier in connexion with the ' because of logical justifi- 
cation/ 

II. CONJUNCTIONS OF DISCORDANCE. 

We are now in a position to prove, from another angle, 
what we have been demonstrating in the preceding 
paragraphs, and the conjunctions we shall study for this 
purpose are not those which assert, but those which deny 
relations of logical implication, causality, or sequence. 
These are, of course, the conjunctions ' although/ ' even 
though/ ' in spite of the fact that/ f all the same/ 1 ' but/ 
etc. The relation which these conjunctions express is 
generally known as ' concession ' or ' restriction/ We 
prefer the term ' discordance ' which we owe to M. Baley, 
because it emphasizes the antithesis between these con- 
junctions and those of causality. For the word ' although ' 
[guoique] expresses a discordance and not a positive relation 
between cause and effect. A proposition like " The level 
of the lake has not risen, although it has been raining for 

1 The French, equivalents, quoique, bien qua, malgr& t quand mme, 
contain shades of meaning which cannot be rendered by a single word 
in English. Throughout this section we shall make use principally 
of the term ' although ' followed in brackets by whichever of the French 
conjunctions was used in the original [Translator's note]. 



3 8 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

a week," means that there is normally a relation of cause 
and effect between the amount of rain fallen and the 
particular level of the lake, but that for once the rain 
has not brought about a rise, and that there has been 
discordance between cause and effect. The notion of 
discordance stands, therefore, for a complication in the 
notion of causality and introduces the idea of exceptions 
to causal or logical relations. The reader will easily 
grasp how interesting it would be for us to carry out a 
study of this relation parallel with our investigation of 
the nature of causal and logical relations. For we are 
meeting here not only with a new problem the study of 
which will prove highly suggestive for the psychology of 
reasoning in the child but also, in a sense, with a new 
question which will show itself to be complementary 
to those with which we have been dealing. If indeed the 
notion of discordance is to be found only in a completely 
rudimentary state in the child, the question may be 
raised whether this is not a new indication in favour of 
our hypothesis that the consciousness of relations and 
the need for verification are still very imperfect in the 
child. For the sense of exceptions, as exemplified by 
the use of discordance, is, after all, derivative from the 
sense of logical and causal rules, and here as everywhere 
else the absence of exceptions simply proves the absence 
of fixed rules. 

Before passing on to the examination of our material 
we must touch upon a question of method. Conjunctions of 
discordance are, as we shall see, very little understood 
before the age of 11-12. What part are we to assign to 
language and what to thought in our interpretation of this 
lack of understanding ? In the solution of such a question 
as this we may often be prejudiced by the very method of 
investigation adopted, and it is important to reach some 
agreement upon the matter before dealing with the actual 
facts. 

In the first place we may adopt, in regard to con- 
junctions of discordance, the same method of approach 



IN THE CHILD 39 

as that which was followed in dealing with ' therefore/ 
Even if children do not use these conjunctions, they are 
constantly hearing them in the language of the adults 
with whom they live. And though we may grant that 
in the language of the people the use of quoique and 
bien que is more restricted, it cannot be denied that 
quand meme and malgre que, etc., are in current usage. 
The problem may therefore be expressed negatively : 
why do children exercise choice in the language which 
surrounds them and exclude from their own talk the 
terms expressing discordance ? And above all, why do 
they not understand these terms ? Clearly, the problem 
is not merely linguistic but primarily one of genetic logic. 

But we can narrow the problem down. We can try 
to find out whether there is any uniformity in the manner 
in which the children understand the different terms of 
discordance, and in this way we can isolate the mental 
from the verbal factors. Our procedure was as follows. 
First we found out which was the best understood of the 
conjunctions of discordance. This was done by the same 
method as before : sentences given to be completed, 
analysis of the answer with the child (each being examined 
personally), and a collective enquiry on about 200 children 
between the ages of 7 and 9. On the whole, quand meme 
proved to be the best understood conjunction. We then 
tried to find out what meanings were attributed to 
this word when it was not understood, and we ascertained 
that the self-same meanings were to be found in connexion 
with malgre, quoique, and bien que, which are understood 
in diminishing proportions. Such uniformity in degree 
of understanding undoubtedly carries with it a two-fold 
conclusion. 

The first is that in the child's manner of distorting the 
conjunctions of discordance there is an element of verbal 
intelligence (whether positive or negative in its results 
need not concern us here), which is something more than 
mere deficiency in verbal understanding. The second 
conclusion is that we must, nevertheless, take the actual 



40 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

word into account, since certain words are better under- 
stood than others. Here again different factors may 
intervene, such as the language spoken around the child, 
which might tend to explain why quand meme, for example, 
should be simpler to understand than quoique. We shall 
endeavour to give due weight to these different factors in 
the course of our analysis. 

6. NUMERICAL RESULTS AND TYPES OF MISTAKE. 
In our collective enquiry we made use of the 9 following 
sentences (in the given order). 

1. Ernest is playing in the street, even though 
(malgreque}. . . . 

2. I have some big friends, even though (quand meme). . . 

3. He slapped my face, although (quoique). . . . 

4. I have given John my bicycle, though (bien que). . . . 

5. I ate another roll, although (bien que). . . . 

6. It is hot to-day, although (malgre que). . . . 

7. He bathed yesterday, although (quand meme). . . . 

8. I didn't get wet yesterday, although (quoique). . . . 

9. That man fell off his horse, although (bien que). . . . 

If it be granted that a test has been passed when 75% 
of the children of a given age have answered correctly, 
then we must allow that at the age when our children 
were examined discordance was not yet understood. The 
statistical results were as follows : 

AGE 7. AGE 8. AGE 9. 

Boys. Boys. Girls. Boys. Girls. 

Bien que , . . o% 16% 10% 13% 7% (?) 

Quoique . . . 9% *&% 16% 21% 17% 

Malgreque . . 18% 42% 32% 43% 42% 

Quand m^me . . 22% 44% 39% 50% 50% 

We do not claim to state at what age these conjunctions 
are understood. The whole enquiry needs to be continued 
between the years of 8-9 and 11-12. We have no precise 
data as to how discordance is dealt with during this second 
stage, except that in a class of girls of 13 our sentences 
were successfully completed by 93% of the subjects for 



IN THE CHILD 41 

bien que ; 96% for malgre que and quand meme ; and 
100% for quoique. On the strength of several individual 
examinations, however, we believe that the claim may be 
put forward that discordance begins to be correctly used 
round about the age of 11-12. On the other hand, if we 
consider, not explicit discordance such as is indicated 
by although (quoique) but implicit discordance such as is 
expressed by certain uses of ' but/ or by quand meme (used 
as an adverb not a conjunction), then its appearance 
may be situated round about the years 7-8. 

In the conversation at the Maison des Petits, for 
example, we only found three' cases of quand meme, 
taken adverbially in the sense of discordance, in the whole 
of our material, and all three cases were supplied by 
Lev at 6 (none at 7) . Undoubtedly the word quand meme 
occurs earlier than this. Mile Descceudres has noted it 
in a child of 2 whose vocabulary she studied, but not at 
5 or at 7. But in such cases it is taken in quite a different 
sense, which is that of an exclamation. Here are some 
of these primitive forms of quand meme in a little girl 
of 2 1 1 

Nel (age 2 ; 9) : " Je crois j'en vois le gros train. Quand 
meme ! ( =What a noise it makes !) " " II fait chaud 
quand meme sur ce band' 1 "Oh, tite fleur jolie, elle est 
gentil quand meme. Et pis celle-ld ! " Oh, les titesfleurs, y 
sont gentils quand m$me." 

It is true that with Nel the word quand meme almost 
looks like a term of discordance. 

" Cest une peau de lapin, $a qui est dans I'eau. II 
est mort quand mSme ce lapin," and " Ce$ bonnes graines 
[some blackberries] i sont mdrs quand meme. fen veux 
godter Us sont mdrs " (and so they were). 

But such discordance as this is very vague and in the 
second example even unintelligible. As to the first 
example, does the child mean : the rabbit is dead even 

1 As this example is practically in baby-talk, we have thought it 
best to give it in the original French [Translator's note]. 



42 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

though [quand meme] his skin is there ? It is not for us 
to say. More probably we have here simply another case 
of an exclamatory quand meme. We may therefore say 
that with Nel discordance either cannot be expressed 
or is completely absent. 
Here are the three examples taken from Lev at 6| : 

" I say, I'm six I am the strongest all the same [quand 
meme].' 9 " It hurt me too, but it doesn't matter, Til put my 
hand there all the same [quand meme)." Every one else has 
come in, but Mile L. will go out all the same [quand meme]." 

But these three cases of quand meme are clearly more 
related to psychological motivation than to any intel- 
lectual preoccupation. They show ' concession ' rather 
than discordance. They do not therefore constitute a 
proof of the use of implicit discordance in simple state- 
ments before the age of 7-8. At the same time it can be 
shown that from this age onwards the right use is under- 
stood. 

We must now decide upon some method of genetic 
grouping of the various types of mistake which we have 
met with in connexion with explicit discordance. 

We might to begin with distinguish two types of 
discordance: empirical (i.e. physical and psychological), 
and logical. But at the age of our subjects in whom 
logical relations are only beginning to appear, logical 
discordance is still completely foreign to the child's mind. 
We shall therefore concern ourselves only with empirical 
discordance. 

The mistakes found from this point of view may be 
classed into three groups : error by juxtaposition, con- 
fusion of discordance with causality, and discordance 
reduced to ' but/ 

The most primitive mistakes arise from the fact that the 
child, totally ignorant as he is of the relation of discord- 
ance, completes the sentences which are given to him 
anyhow, and therefore chooses the simplest relation 
available, which is precisely the relation of juxtaposition. 



IN THE CHILD 43 

Or else, because he is looking for the proposition which 
will best fit the given sentence, he will come to substitute 
the relation of causality for that of discordance. These 
two types of mistakes are contemporaneous ; they are 
found in the same children and indicate, one as much 
as the other, a failure to understand discordance. On 
the other hand, from the moment that there is, if not 
understanding, at least a feeling of discordance, a third 
type of mistake appears, analogous to that which we 
described in connexion with causality. In the child's 
talk of causality there is spontaneous substitution of 
a simple ' and ' for the conjunction ' because/ Conversely, 
when he is required to complete sentences containing 
' because/ what happens is that the child finishes them as 
though ' because ' were an ' and/ as though causality could 
be replaced by a vague relationship simply meaning ' going 
with.' Similarly, with regard to discordance there is 
no term in the child's language that indicates this relation 
(with the exception of quand meme taken adverbially 
during the age of 6-8), but a sort of primitive implicit 
discordance finds expression in the term ' but ' [mais] . Now 
we shall show later on that ' but J stands to ' although ' 
in the same relation as ' and ' to ' because/ Moreover, 
and here the parallelism is complete, when the child is 
given sentences to finish containing although (quoique 
and malgre que), what happens is that he finishes them as 
though ' although ' meant ' but/ 

Let us now turn to these three types of answer. 

7. FAILURE TO UNDERSTAND DISCORDANCE. Some 
children give obviously fantastic answers to all the 
sentences submitted to them : 

Hour (age 6) : " Jean has gone away, even though 
\malgrd] he has gone to the mountain." " Emile is playing in 
the street, even though [malgre] not to be run over by the 
motors." Ber (age 6) : (t I bathed, even though [malgre] 
so you don't hurt yourself/ 9 "That boy slapped my 
face, even though [malgri] it did hurt me.'' This last 
phrase means " and it hurt me/' as we afterwards ascer- 
tained. 



44 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

At this stage it is difficult to know if ' even though ' 
[malgre] means 'and' or 'because/ The children really 
answer completely at random. 

With our subjects, however, the child's meaning is 
quite clear. In these cases it can be observed that the 
term of discordance sometimes means ' and/ sometimes 
' because/ and sometimes is used correctly. Given such 
a mixture of answers, we are naturally justified in conclud- 
ing that in such cases discordance is not yet understood. 
Here are some examples : 

Leo (age 8) : " Emile is playing in the street, even 
though [guanA meme] it is cold" (correct). "It is not 
yet dark, even though [malgre que] it is still day " ( =and 
or because). " I have some big friends, even though 
[malgre] they are nice" (=but). "He fell out of the 
cart, even though [malgrt] it does hurt" (=and). "He 
fell out of the cart, although [quand meme] he didn't hurt 
himself" ( =but or quand meme taken adverbially : "he 
didn't hurt himself all the same "). " It is not dark yet, 
even though [quand meme] it is day " ( =and or because). 

Thus even the word quand meme does not possess for 
Leo a completely unequivocal meaning. 

Ral (age 8) : " Emile is playing in the street, even though 
[quand meme] he is enjoying himself" (=and). "It is 
hot to-day even though [quand meme] it is raining" 
(correct). " Rene is going away to the mountains, even 
though [quand mSme] he is going a long way " ( =and). " I 
walked for another three hours, even though [quand meme] 
that is a lot" (correct or juxtaposition). " I ate another 
roll, even though [quand meme] that's not dear " ( =and 
or because). " I slapped Paul's face, even though [quand 
meme] he is crying "( =and). 

Shortly after this we repeated the same sentences to 
Ral, who completed them in the following manner: 
" Emile is playing in the street, even though [quand meme] 
it is fine" (=and). "It is warm to-day, even though 
[quand mSme] the weather is fine" (=and or because). 

I ate another roll, even though [quand meme] it is nice " 
( *=and or because), etc. 

Don (age 6) : "I walked for another hour, even though 



IN THE CHILD 45 

[quand meme] I like walking " ( = because) . " She boxed my 
ears, even though [quand meme] she was horrid " ( =be- 
cause) . "I have been given a tricycle, even though [quand 
meme] I like them very much " ( = because). 

Kiss (age 5|) : " He was given a piece of cake, even 
though [quand meme] he had been a good boy" ( =because). 
" He tore his pinafore, even though [quand meme] he 
caught himself on a hook " ( = because). 

Maz (age 8) : That man fell out of the cart, even though 
[malgre] the horse slipped " ( ^because). " It is hot to-day, 
even though [malgre que] it is raining " (correct). " That 
man fell off his bicycle, even though [malgre que] he 
pedalled too hard " ( = because). " He got angry with me, 
although [quoique] I would not talk to him "( = because). 

Tac (age 9) : " He must be taken care of, even though 
\malgri que] he has hurt himself" (=because). Tac also 
uses " malgr6 que " in the sense of ' and ' of ' but/ and of 
' although.' 

Gug (age 9) : "I did not get wet although [quoique] 
I had an umbrella " ( =because). 

Examples might be multiplied indefinitely, and of each 
one of the four conjunctions we have examined. It does 
not therefore seem altogether reckless to make the state- 
ment that at the age of the children we were studying, 
explicit discordance, i.e. that which is indicated by a 
conjunction of subordination is not yet understood. This 
does not mean, however, that the same applies to implicit 
discordance such as is indicated by a conjunction of 
co-ordination like ' but ' or by an adverb serving the same 
function. 

Our technique of course is open to criticism. It is one 
thing to feel the difference between a causal relation, 
a relation of juxtaposition, and a relation of discordance 
when one hears someone else talking (as when a child hears 
an adult talking), and quite another to be able to handle 
those relations oneself to the extent, of being capable 
of completing a sentence in which one of them is implied. 
We quite agree. But equally legitimate is the claim that 
all real understanding involves at least the beginnings of 
right use, just as elementary arithmetic is only understood 



46 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

from the day that it can be applied. Furthermore, 
between understanding a word and using it aright the 
difference is not of kind but of degree ; in actual fact the 
interval between them is only of a few months. 

Having disposed of this objection and making due 
allowance for the difference between language that is 
understood and language that is spoken, we may now 
ask to what factors is due this failure to understand 
discordance. For this purpose it will be necessary once 
more to distinguish between implicit and explicit dis- 
cordance. 

Explicit discordance, or in other words, discordance 
indicated by the conjunctions of subordination (quoique, 
bien que, malgre que, quand meme) would seem most 
probably not to be understood until about the age of 
11-12, and at any rate not before the age of 10. Why 
this date ? The reason would seem to lie in the logical 
nature of the relation of discordance. For this relation, 
unlike those of causality or any others indicated by the 
word ' because/ necessarily presupposes a knowledge of 
general propositions ; or at any rate it presupposes the 
awareness of propositions of a greater degree of generality 
than is the case in causal relations. Compare for instance, 
the two following propositions : " This piece of wood 
floats because it is light," and " This pebble has sunk to 
the bottom of the water although it is light/* For the 
first affirmation it is in no way necessary for the child to 
know the general law that ' all light bodies float/ The 
statement points to such a law but does not imply it. 
For two things have come to our knowledge through the 
experiments which we made in this connexion (see Chap. 
IV). i. The same child who has just said that a certain 
piece of wood floats because it is light, within a few minutes 
later says of another piece that it floats because it is big, 
that a big boat floats because it is heavy and is being rowed 
along and has strength, and so on. 2. On the other hand, 
this same child knows perfectly well that a little nail 
or a little pebble that immediately sink to the bottom 



IN THE CHILD 47 

are ' lighter ' than the piece of wood of which he said 
that it floated because it was light. In a word, if we take 
the proposition : " This piece of wood floats because it 
is light " from any one of these aspects, it does not necessi- 
tate the knowledge of a law ; it is merely one particular 
explanation amongst others given by the child. The 
view that children deal with ideas and propositions 
that are more general than those of the adult mind has 
been widely held. Ribot 1 and others, however, have 
shown that this is a delusion. The child simply applies 
as often as he can, through sheer economy of thought, an 
explanation which he has found in some particular case. 
But this does not prove that he is trying to find explana- 
tions or general laws. On the contrary, our experiments 
have shown us that a large number of different and even 
contradictory explanations can co-exist in one child's 
mind (see Chap. IV). Our treatment of ' because J and 
' then J has, moreover, prepared us for the fact that 
the faculties of generalization and deduction are still 
at an extremely primitive stage of development in the 



Now let us consider the proposition : " This pebble has 
sunk although it is light." Such a statement as this 
necessarily presupposes the knowledge of an exception 
and (since there are no exceptions without laws) the 
knowledge of some more or less general law such as 
precisely " All light bodies float/' or "Most light bodies 
float/' etc. True, we must not exaggerate the need for 
the conscious possession of such general propositions in 
order to make use of the term ' although ' (quoique). 
For example, the proposition, " I have not got wet, 
although it has been raining " does not call for a much 
greater power of generalization than the proposition : 
" I got wet because it was- raining." Nevertheless, it seems 
to us indisputable that the mental habits involved in 
the use of discordance require to an appreciably greater 

1 Ribot, L'faototion des idtes gdnfrales, Paris, 1915, 4th ed., 
p. 38, 



48 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

extent than do those indicated by the use of ' because ' 
that the subject should be able to make use of general 
propositions and of necessary deduction. 

We are now in a position to see why explicit discordance 
comes to be understood round about the age of 11-12. 
Our previous enquiries have shown, and the next chapter 
will show anew, that the age of 11-12 marks the moment 
when the child becomes capable of formal thought, i.e. 
of strict or necessary deduction. Now formal deduction 
is that which appeals to general propositions which are 
assumed for the purpose of regulating the course of an 
argument. It is therefore probably no coincidence that 
the capacity for discordance should make its appearance 
at the same moment as that for formal deduction. For 
both these phenomena are the result of an advance in 
the child's capacity for generalization. 

As to implicit discordance, the reasons will soon be 
forthcoming for dating its advent between the years of 
6 and 8. In the meantime we must examine what are 
the relations which unite the term ' although ' and the 
term ' but/ 

8. DISCORDANCE, AND THE EXPRESSION ' BUT/ We 
may regard it as established that for a long time the 
conjunctions expressing discordance are not understood 
and are even confused with the conjunctions of causality. 
It is now time for us to ask what meaning is assigned to 
these conjunctions when the subject begins to understand 
them. It is, as will easily be seen, the meaning of * but/ 
Here are some examples. 

Leo (age 8) and Kle (age 8 ; i) : "I ate another roll, 
even though [malgre que] I am still hungry " ( but or 
because ?). 

Mar (8 ; 10) : "I have some big friends, even though 
\malgri que] I have some little ones as well" (The word * as 
well ' is significant in connexion with the meaning of 
malgre que.) " I have some big friends, even though 
\_malgr6] they are not horrid." Tacfageg): ". . . although 
[quoique] they are not horrid." Roch (age 8 ; 4) : ". . . 
even though [malgrt que] they are very nice." Leo (age 8) : 



IN THE CHILD 49 

" I walked another three hours, although [quoique] I am 
not tired " (Kle, age 8 ; i). 

Finally, this example of a ten-year old child, Grand 
(age 10 ; 4) : " We are pupils, although [quoique] we aye 
not too old What does ' although ' mean ? It means 
that we are not too old Say another word instead of ' al- 
though.' Would ' because ' do : We are pupils because 
we are not too old ? No, because there are some pupils 
that are quite old Would ' even though ' \malgre que] 
do ? Yes What does it mean ? We are pupils but (!) 
we are not too old.' 3 

These few examples show very clearly that the con- 
junctions ' although,' etc., when they first come to be under- 
stood as. indicating discordance, are interpreted simply as 
meaning ' but/ Now we have seen that this deformation 
of meaning is not without analogy with the substitution 
of * and ' for ' because.' Indeed, the term ' but ' stands in 
the same relation to ' although ' as does the term * and * 
to ' because.' Just as the sentence " The glass was broken 
because it fell " can be changed into " The glass fell down 
and was broken/' so likewise we can change ' although/ 
" The glass was not broken, although it fell down " into 
' but/ " The glass fell down, but was not broken/' The 
question may therefore be asked why the child has this 
tendency to substitute ' but ' for although/ There is a 
psychological and a logical reason for this linguistic 
phenomenon. 

It should be noted in the first place that language 1 
itself tends this way, for quand meme is taken both in the 
sense of ' although ' (" Le verre ne s'est pas cass6 
quand meme il est tombe ") and in that of ' but ' (Le verre 
est tombe ; il ne s'est quand meme pas casse). It is 
clearly to this circumstance that we must attribute the 
fact that according to our statistics, quand meme was the 
best understood of the words denoting discordance. 

But this does not suffice to explain the tendency shown 
by our children to replace ' although ' by the word ' but/ 
In order to understand this we shall have to introduce 

1 The French language, See foot-note on p. 37 [Translator's note], 
D 



50 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

factors which are relevant to the psychology of thought 
itself. 

The comparison we have just drawn between ' but ' 
and ' and ' should put us on the right track. The term 
' but ' expresses only a ' feeling of discordance ' instead 
of making the actual discordance explicit, and similarly 
the term ' and ' only indicates a ' feeling of togetherness ' 
instead of making explicit the actual relation of causality 
or implication. Indeed the word ' but ' indicates a sort 
of juxtaposition between two discordant judgments, yet 
does not call for any knowledge of general propositions. 
Thus, when we say " This is hard, but not that " (see 
below, the sentence of Dan) instead of " This is hard, 
although that is not," the two statements may be 
identical from the point of view of logical analysis, but 
from the psychological point of view there is between 
them the whole difference that separates the implicit 
from the explicit. The first of the two sentences marks 
a simple surprise and a simple opposition. There is 
certainly a feeling of discordance, but it is not made 
sufficiently explicit to involve awareness of an exception 
to a general rule. The second sentence brings out far 
more clearly a feeling of exception : " This is hard, although 
that is not " really means " These two objects ought to 
be either both hard or both soft," or " According to the 
rule there is no reason why one should be hard and the 
other not." There is therefore between those two sentences 
the same difference as between ' and ' and ' because/ 
"It is granite and it is hard " is not so strong as "It is 
hard because it is granite." True, these are only fine 
shades of meaning, but fine shades or of the very essence 
of thought. . . . All we ask the reader to concede is that 
' although/ i.e. quoique, quanci meme (taken as a con- 
junction), lien que, etc., indicate discordance or the excep- 
tion to a general rule more explicitly than do * but ' or 
quand meme (taken adverbially). Let us now try to 
establish the fact that implicit discordance does not 
make its appearance before the age of 7-8 (actually 



IN THE CHILD 51 

from the age of 6), and to determine a reason for this 
date. 

It is obvious that since implicit discordance can be 
denoted by a simple 'but/ the question will be raised 
whether every ' but ' does not denote a discordance which 
could be expressed by * although/ Now the word ' but ' 
[mats] appears very early, almost as early as the word 
* and/ Is there any point then in making implicit dis- 
cordance begin at the age of 7-8, and should this relation 
not be allowed to have existed from the very beginnings 
of intellectual life in the child ? 

If the use of the word ' but ' be examined in the lan- 
guage of children between 3 and 7 it will be seen to be of 
a singularly primitive character. Here are a few of the 
senses of the word, taken at random and without any 
attempt to submit them to an exhaustive or systematic 
classification. 

In the first place, and especially with very small chil- 
dren, the term ' but ' very often denotes simply a sur- 
prise relatively to what the child was expecting or relatively 
to the momentary direction of his thoughts. 

Dan (age sj) : " But why is your' s broken [your pencil] ? " 
" But why are they [his friends] going up there [to the second 
floor] ? " " [Trying to hang up his overall]. But how 
do you hang this up ? " " But those ones [those boats] 
don't go well'' etc. 

In such cases as these and they are the most numerous 
there is no question of discordance. By turning round 
the ' but ' we should not get an ' although/ for the simple 
reason that there is no causal or logical relation there to 
be at fault. The word ' but ' here does not even indicate 
opposition between two objective characters ; there is 
only surprise or opposition relatively to what was expected. 

A slightly more advanced form is found when the 
term ' but ' marks an opposition but one that does not 
yet constitute an exception to causal or logical relations. 
Thus ' but ' here is strictly equivalent to ' and not/ 



52 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

Dan (age 3|) : " He does gymnastics But not Rhyth- 
mics." " It is not hard now But that is hard/' 

These two meanings are, moreover, so little differen- 
tiated from juxtaposition that the child occasionally uses 
the two words ' and ' and ' but ' together. 

Del (age 6) : " Why does it rain at Geneva but and not 
[et mais pas] at Nyon ? " 

A more precise use of ' but ' is that which occurs in 
objection, as when the word serves to introduce either an 
intellectual objection or one arising out of the action in 
which the subject is engaged. But in these new cases, 
as in the earlier ones, the word ' but ' still falls short of 
complete equivalence with an ' although ' or a quand 
meme : 

Non-intellectual objections : " Well then, put the 
spoon into another drawer But there's one there already" 
" [After having been told to sing] But I've never learnt. 
Mother never taught me to" 

Intellectual objections : " Why are there two threads 
there ? To make it hold properly But why are there two 
threads there ? " 

In short, the only cases in which the term ' but ' really 
denotes an implicit discordance are those in which the 
word occurs, not at the beginning, but in the middle of a 
sentence, and of a sentence containing a causal relation 
whether logical or psychological. Now such sentences 
were not to be found before the age of 6, and the two 
examples we have between 6 and 7 are anything but 
unequivocal. 

Lev (age 6J) : " [Suns] are round, but they have no eyes 
and mouth" " It is more than that, but that's right" 

In both these cases ' but ' can be replaced by ' although ' 
(That is right, although it comes to more than that), but 
the discordance in such examples is obviously still very 
implicit. Besides, we only found two at the age of 6 and 



IN THE CHILD 53 

none below this age. It is therefore better to date the 
appearance of discordance from the moment when quand 
meme first begins to be used (adverbially) and is understood. 
The word, as we saw, occurred with Lev at the age of 6 
(never with Pie) but is generally not understood until the 
age of 7. 

In our enquiries bearing upon causality, moreover, 
we often noticed the difficulty which children seem to 
experience in discovering even the most elementary 
discordances and the persistent tendency they have to 
put ' and ' or ' and then ' in place of c but/ 

For example Leo (age 7) is talking about the shadows 
we cast as we walk along : " Do we make them at night 
too ? We make them and then ( =but) we don't see them, 
because it is dark/' 

It is therefore only round about the age of 7 that 
discordance comes to be understood and properly handled, 
not in its explicit form as indicated by ' although/ 
but in its implicit form as indicated by quand meme taken 
adverbially or by certain uses of ' but/ as in the example 
we gave above, in which both words are united : " Every 
one has come in, but Mile L. will go out all the same 
[quand meme]." What factors can we look to in explana- 
tion of this age of 7 ? For the moment we are ignorant. 
A hypothesis nevertheless suggests itself. Discordance 
or at any rate explicit discordance arose, as we saw, 
from a feeling of exception to a general rule. But what 
are the mental operations by which rules are postulated, 
and above all by which exceptions are felt ? They are 
what logicians call logical addition and multiplication. 1 
Let us take the expression, "The wind is not alive, 
but it moves all the same [quand meme]." In order to 
express himself in this way, the child must have come to 
think that all living things move, but that all moving things 
are not necessarily alive. He must therefore conceive 
life as the result of logical multiplication or of the ' inter- 

1 For definition of these terms see Chap. IV, 2, 



54 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

ference ' of movement by other characteristics, such as 
the capacity for taking nourishment, etc. In other words, 
a thing, to be alive, must loth move and take nourishment, 
etc. Such must be the thought of the child. 

Now, as we have already shown and as we hope to do 
again (Chap. IV, 2), the child is incapable before the 
age of lo-n of handling logical multiplication with any 
method, in other words, he is unable to understand 
alternation, opposition, disjunction, etc., at any rate on 
the plane of verbal thought. (As, for example, in the 
following test : " If this animal has long ears, it is either 
a donkey or a mule. If it has a thick tail, it is either a mule 
or a horse. Now it has long ears and a thick tail. What 
is it ? ") This, therefore, is the reason why general proposi- 
tions are not used by children before this age (since such 
propositions are the result of logical additions and multi- 
plications), and also why explicit discordance does not 
appear before this date (since discordance is an exception 
to rules or, if our new terminology be preferred, a logical 
multiplication or interference of one rule by another). 
Most of the cases of inability to perform logical multiplica- 
tion which we shall give in Chapter IV in connexion with 
children's definitions are prior to this stage of development. 
It is between the ages of 7 and 8 that the child begins to 
avoid self-contradiction. From this moment, i.e. from 
the moment when the first logical multiplications make 
their appearance on a concrete and not on the verbal 
plane, implicit discordance is possible. This, at least, is 
the only idea we can form of that synchronism which it 
was our aim to establish. As to the psychological factors 
which explain the advent of logical multiplication, these 
will form the subject of a later enquiry. 

III. CONCLUSIONS 

The time has now come for us to draw a few conclusions 
from this somewhat lengthy analysis. We shall do no 
more, however, than set down certain landmarks which 



IN THE CHILD 55 

will serve as headings for our fourth chapter (How the 
Child Reasons). 

Let us suppose that future research is undertaken 
dealing with a far larger number of children's sentences, 
and involving a far more thorough examination both 
personal and collective than that to which we had to limit 
ourselves. Let us further suppose that these researches 
eventually demolish the age-limits which we have given, 
eventually show that difficulties experienced by children 
with regard to ' because ' are on the average more or less 
lasting than we had thought. We believe that in spite of 
such changes our qualitative analyses would remain of 
value on a large scale. We would still claim that the 
child's difficulty in the use of the empirical or logical 
' because/ in the use of ' therefore ' and ' then/ or in the 
use of the terms of discordance are bound up with logical 
difficulties which in their turn we would still claim to be 
traceable to social factors such as argument, collaboration 
between children, and so on. 

What further conclusions are to be drawn from this 
study of reasoning in the child ? In the first place we 
must emphasize the fact that the above enquiries do not 
bear directly upon reasoning nor, above all, on causality 
in the child. They bear simply upon his aptitude for 
inventing sentences, in a word, upon his aptitude for 
narrative and argument. Now these aptitudes should 
be neither exaggerated nor underestimated in their 
importance. The practice of narrative and argument 
does not lead to invention, but it compels a certain 
coherence of thought. A mind incapable of argument 
and guilty of the verbal confusions which we have been 
examining in children may be creative, but it is certainly 
not logical. From this point of view the grammatical 
study which we have been making leads to certain 
conclusions, and in particular, to the two that follow. 
Firstly, that the child, unconscious as he is of his own 
thought-process, can only reason about isolated or about 
more or less special cases. Secondly, and this is the most 



56 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

important that his judgments, being juxtaposed, are 
lacking in logical necessity. 

The study of logical justification showed that if the 
child is unable to give a logical reason for his judgment, 
even when this judgment is true in itself and correctly 
introduced in the context, this is because he is not conscious 
of the motives that have guided his choice. Things happen 
then more or less as follows. In the presence of certain 
objects of thought or of certain affirmations the child, 
in virtue of previous experiences, adopts a certain way of 
reacting and thinking which is always the same, and which 
might be called a schema of reasoning. Such schemas 
are the fjinctional equivalents of general propositions, 
but since the child is not conscious of these schemas 
before discussion and a desire for proof have laid them 
bare and at the same time changed their character, they 
cannot be said to constitute implicit general propositions. 
They simply constitute certain unconscious tendencies 
which live their own life but are submitted to no general 
systematization and consequently lead to no logical 
exactitude. To put it in another way, they form a logic 
of action but not yet a logic of thought. 

This absence of conscious realization explains why the 
child only reasons about particular cases. 1 Since the 
schema is the only general element in childish ratiocination, 
and since the schema remains unconscious, the child will 
become aware only of the discrete objects which occupy his 
mind. Thus the study of ' because ' in logical justification 
showed that even when the child tries to prove his state- 
ments, he appeals neither to laws nor to general rules, 
but to singular and specific reasons : " The little cat ate 
the big dog/' " The little cat is little and the big dog is 
big," " On the way there the road goes up," etc. Further- 
more, this was confirmed by an examination of the deduc- 

1 According to current logical terminology the opposition usually made 
is between general judgments and singular or individual judgments. 
The terms universal and particular are concerned only with the quantity 
of the attribute in relation to the subject, and with the extension of 
the subject. 



IN THE CHILD 57 

tions introduced by the word ' then/ The deduction 
moves from one individual case to another : " Then I 
shall be alone," " Then it is inside out/' etc. Finally, our 
study of discordance indirectly confirms the same law, 
If children never make use of explicit discordance and 
do not understand implicit discordance until after the 
age of 7-8 this is obviously because the notion of an excep- 
tion to a rule which is presupposed in the notion of dis- 
cordance between cause and effect is not a primitive 
notion, and is not one that is familiar to them. For 
there to be exceptions, there must obviously have been 
rules, and if the child fails to understand the fact that 
there are exceptions, it must be because he has never 
formulated any rules. 

The consequence of this fact that the child's formulated 
thought only takes place in connexion with particular or 
specific cases is that we cannot speak about deductive 
thought as such before a very advanced stage of develop- 
ment. For deduction presupposes general propositions, 
whether these serve to characterize the individual objects 
with which the reasoning process is concerned, or whether 
they constitute the aim which the process of deduction 
has set out to reach. Now the motor schemas of which we 
were speaking just now cannot do the work of general 
propositions, and what prevents them is the fact that 
they do not confront one another in the subject's con- 
sciousness and thus give rise to syntheses and oppositions 
which alone would favour the appearance of logical 
addition and multiplication. 

Provisionally, therefore, we have established three 
points : absence of conscious realization (prise de con- 
science), absence of general propositions, and absence of 
deduction. We shall discuss these later on as they deserve 
and with fresh methods which will be introduced in 
Chapter IV. In the meantime let us confine ourselves to 
the analysis of the phenomenon which explains them all 
' juxtaposition/ 

In studying the conjunctions of causality we saw that 



58 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

the child tended simply to juxtapose his statements 
instead of making their causal relation explicit. When 
the child is given sentences to complete which contain 
such relations, he shows signs of hesitation or even of con- 
fusion between the different possible relations causality, 
consequence, etc. Furthermore, our study of logical 
implication showed that the desire for justification and 
proof remained at a very rudimentary stage of develop- 
ment till about 7-8, and that again in this connexion the 
childish tendency was to juxtapose his statements instead 
of making them imply one another in such a way as to 
make deduction possible. Finally, our examination 
of the conjunctions of discordance revealed a third variety 
of juxtaposition. The child, unable to handle explicit 
discordance such as is expressed by e although ; and other 
conjunctions of subordination, replaces these conjunctions 
by the word ' but ' which has precisely the effect of juxta- 
posing the discordant propositions instead of indicating 
their exact relations. 

The child's style and even his thought are therefore 
comparable to his drawing. A number of details are 
correctly indicated : The drawing of a bicycle by a 
child of 6, for example, will show, in addition to the 
frame and the two wheels, the pedals, a chain, a cog-wheel, 
a gear. But these details are juxtaposed without any 
order; the chain is drawn alongside of the cog-wheel 
instead of being correctly inserted, and the pedals are 
suspended in mid-air instead of being fixed. Thus every- 
thing happens as though the child really felt the relations 
in question, knew that the chain, the pedals and the cog- 
wheel were necessary to set the machine in motion and 
that these different pieces " went together/' But this 
is as far as his consciousness of the relations goes ; it does 
not extend to a precise knowledge of the details of inser- 
tion and contact. The drawing is therefore comparable 
to the thought, and the thought to the drawing. Both 
juxtapose instead of synthesizing. 

We have now reached the point when we can ask what 



IN THE CHILD 59 

relation this phenomenon of juxtaposition bears to that 
of syncretism (cf. L.T., Chap. IV), which seems to be its 
exact opposite. In visual perception, juxtaposition is 
the absence of relations between details ; syncretism is a 
vision of the whole which creates a vague but all-inclusive 
schema, supplanting the details. In verbal intelligence 
juxtaposition is the absence of relations between the 
various terms of a sentence ; syncretism is the all-round 
understanding which makes the sentence into a whole. 
In logic juxtaposition leads to an absence of implication and 
reciprocal justification between the successive judgments ; 
syncretism creates a tendency to bind everything together 
and to justify by means of the most ingenious or the most 
facetious devices. In short, in every sphere, juxtaposition 
and syncretism are in antithesis, syncretism being the 
predominance of the whole over the details, juxtaposition 
that of the details over the whole. How are we to account 
for this paradox ? 

In reality these two features are complementary. As 
soon as perception, even in the adult, fails to analyse an 
object, whether on account of its novelty or its com- 
plexity, we see the two phenomena reappear. On the one 
hand, because of its insufficient discrimination of detail, 
perception creates a vague and indistinct general schema, 
and this constitutes syncretism. On the other hand, 
through having failed again to discern a sufficient amount 
of detail, perception cannot make the insertions and 
relations sufficiently precise, and this constitutes juxta- 
position. The predominance ojy:he,whple 4 pyer the parts 
or that of^tKT^aHr'o^er^tiCe whole is in both cases the 
result of the same lack of synthesis, synthesis being in 
a manner the principle of equilibrium between the for- 
matory tendency of the schemas and the analytical 
tendency. 

Or rather for the mind is not static, but in a state of 
perpetual movement syncretism and juxtaposition con- 
stitute two phases alternating over indefinite periods 
in the mind of the child, if it be granted (as everything 



60 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

seems to prove) that the latter is less synthetic than ours. 
Sometimes the child builds up new general schemas, tries 
to connect everything, and tries to incorporate the new 
and unexpected elements into the old accustomed frame- 
work. At other times the discovery or the sudden 
emergence of unclassifiable and incomprehensible pheno- 
mena will burst these frameworks and dissolve the schemas 
until new systems are formed, only to be destroyed in 
their turn. 

The position is particularly clear with regard to causal 
explanation and logical justification. We examined 
(L.T., Chap. V) the child's tendency to explain every- 
thing, and consequently to have recourse to pre-causal 
reasons born of a kind of confusion between the physical or 
causal order of things and the psychical or logical order. It 
is therefore perfectly natural that such a tendency should 
be accompanied by a certain clumsiness in the handling of 
genuinely causal relations, as our examination of causal 
conjunctions has just shown to be the case. It is the same 
lack of adaptation to the actual way in which phenomena 
fit into one another that gives rise both to such premature 
syntheses and to such defective analyses. It is very 
natural too, and in no way surprising that this tendency to 
immediate justification of phenomena and events should 
be pre-logical as well as pre-causal (since it is born of a 
failure to discriminate between logical and causal sequence) , 
and that it should consequently be accompanied by a 
really defective and awkward use of logical implication. 
For to be unadapted to the way in which phenomena 
effectively fit into one another goes hand in hand with 
being unadapted to the relations between judgments. 
These are only two special cases of the general law accord- 
ing to which defective synthesis involves both syncretism 
and juxtaposition. 

Moreover, this kinship between syncretism and juxta- 
position points clearly to the interpretation which it 
befits us to give to the latter phenomenon. For juxtaposi- 
tion is after all the sign of the complete absence of 



IN THE CHILD 61 

necessity from the thought of the child. The child knows 
nothing either of physical necessity (the fact that nature 
obeys laws) nor of logical necessity (the fact that such a 
proposition necessarily involves such another). For him 
everything is connected with everything else, which comes 
to exactly the same thing as that nothing is connected with 
anything else. 1 

1 The reader must bear in mind that the hypotheses and statistical 
results drawn from the material in this chapter are valid only for the 
use of the French words, payee que, puisque, done, alovs, quoique, etc. 
Analogous experiments would have to be carried out on English 
children before any objective results could be obtained as to the use 
of 'because/ * since/ ' therefore/ * then/ ' although/ etc. The same 
consideration holds for similar material in subsequent chapters. 
[Translator's note.] 



CHAPTER II 

FORMAL THOUGHT AND RELATIONAL 
JUDGMENTS 1 

THE LOGICAL SIGNIFICANCE OF THE BINET- 
SIMON TEST BY ABSURD PHRASES.* 

IT is not our intention to devote this chapter to all the 
questions connected with formal thought and relational 
judgments in the child. Our aim is solely to indicate 
the bond which unites these two problems to that of 
childish ego-centrism and to the correlated questions 
which we have studied in connexion with the ego-centrism 
thought in general. The nature of this bond can be 
most clearly brought out by the study of certain mental 
tests which bring in the incriminated factors, and it is 
for this purpose that we have chosen one of the Binet- 
Simon tests of intelligence. 

The five absurd phrases of the well-known Binet-Simon 
test call for fairly subtle powers of reasoning on the part of 
the child, powers whose analysis it would be interesting 
to undertake. The question arises why some of these 
apparently glaring absurdities are not discovered by the 
child until he reaches the age of 10 (or even n, as some have 
claimed). There is as yet so little material on child logic 
that it is well to take what one can find ; while from 
another point of view, tests of all-round intelligence or of 
age level like those of Binet and Simon will gain in interest 
when it is known, in connexion with each test, which of 

1 With th.6 collaboration of Mile Emmy Cartalis. 

2 Binet, A., et Simon, Th., La mesure du developpement de V intelligence 
chez les jeunes enfants, Paris, 1917, pp. 56-58. 



IN THE CHILD 63 

the factors that go to make up intelligence is being 
measured. At first sight such an analysis seems very 
remote from the questions examined in our first chapter. 
But in reality this is not so. In the first place, the use of 
the logical * because ' and of the conjunctions of dis- 
cordance seems, as we saw, to presuppose the capacity 
for observing rules in reasoning and consequently the 
power to make use of formal deduction. It will be our 
business to discover what are the conditions to which 
this formal thought is subjected. In the second place, 
having studied the nature of syncretism and juxtaposition 
both of them consequences of ego-centrism on the 
structure of thought it will be necessary to examine 
the difficulty which children experience in handling 
relational judgments properly so called, a difficulty which 
is connected with the phenomenon of juxtaposition and 
is likewise the outcome of childish ego-centrism. Seen 
from this double point of view, an analysis of the Binet- 
Simon test will constitute a natural sequel to our enquiry. 
To this end, we set out to interpret the answers of 
some 40 schoolboys of Geneva between the ages of 9 and 
u-12 in the following manner. The child is first of all 
examined by means of the Binet-Simon 1 technique, then, 
having obtained an answer, we make the child repeat the 
absurd phrase by heart. The phrase is generally deformed 
by the child in a significant manner. We then read him 
the exact text so as to eliminate all factors due to inatten- 
tion or forgetfulness. Finally, we ask the child to arrange 
the sentence himself in such a way that " there should no 

1 Our readers will remember the five absurd sentences of the Binet- 
Simon test : 

i A poor cyclist had his head smashed and died on the spot ; he 
was taken to hospital and it is feared that he will not recover. 

2 I have three brothers : Paul, Ernest, and myself. 

3 The body of a poor young girl was found yesterday, cut into 
1 8 pieces. It is thought that she must have killed herself. 

4 There was a railway accident yesterday, but it was not very 
serious. The number of deaths was only 48. 

5 Someone said : If ever I kill myself from despair I won't choose a 
Friday, because Friday is a bad day and would bring me ill luck. 



64 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

longer be anything silly in it." It is also advisable, in the 
question of the three brothers for example, to take illus- 
trations from the child's own life. In this way one finally 
comes to understand more or less what he is saying. 

i. FORMAL REASONING. According to our results 
the order of difficulty of the tests was as follows : the 
questions of the three brothers and of Friday were the most 
difficult, the questions of accident by far the easiest. 1 
Out of 44 children between 9 and 12 (and 3 of 14), 33 solved 
the question of the young girl cut into 18 pieces, and 
35 that of the railway accident, as against only 13 who 
understood that of the 3 brothers and 10 that of Friday. 
As to the test of the cyclist who died on the spot, 24 
children passed it, but it contains two purely verbal 
difficulties which have nothing to do with logic, the word 
r&chapper (Engl. recover) is often taken to mean s'echapper 
(to escape), and mort sur le coup (dead on the spot) is 
interpreted as mort sur le cou (dead on the neck). This 
being so, the test is not very conclusive. 

Why is it that the accident tests are easier than the 
others ? It is because they appeal directly to the child's 
sense of reality without any presuppositions about the 
data. Whereas to avoid killing oneself on Friday is 
absurd only to anyone who believes in the unlucky charac- 
ter of Friday. In order to discover this absurdity the 
child has therefore to place himself at the point of view 
of the person who lays down the premises. The reason- 
ing takes place relatively to a given point of view, which 
is a psychological operation of far greater difficulty. 
Similarly, in the question about the brothers, the child is 
obliged to place himself at a point of view whidh is not 
his : the family he is told about consists of three brothers, 
and he is expected to place himself at the point of view of 
one of them so as to count the latter's brothers. Here 
again, there is a relativity of view-point which involves 

1 The result tallies with what has been generally found by writers who 
have verified the Binet-Simon tests. 



IN THE CHILD 65 

a very delicate mental operation. On the other hand, to 
judge that a woman cut into 18 pieces has not killed 
herself or that a dead cyclist cannot be resuscitated is 
a direct judgment of observation. It does not presuppose 
any preliminary change of point of view, but simply a 
certain sense of reality or, as M. Claparede has called it, 
a sens des contingences. Finally, to describe as ' serious ' 
an accident in which there are 48 deaths might seem to 
involve a formal kind of reasoning if one started from a 
given definition of the word ' serious.' But this question 
does not occur to the child ; here again his judgment is 
immediate and absolute, very different therefore from 
that involved by the tests of Friday and the three brothers. 

In conclusion, the last two tests are difficult because they 
necessitate reasoning of a relative and formal kind, the 
others are easy because they involve only immediate 
judgments made from one's own point of view. 

Let us try, quite shortly, to justify these statements 
with regard to the Friday test. The wrong answers given 
to this test give us the clue to the child's difficulty. Most 
of them show an inability to accept the premisses as 
such and to reason from these premisses in a purely deduc- 
tive manner. 

" People can kill themselves every day, says Bai (age 9 ; 6), 
they don't need to kill themselves on a Friday." " Friday 
is not unlucky," says Van (age 9 ; 10). "He doesn't 
know if it will bring him ill luck " (Berg, n ; 2). " Perhaps 
Friday will bring him good luck " (Am, 10 ; 7), etc. 

The children all refuse to admit the premisses and do 
not see that that is not the point. What is required is 
to accept the premisses, then to reason correctly, i.e. to 
avoid the contradictions of the test. 

But the subjects do not see the contradiction because 
they do not attempt to reason from the point of view of 
the person who is speaking. They do not get out of their 
owp. point of view, and consequently stick at the premisses, 
which they refuse to admit even in the capacity of data, 
E 



66 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

Campa (10 ; 3) and Fed (9 ; 6) are in exactly the same 
predicament, but they try to justify the premisses : 
" It is a day when yo^l must never eat meat." There is 
therefore nothing absurd to them in the test, but again 
this is because they do not reason from the data but 
judge the latter from their own point of view. 

But from the moment that the child admits the premisses 
as given, without justifying or invalidating them, he is 
ready to resolve the test correctly. Some of them are of 
opinion that " he would do better to kill himself on Friday, 
since it is an unlucky day" and then the correct answer 
comes : " Since he would be dead it couldn't bring him ill 
luck " (Blei, 10 ; 10). 

Thus the difficulty of reasoning formally (i.e. of admit- 
ting a datum as such and deducing what follows from it) 
is the real difficulty of the test. That is why this test is, 
in our opinion, better suited to the age of n or even 12 
than to that of 10. Indeed, there was an interval of at 
least a year between the success of this test and that of 
the accident tests. 

We are now in a position to understand what formal 
reasoning really consists in, and how its structure may be 
influenced by social factors such as ego-centrism and the 
socialization of thought. 

The first deductive operation of which the mind is 
capable consists either in foreseeing what will happen 
when such and such conditions are given, or in reconstruct- 
ing what has happened when such and such results are 
given. This is a step forward in intellectual growth which 
the child is able to take very early. In the spontaneous 
questions of children before the age of 7-8 (L.T., Chap. V, 
9) we found a large number of ' ifs ' which point to this 
primitive form of deduction. " If I put a dragon and 
a bear, which would win ? " But before the age of 7-8 
we have only a kind of pseudo-deduction in the course of 
which the child deems it possible to foresee everything, 
because he cannot conform to those habits of control and 
verification which set a limit to the scope of hypotheses. 



IN THE CHILD 67 

After the age of 7-8, on the contrary, the child becomes 
more exacting in the matter of control and therefore 
knows better how to distinguish hypothesis from reality. 
To this stage correspond the development of the logical 
* because ' and the beginnings of correct deductive reason- 
ing. But all reasoning at this stage is still limited by one 
essential qualification : deduction bears only upon the 
beliefs which the child has adopted himself, in other words, 
it deals only with his personal conception of reality. The 
child will be able to say : " Half 9 is not 4, because 4 and 
4 make 8," or [when he has failed to find an object in 
one box and is pointing to the next one] " Then it must be 
in that box, anyhow ! " etc., because in these cases deduction 
deals with propositions which he admits personally, or 
rejects personally. But if we say to a child : " Let us 
admit, for example, that dogs have six heads. How many 
heads will there be in a yard where there are 15 dogs ? " 
the child will refuse to give an answer, because he will 
not ' assume ' the hypothesis. - We, on the contrary, even 
though we admit that the premisses are absurd, will be 
perfectly able to reason from them and conclude that 
there will be 90 heads in that yard. This is because we 
distinguish between real or empirical necessity (dogs 
cannot have six heads) and formal or logical necessity 
(if dogs had six heads there would necessarily be 90 heads, 
etc.) Even without using absurd premisses, the experiment 
can be made, simply with arbitrary premisses. We 
endeavoured to do in this as follows : l 

Let us take the test which we owe to Burt : " If I 
have more than one franc, I shall go by taxi or by train. 
If it rains, I shall go by train or by motor. Now it is raining 
and I have half a louis (10 francs). How do you think I 
shall go ? " The test cannot be said to be absurd, it 
is simply arbitrary. The gentleman in question had his 
own reasons for not taking a taxi if it rained, etc. It is 

1 See J. Piaget, " Essai sur la multiplication logique et les debuts 
de la pense formelle chez 1'enfant/' Joum. Psych., vol. 19, pp. 
245 sq. 



68 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

just as arbitrary to say to children, as is constantly done 
in problems of arithmetic : "It takes two hours to fill a 
cistern with a tap giving three litres a minute/' etc. The 
whole point is to know whether the child will be able to 
adopt or ' assume ' these arbitrary premisses and reason 
from them as though he believed them. 

Experiment showed that in Paris this test, together with 
others requiring the same aptitudes, did not succeed 
till the age of u. The reason was that as in the case of 
the Friday test the children below this age refused to 
assume the data without questioning them, and want 
either to justify or to supplement them. Between the 
ages of 7 and 10 we had answers like : he will go in the 
train " because it is quicker/' in the bus " because it is 
nicer in the bus," in a taxi " because it isn't dear, 10 francs 
is enough" etc. 

Of course this test is complicated by two alternatives, 
and necessitates very difficult logical operations. It 
was therefore expedient to check its results by others. 
The Friday test was a useful index in this connexion 
since it too did not succeed until the age of n, although 
it contained no special difficulty except that belonging to 
all formal reasoning. 

Moreover, we are here in presence of a fact which anyone 
can observe for himself by questioning a child. Up to a 
certain age it is almost impossible to make a child assume 
a suggested hypothesis unless one forces him to believe 
it and thus changes it into an affirmation. In the experi- 
ments on air which we shall publish shortly we find 
children from 8 to 10 who know that there is air every- 
where, particularly in this room. We say to them : 
" If there were no air would this [an object suspended by 
a string which we swing round rapidly] make a draught ? 
Yes. Why ? Because there is always air in the room. 
But in a room where all the air had been taken away would 
it make any? Yes, it would. Why? Because there 
would be some air left" etc. Or with younger children in 
an enquiry into animism : "If you could touch the sun, 



IN THE CHILD 69 

would he feel it ? You can't touch him. Yes, but if 
you could manage to, would he feel it ? He is too high up. 
Yes, but if. . . .," etc. 

This shows us what formal deduction really is ; it 
consists in drawing conclusions, not from a fact given in 
immediate observation, nor from a judgment which one 
holds to be true without any qualifications (and thus 
incorporates into reality such as one conceives it), but 
in a judgment which one simply assumes, i.e. which one 
admits without believing it, just to see what it will lead to. 
This is the form of deduction which we have placed round 
about the age of 11-12 as opposed to the simpler forms of 
inference which appear first. 

These tests of ours will perhaps give the impression 
that formal deduction is a very special form of thought 
and of very little use to children. But this is far from being; 
the case. In the first place all mathematical reasoning 
is formal or, as the logicians put it, hypothetico-deductive., 
Whenever we say to a child : " Let this be a triangle/' 
or " A piece of cloth costs 12 francs," we are forcing him 
to reason in conformity with premisses that are simply 
given, which means disregarding reality and even suppress- 
ing any memories or real observations which might block 
the way to the process of reasoning. Reasoning of this 
kind is done from pure hypotheses. Even if the subject- 
matter be of a concrete nature and the problems given 
to the child contain measurements and actual observations, 
the sort of reasoning required is none the less formal 
in the sense that the child will have to remember a number 
of rules and definitions which are independent of his own 
observation. Either a mathematical problem is presented 
to a child as a purely empirical problem, in which case 
he will be kept in ignorance of the deductive power of even 
elementary arithmetic ; or he will be compelled to reason 
strictly, but then this process, in so far as it appeals to 
fixed rules and to previously admitted propositions, 
will be a process of formal reasoning. 

Nay, more ; all deduction, even when it deals with 



70 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

reality given in direct observation, is formal to the extent 
that it claims to be strict. For deduction that is concerned 
with objects such as they appear to us in direct observa- 
tion can obviously not be strict, but only probable, or 
based on analogy. From the fact that water boils at 
different temperatures according to pressure, nothing 
precise can be deduced. In order to deduce strictly one 
must i bring about certain ideal conditions such as could 
not be realized in immediate experience, and in this way 
reach the knowledge of laws which will perhaps never be 
verified but will remain mere constructions of the mind ; 
2 one must deal with ideal objects, i.e. objects defined 
clearly and in such a manner as to prevent their being 
confused with the variable objects presented in observa- 
tion. (The chemical definition of water, H 2 or H 2 2 , 
stands for a body that is never found pure in nature). 
So that the form of deduction which is a necessary con- 
dition for arriving at general laws or mathematical rela- 
tions is such that the stricter it is, the more formal it 
becomes ; that is to say it will have to presuppose ideal 
definitions and hypotheses which cannot be directly 
verified. 

Now theoretical as these conditions may appear, they 
are none the less indispensable to the psychology of the 
child's mind. When boys of 9-10 years old spontaneously 
give weight as an explanation of why bodies float, one 
often feels that they have some intuition of density. 
They will say, for instance, that given equal volumes 
(i.e. when they are shown two equal volumes, one of wood, 
the other of water) wood is lighter than water. Before 
the age of 9, on the contrary, children who have just 
declared that wood is light, think that it is heavier than 
water. What is this very marked progress shown at the 
age of 9 but an attempt implicit as yet to replace 
immediate reality (absolute weight without any reference 
to volume) by a ratio (weight/volume), i.e. to replace 
the real object by a slightly more ideal object. By 
following this mental orientation the child will inevitably 



IN THE CHILD 71 

come to apply formal deduction to nature herself, and he 
will do so to the extent that he substitutes ratios, laws 
and fixed (i.e. ideal) definitions for simple empirical 
observation. 

We have expatiated at some length upon this subject 
in order to show that formal deduction, i.e. reasoning 
from premisses that are merely assumed and not supplied 
by immediate belief is of fundamental importance, not 
only in mathematics, but in every kind of reflection about 
nature. Let us now return to the origins of formal 
thinking. The above analysis has shown that two factors 
were particularly necessary for the right functioning of 
any formal reasoning : i a sort of detachment from 
one's own point of view or from the point of view of the 
moment, enabling one to place oneself at that of others 
and to reason first from premisses admitted by them, then 
more generally from every kind of purely hypothetical 
proposition ; 2 owing to the mere fact of having placed 
oneself inside the beliefs of others, or more generally 
inside a hypothesis, one must, in order to reason formally, 
be able to remain on the plane of mere assumption without 
surreptitiously returning to one's private point of view 
or to that of the reality of the moment. To be fonnal, 
deduction must detach itself from reality and take up 
its stand upon the plane of the purely possible, which is 
by definition the domain of hypothesis* In a word, 
fonnal thought presupposes two factors, one social (the 
possibility of placing oneself at every point of view 
and of abandoning one's own), the other, which is connected 
with the psychology of belief (the possibility of assuming 
alongside of empirical reality a purely possible world 
which shall be the province of logical deduction). 

What is the relation of these two factors to one another ? 
Does the logical factor, i.e. the construction of a hypo- 
thetico-deductive world give birth to the social factor, 
i.e. to the possibility of entering into the point of view 
of others, or is the reverse the case ? What we have seen 
of the part played by social factors in the development 



72 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

of the child's mind can leave us in doubt upon the matter. 
It is only from the moment that a child can detach himself 
from his personal beliefs and enter into any foreign point 
of view that he really will know what is meant by a hypo- 
thesis. Before this, of course, he will make use of the 
word ' if/ but he will not have given up his realistic habits 
of thought, he will not have been doing more than imagin- 
ing a world different from the real world, but in which he 
nevertheless believes to a certain extent. It is only from 
the day that the child has said : " I understand. Let us 
admit your point of view. Then if it were true . . . this 
is what would happen . . . because . . .," that a genuine 
hypothesis or a genuine assumption (i.e. one which is not 
believed in at all, but nevertheless analysed for its own 
sake) has really dawned in his mind. Here again it is 
social intercourse, but of a far more delicate order than 
that which we have spoken of previously, that modifies 
the structure of thought. In this connexion the Friday 
tests or others analogous to it are of the greatest interest. 
They show at what age the child is capable of making 
the simplest assumptions, those which independently of 
any mathematics or any reflection upon nature betray a 
capacity for reasoning from premisses which one does 
not believe in before verification. 

Now on the strength of the Friday test and certain 
others which were studied on a previous occasion the age 
to which we have assigned the possibility of formal reason- 
ing is 11-12. Why this date ? It is always dangerous to 
give reasons for the synchronisms shown in mental 
development, but if formal thought is really dependent 
upon social factors, then it is not impossible that this age 
should be related to the second critical phase of social life 
in the child. Every one knows that at the age of 11-12 
children have a marked impulse to form themselves into 
groups, and that the respect paid to the rules and regula- 
tions of their play constitutes an important feature of this 
social life. It is therefore at this age that arguments 
between boys will become not only more closely knit than 



IN THE CHILD 73 

before, but more definitely directed by the desire for 
agreement and co-ordination. 

Here is a typical example of the social behaviotir of 
children of n. Eight boys between 10-11 are preparing 
for a snow-fight in a Geneva street where we are observing 
them. They begin, oddly enough, by electing a captain. 
" Who votes for T ?" says the ringleader (three boys 
raise their hands). " Who votes for S?" (four boys raise 
their hands, amongst them one who had already voted 
for T). " You can't vote for both, because you can never 
vote for two people ! " [Note the application of an assumed 
rule.] Then the little band chooses a name. " Let's say 
that we are the . . . Company [the name escapes us] of the 
rue de la Dole." The two camps then take up their 
positions at equal distances from the umpire, who is the 
ringleader previously mentioned. One of the boys moves 
too far forward. The leader says : " Then we'll say [if 
anyone moves too far forward], he is in Coventry!" 
[Note the assumed rule.] 

This example shows very clearly the type of argument 
current at this age (and unknown in this explicit form at 
any earlier age) : i Assumption of new rules as the need 
for them arises ; and 2 application of these rules by 
means of formal deduction. Small wonder if such social 
habits develop reciprocal understanding and lead to new 
habits of thought. Indeed, it is to this very conclusion 
that M. Cousinet has been quite naturally led by experi- 
ments he has been carrying out on collective work in 
school life. 1 

1 M. Cousinet, it will be remembered, tried to introduce into primary 
education the spontaneous life which children exhibit in their play. 
According to him, games are at first imitation and auto-illusion (the 
thief and the policeman are really acted) and later on simply become 
well-organized competitions (the game of the thief and the policeman 
becomes a game of pursuit with increasingly complicated rules). Now 
this socialization of play, this interest in rules reaches its height at 
about the age of 1112 ; and ffr'g is the age when collective school work 
with spontaneous organization of the task in hand proves to be the most 
profitable. Cf. a work which M. Cousinet will shortly publish on the 
child's social life. 



74 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

There would seem then to be two critical periods in the 
social and intellectual life of the child : the age of 7-8 
accompanied by the decline of ego-centrism, the earliest 
motivated (or 'genuine/ see L.T., Chap. II) arguments; 
and the first appearance of the desire for verification or 
for logical justification ; and the age of 11-12 which is 
the age of societies governed by rules, and that in which 
formal thought first comes into being. 

2. THE THREE BROTHERS TEST. The three brothers 
test requires that the child should find a contradiction 
between the existence of three brothers in one family 
(Paul, Ernest, and myself) * and the proposed judgment, 
" I have three brothers (Paul, Ernest, and myself)/' 
In order to find this contradiction, the child must be 
able to distinguish between the point of view of the total 
number of the brothers and the point of view of the 
relation between these brothers. The first we shall call 
the point of view of membership, i.e. of the relation between 
an individual and the whole group of brothers of which 
ha forms a part ; the second, i.e. that which stresses the 
connexions between individual members of the same whole 
we shall call the point of view of relation. The first point 
of view is generally marked by the verb to be and the 
predicative judgment (we are three brothers, I am a 
brother), the second by the verb to have (I have three 
brothers), by the possessive adjective (my brothers), or 
by the preposition of (I am the brother of Paul). 2 It soon 
became evident that these points of view remain undiffer- 
entiated in the possessive expressions as they are used in 
children's language (I have, my, of, etc.), which expressions 
can easily be misinterpreted as having the same meaning 
as when they are used in adult talk. 

This lack of differentiation will be the object of our study. 
We shall try to prove that the different types of childish 
reasoning called forth by the three brothers test can all be 

1 Three sisters if the experimenter is a woman (Pauline, Jeanne, and me) . 

2 " Myself " seemed, in the context, less clumsy than " me " as a 
translation of moi. Cf. footnote on p. 61 [Tr.]. 



IN THE CHILD 75 

explained by an inability to distinguish the point of view 
of relation (the relation of brother to brother) from the 
point of view of membership. Let us begin by simply 
describing the phenomenon and confining ourselves to 
logical analysis. The psychological explanation will be 
attempted later on. 

The different forms of reasoning which we met with can 
be reduced to five types. These do not appear in any 
regular order, and the same child may alternate between 
one and the other to an indefinite extent. 

First type. This type of child does not reckon myself 
as a brother ; not because he has understood the test, 
but because he forgets or does not know that myself 
I am a brother for my own brothers. Thus the child 
seems to be placing 1 himself at the point of view of relation 
(I have two brothers), but he argues from this proposition 
to the existence of two brothers altogether in the family : 

1 have two brothers [therefore] we are two brothers. 

Examples. (Di, age 9 ; 4) : " She has two sisters, she 
has, she's not a sister." Does this mean that the child has 
understood the test ? " Why is she not a sister ? 
Because she is a little older than the others. How many 
sisters are there in the family ? Two." This piece of 
reasoning seems simply to be suggested by the test and 
the experimenter. We made a point of verifying this. 
Two months later Di had forgotten the present test 
(having undergone several others on the day that he was 
questioned about the three brothers), and he gave us, 
concerning his own brother, exactly analogous answers, 
which the reader will find presently along with other 
examples of spontaneous reasoning on the part of children. 

Matt (age 9 ; i) also thinks that there are only 2 sisters 
in the family. Blei (age 10 ; 10) asserts : " There are 

2 sisters, Pauline and Jeanne," and again : " You say 
you have 3 sisters, but you are [sic] only 2 sisters. You 
don't count." And Fed (age 9 ; 6) : " You, you're not a 
brother." All these subjects reckon like Matt that there 
are 2 brothers in aU in the family. 

According to ordinary evaluations these answers would 
be considered correct. Binet and Simon do not discuss 



76 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

this point, but evaluations published by Mile Descceudres * 
yield 22 + as against 2 to the answer : " You are not a 
sister." This answer strikes us as essentially ambiguous. 
If the child means : " You are not your sister/' then of 
course it is right. But very often, as in the case of the 
subjects quoted above, the child means : " You are not 
a sister either for yourself or for the others. You have two 
sisters, but each one of them has one sister only, etc." 
The family, as Di, Matt, and the others explain, consists 
of two sisters and " myself/' These judgments may seem 
rather improbable, but we shall show later on that they 
are commonly met with when children are questioned 
about brothers of their own, without ever having under- 
gone the Binet test. The child has simply not yet noticed 
that the word ' brother ' denotes a reciprocal relation : 
if I have a brother, I am myself a brother. In other words, 
the child uses the word ' brother ' like the word ' father ' : 
" I have a father, but I am not a father myself/' 

In conclusion : 

i Children belonging to this first type seem to place 
themselves at the point of view of the relation of brother 
to brother : " I have two brothers." But this relation 
has not yet become symmetrical and does not lead to 
the conclusion " I am therefore their brother," nor to the 
more important one of " We are therefore three brothers " ; 
it is therefore not a relation in the sense in which we have 
chosen to use the term. 

2 The use of the possessive expressions therefore raises 
an interesting problem. How can the child use such 
forms of speech as " I have two brothers " or "my . . .," 
without realizing that the possession is reciprocal ? 

3 This stage does not admit of the possibility of 
passing from the judgment of membership to a judgment of 
relation, since the two points of view are as yet undiffer- 
entiated. " I have two brothers " and " We are two 
brothers " are verbal forms between which the child has 
not yet learned to distinguish. 

1 Arch, de Psych., vol. 16 (1917), p. 333. 



IN THE CHILD 77 

Second type. The child belonging to this type realizes 
that if I have two brothers, I must be a brother for them, 
and that therefore there are three brothers in the family. 
But the Binet-Simon test has ceased to be absurd. The 
child is quite willing to look for what is ' silly ' in it, since 
he has been asked to do so, but he sets about the task 
without conviction : 

Pern (age 9 ; 6),- Tiec (age 10), etc., declare in spite of 
several readings that there is nothing ' silly.' Bar (9 ; 4) 
explains why this is so. He repeats the test correctly 
and can see nothing absurd in it. He announces in answer 
to our question that there are three sisters in the family : 
" There is Jeanne and Pauline, that makes 2, so there is one 
missing" Thus he has taken the expression " I have 
3 sisters " to mean " We are 3 sisters/' since he feels 
obliged when he enumerates " my " 2 sisters to make it 
clear that one is missing. This missing sister is not, 
as some of the other subjects suppose, a fourth sister, 
it is ' myself/ 

Bonv (age 9), likewise answers after the second reading : 
"What is there silly? Because you could have said; 
Paul, Ernest, and myself are my 3 brothers . ' ' Thus the Binet- 
Simon test contains nothing absurd for him. 

CONCLUSION : i In complete contrast to the last type, 
the child remembers that ' myself ' is also a brother. But 
he fails to distinguish verbally between the point of view 
of membership and that of relation, so he says : " We are 
three brothers, and I have two brothers." He confuses 
the two for lack of the necessary means of expression 
in a formula copied from that of Binet and Simon. 

2 This is not merely the outcome of suggestion due 
to the test. Later on it will be seen that the child often 
uses the same expressions spontaneously. 

Is the confusion then purely verbal? But verbal 
confusion, when it is concerned, as in this case, with a 
relation and not simply with an unknown word is always 
the sign of logical confusion. In this particular case, the 
child juxtaposes in one expression two attitudes which 
it has never interested him to separate. 



78 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

3 The point of view of membership and that of relation 
are not yet distinct, i.e. the expression " I have " does not 
always indicate a relation between individual members 
of one whole, but a relation between the individual and 
the whole to which he belongs : " I have three brothers, 
to whom I belong." In the last type which we examined 
the individual did not form a part of this whole group of 
brothers of which he says " I have . . ." ; in the present 
type he does form such a part. This is the only difference, 
but there is as yet no genuine judgment of relation. 

4 Types I and II often succeed one another in inverse 
order to that which we have described. Occasionally too, 
type II does not constitute a stage, but the child passes 
straight from I to III. The matter must be settled in 
each particular case. 

Third type. In this third stage the child tries to dis- 
tinguish between the point of view of membership and 
that of relation, and in order to do so he tries to place 
himself at the former only. He therefore puts ' myself ' 
on an equality with the other two brothers and concludes 
that the absurdity lies in the absence of any name. The 
names of all three brothers ought, so he thinks, to be given, 
but this does not mean that ' myself ' does not possess 
as in the preceding stage three brothers, including 
' myself.? 

Here is an example which will serve as a transitional 
case between the last stage and this one : Mai (9 ; 6) 
begins by saying : " / ought to have another brother, because 
I count as one," knowing all the time that the family 
consists of 3 brothers. In other words, " We are 3 
brothers " and " I have 3 brothers " are still synonymous. 
But Mai is shocked by the expression " I have 3 brothers, 
Paul, Ernest, and myself/' because Paul and Ernest form 
a separate group. Thus Mai makes an implicit distinction 
between the point of view of relation and that of member- 
ship, but does not realize that from the first of these two 
view-points, ' myself ' has only 2 brothers. Exactly as 
in the case of Bar, Mai holds that " there is a brother 



IN THE CHILD 79 

missing," which means that as in the last stage he reckons 
himself among his own brothers. He guesses at the solution 
in a form which constitutes the third type ; what is 
missing is the name of ' myself ' : " There is a name 
missing" 

It should be noted that this act of wanting a name only 
repeats the confusion of the second type in a new form. 
What the child demands in order to remove the absurdity, 
is simply that one might be able to pass from the point 
of view of relation " I have three brothers " to the point 
of view of membership " We are three brothers/' with- 
out changing the sense of the word brother. The act of 
giving ' myself ' a name seems to him sufficient for this 
purpose. 

Gavai (9 ; n) says : " The name of the girl is missing 
. . . of the girl who gives the names, the names of the others. 
How many sisters are there in the family? Three, 
Pauline, Jeanne, and myself. How many sisters has 
Pauline ? None. How many has Jeanne ? None. 
And how many sisters have I ' myself ' got ? One, the 
one where there is no name given." This case is very clear 
as regards the meaning of the ' missing name.' As to the 
answer that neither Jeanne nor Pauline have any sisters, 
this is a type of statement frequently met with, and can 
be traced to the phenomena of the first stage : "I have 
2 sisters but I am not their sister." 

Schm (10 ; 6) is equally clear. The phrase is absurd, 
" because the last one didn't give his name." And when he 
tries to put the sentence " so that it should not be silly/' 
Schm gives: "I have three brothers, Paul, Ernest, and 
William" meaning that there are 3 in the family and that 
William is ' myself.' He had never thought there were 4, 
and when he is asked to put himself in tie place of Paul, 
Schm assigns to him 2 brothers, as he does to each of the 
two (showing at this moment that he has realized the 
point of view of relation) which makes a total of 3. From 
this Schm concludes once again : " I have 3 brothers, Paul, 
Ernest, and William" 

It is in the same way too that Chan (age 9) says : 
" What is silly is that you don't say your name" but he 
adds after having correctly repeated the general gist of 
the test : "I don't think it is silly, but only that there is 



8o JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

nothing else in the riddle" In other words, there is nothing 
absurd in concluding from " I have 3 brothers " the fact 
that " We are 3 brothers," but it would have made things 
clearer to have given his name. Salv (12 ; 5) and Cler 
(10 ; 9) are in the same position. 

This again will show that the exact appreciation of an 
answer like " you mustn't say ' myself/ you must say a 
name " is an extremely delicate task, and this is confirmed 
by the judgments collected by Mile Descceudres (12 + as 
against 12 -). 1 Analysis is always required in order to 
understand what the child meant to say. 

Thus we may say : 

i This type of reasoning has the same structure as 
the last, but the child tries to distinguish the point of 
view of the group of brothers from the point of view of 
the brother who says ' myself/ As he cannot succeed 
in doing this, i.e. in finding the requisite logico-verbal 
expressions, the child simply sacrifices the first point of 
view and replaces the term ' myself ' by an equivalent 
name, hoping in this way to put all the brothers on an 
equal footing. 

2 But the child still sticks to the formula " / have . . . 
etc./' whence the verbal form " I have 3 brothers, Paul, 
Ernest, and (a name) /' The two points of view of member- 
ship and relation have therefore not yet been distinguished 
from one another. 

3 With regard to the order of appearance it sometimes 
happens that this type does not constitute a special stage. 
Some children never go through it at alL Others reach 
it by different paths, starting, for example, from the next 
type. Others again come to it directly by starting from 
type I. 

Fourth type. The starting-point of this type is the 
same as that of the last, but the method of procedure 
is reversed. The child no longer tries to eliminate ' my- 
self ' and the point of view of the relation between the 
brothers, but tries, on the contrary, to find out how many 
1 Descoeudres, Arch, de Psych., vol. 16 (1917), p. 334. 



IN THE CHILD 81 

brothers each separate brother has himself, and reaches 
in this way a total of four. The curious thing is that the 
child's reason for finding four brothers in the family 
is not that the test says : " I have three brothers/' but 
that the two brothers who are named in the test have not 
got the same brother as has ' myself/ This curious 
calculation is again due to the lack of a definitely relative 
point of view : each of my brothers has his own brothers 
which are not mine. I ' myself ' have one of my own as 
well, which makes 4 altogether. 

Ducho (age 9), for example, says at the first reading : 
" You can't tell what the third one is called," which is a 
third type answer, since the child believes for the moment 
in a total of three brothers. Then he reads the test again 
and concludes : " Well, Paul has two brothers, Ernest two, 
and 'myself has two friends as well, and we don't know 
what the last one is called" Ducho then comes to the 
conclusion that " there are four in the family " 

The answer is remarkable, and gives a very clear 
picture of the mechanism of reasoning at this stage, in 
which the points of view of the several brothers are juxta- 
posed and added together, because the subject is unable 
to pass from one to the other by means of a judgment of 
relation. For by ' the last one * Ducho means a brother 
who is the peculiar possession of ' myself ' without belong- 
ing either to Paul or to Ernest. 

Paraz (10 ; 6) says in the course of three successive 
readings, " There are three brothers, Paul, Ernest, and 
myself" which seems right enough; but this makes 
four brothers altogether " because there, are three brothers 
and then myself as well" Riv (9 ; 8) presents an analogous 
case. Schnei (u ; 3) throws more light on this quaint 
form of reasoning. He begins by declaring that there is a 
name missing ($rd type). Then he concludes that there 
are four sisters, but as an afterthought and in the following 
manner. Pauline has two sisters (Jeanne and myself), 
Jeanne has a sister (Pauline), and ' myself ' has yet|another 
sister (the 4th). 'Myself' is Jnot a sister to Pauline 
and Jeanne precisely as in the ist stage and it is in 
virtue of this lack of symmetry that ' myself ' has a fourth 
sister. Campa (10 ; 4) after having assigned two sisters 
to Pauline, two to 'myself/ which is so far correct, 
declares that the absurdity is as follows : " They each have 

F 



82 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

two sisters. It is silly that they should not all have the same 
sister. 3 ' The reader will recall that Gavai, at the 3rd 
stage produced calculations of this kind. 

CONCLUSION : i This type of child has not yet realized 
the reciprocal character of the brother relationship. It 
should be noted, moreover, that at none of the preceding 
stages is this character recognized as such, as was shown 
by several children of types II and III. 

2 In trying to pass from the relation between brothers 
to the total group of brothers, the child reasons as follows : 
He assigns, for example, two brothers to each of the 
brothers indicated in the test, but as he fails to establish 
reciprocal relations between them, each one has brothers 
of his own, thus bringing up the total to 4 and sometimes 5. 

3 The usual number 4 is clearly related to the state- 
ment of the test, " I have 3 brothers " ; but the child does 
not jump immediately from this statement to the number 
4 by saying " 3 brothers and myself, that makes 4." 
The path he follows is less direct. When the test is read, 
the child wonders whether the brothers number 3 or 4, 
and then embarks upon various attempts at non-reciprocal 
relations which we shall examine presently. 

Children of this type must therefore be clearly dis- 
tinguished from those who, as in the next stage, assume 
the existence of four brothers from the first. 

4 As to order of succession, the present type may 
follow immediately upon the first, or the second. The 
child may also pass from this type to the first or the 
third, and not to the fifth. Finally, a certain number 
avoid it altogether. 

Fifth type. At this last stage we come to the right 
solution of the test. The child either insists upon a 
fourth brother in virtue of the statement " I have three 
brothers/' or else reduces to 2 the number of brothers 
which " I have." The following answers may be admitted 
as correct : 



Celler (9; 5) : It is silly " Because there are not three 
sisters if there is him (she) as well." Batta (9 ; o) " Because 



IN THE CHILD 83 

she only has two brothers and counts herself as a brother." 
Stuck (9 ; o) " Because the third is missing. They have 
forgotten to put him in/' 

The point of view of relation and the point of view of 
membership have at last been distinguished one from 
another. 

3. COUNTER-TEST : CONVERSATION WITH THE CHILD. 
It is important before going any further, to lay stress 
on a question of method. The result of experiment and 
analyses carried out by means of a test is valid only if it 
is confirmed by questions asked in conversation and by 
current observation. In experiment one always runs 
the risk of creating an artificial atmosphere in which the 
child acts in obedience to a mechanical kind of logic. This 
may certainly be an index of what is going on in portions 
of the child's life which present the same features of 
verbalism and constraint, but it gives no information 
about his spontaneous thought. We must now therefore 
endeavour to verify the results of the preceding 
experiments by means of ordinary observation. 

One more precaution : a careful distinction should be 
made in studying the child mind between implicit under- 
standing, which cannot be formulated, and explicit under- 
standing, which finds expression in words. The phenomena 
which we have been studying and most of those which we 
shall presently deal with are misunderstandings only from 
the second point of view. The objection may therefore 
be raised that these phenomena do not belong to the child's 
actual intelligence but to his language. But language 
does not constitute a mere system of notation for the child. 
It creates in his mind a new reality verbal reality which 
does not merely reflect the reality given in sensation, but 
is superimposed upon it. The child will admit on the 
verbal plane certain illogicalities which he would deny to 
concrete reality. Our fundamental working hypothesis is 
therefore that these are the very same illogicalities which 
at an earlier stage the child exhibited in the sphere of 



84 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

practical observation. There has simply been a process of 
shifting from one type of mental operation to the other. 
The child who gets muddled by the Binet-Simon test 
would reason correctly if the test were treated as a game, 
and this he would not have succeeded in doing a few years 
back. The difficulties which he would have met with in 
the real world (and which we shall presently reveal by 
showing what children say about their own families) are 
simply carried over on to the plane of language. When he 
is faced with the fictitious beings created by words, the 
child goes through the same process of reasoning as 
formerly, when he was confronted with the real beings 
given in direct observation. 

The question we have to settle is therefore whether the 
phenomena described in the preceding analyses are to be 
found in the conversations which one can have with chil- 
dren, independently of any preconceived experiment and 
of the Binet-Simon test in particular. Now it will be 
shown that the forms of reasoning of the ist, 2nd, and 
4th types are reproduced word for word by the. children 
who are questioned in this way. We shall not, for the 
moment, concern ourselves with this circumstance, for 
it raises the wider problem (which will occupy us later on) 
of the actual development of the notion of brother (or of 
cousin or of family) from the point of view of child logic. 
We shall simply summarize a certain number of the 
answers the minimum necessary for the confirmation 
of our results. 



Here are two children, Raoul and Gerald (4 ; 6 and 7:2): 
" Raoul, have you any brothers ? Gerald. And has Gerald 
a brother ? No, only me has a brother. Oh, come ! Hasn't 
Gerald got a brother ? Raoul ? . . . No, he hasn't got 
one." Gerald, after giving the same answers in respect to 
Raoul, hits upon the right solution. 

Jacq (7:6): " Have you any brothers ? Two [Paul 
and Albert]. Has Paul any brothers? No. You are 
his brother ? Yes. Then Paul has some brothers ? 
No/' etc. He is then told the solution and seems to 
understand it. " And has your sister any brothers ? 



IN THE CHILD 85 

Two, one brother Paul and one brother Albert [he leaves 
himself out again]. An hour later: "Has Albert any 
brothers? One [Paul]. And Paul ? One [Albert]. 
And your sister ? Two." 

Labert (8 ; 6) : " Have you any brothers ? Arthur. 
Has he got a brother? No. How many brothers are 
there in the family ? Two. Have you got any ? One. 
Has he got any ? None at all. You are his brother ? 
Yes. Then he has got a brother ? No" 

Di (9 ; 6) one of our ist type subjects examined three 
months after the Binet-Simon test : " Have you any 
brothers ? One. Has he got a brother ? No. You are 
his brother, aren't you ? Yes. Then he has a brother ? 
No." 

In a word, the answers of type I, " You are not a 
brother, etc./' seem to admit of being brought into 
connexion with this manifest delusion on the part of 
children, viz. that they cannot succeed in placing them- 
selves at their brother's point of view and yet still reckon 
themselves as brothers. They certainly use the term 
' brothers ' to denote the group of brothers in a family, 
but they never form a clear idea of how many brothers 
each one of their brothers possesses himself. 

As to the second type, here are two spontaneous expres- 
sions uttered by children of 4 and 12, which show very 
clearly that ' howlers * are not simply created by our 
experiments : 

Mag (4 ; J) : " Have you got a sister ? Yes. And 
has she got a sister ? No, she hasn't got a sister. I am 
my sister." Simo (n ; 9) says that " there are three children 
in my family" and adds, without having been asked for 
any details : " / have two brothers and a sister. And you ? 
I am one of the children too. What are your brothers 
called ? Albert, and I am called Henry" Thus, like 
Bonv and the others he says : "I have two brothers," 
and reckons himself as one of them even though he has 
never passed the Binet-Simon test. Fal (7; J) : "I have 
only one sister and one brother [counting himself]." Kan 
(7 ; J) presents the same case. 

Verbal forms such as these are easy to understand. 
As soon as the child has discovered that he is himself a 



86 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

brother, he says * my brothers ' and counts himself as one 
of them. More remarkable is the fourth type of reasoning 
which we find in its spontaneous form in the way in which 
Jacq and others assign different numbers of brothers to the 
various brothers of the same family. For instance, Jacq 
has two brothers, his brother Paul has only one, as 
also his brother Auguste. But here is another complete 
example : 

Gys (8 ; o) : " Have you got a brother ? Yes. 
And your brother, has he got a brother ? No. Are you 
sure ? Yes. And has your sister got a brother ? No. 
You have a sister ? Yes. And she has a brother. 
Yes. How many ? No, she hasn't got any. Is your 
brother also your sister's brother ? No. And has your 
brother got a sister ? No. How many brothers are 
there in your family ? One. Then you are not a brother ? 
(He laughs.) Yes. Then your brother has got a brother ? 
Yes. How many ? One. Who is it ? Me." 

This example combines types I and IV : Gys will not 
allow to his brother and sister the reciprocity of relation- 
ship which he assigns to himself. 

These few facts give us the right to conclude that 
the forms of reasoning observed in connexion with the 
Binet-Simon test are to be found in a spontaneous state 
in the simple conversations which may be held with 
children. 

It would be interesting to arrange these logical pheno- 
mena in accordance with different fixed ages. This prob- 
lem will occupy us in the course of the next chapter. 

4. PSYCHOLOGICAL INTERPRETATION OF THE JUDG- 
MENT OF RELATION. The conclusion to be drawn from 
the above analyses is that the difficulty experienced by the 
child in understanding either the three brothers test or 
the simple questions concerning his own brothers and 
sisters is really a difficulty in handling the judgment of 
relation. The child can quite easily succeed (from about 
the age of 6 as we shall show) in forming judgments about 
the whole group of his brothers and sisters, but the 
relation between them escapes him, because he does not 



IN THE CHILD 87 

give to the term ' brother ' or ' sister' the relative, i.e. in 
this particular case the reciprocal, or (in logical parlance) 
the symmetrical sense which we assign to it. In other 
words, " Paul is my brother " does not yet imply " I am 
Paul's brother." The different types we have distinguished 
exhibit just those fluctuations in the course of which 
the relative sense of the word ' brother ' comes to be 
distinguished from the sense conferred upon it by the 
point of view of the judgment of membership only. 

How are we to account for this curious difficulty ? In 
the first place we must remember that this difficulty in 
grasping the relativity of ideas is universal in childhood. 
We shall meet with an example in the next chapter in 
connexion with the notion of right and left. But the 
points of the compass, terms of measurement, and even 
comparative expressions are all the occasion for a process 
of laborious groping, analogous in its origin to that which 
we have just been examining. This is why we submitted 
to lengthy analysis the difficulties raised by a test of Burt's 
or by the simpler test which follows : " Edith is fairer (or 
has fairer hair) than Suzanne ; Edith is darker than Lili. 
Which is the darkest, Edith, Suzanne, or Lili ? " This is 
what we found : 

Instead of tackling the matter by means of judgments of 
relation, i.e. by making use of such expressions as ' fairer 
than ' etc., the child deals simply in judgments of member- 
ship, and tries to find out with regard to the three girls 
whether they are fair or dark (speaking absolutely). It 
is exactly as though he reasoned as follows : Edith is 
fairer than Suzanne, so they are both fair ; Edith is darker 
than Lili, so they are both dark : therefore Lili is dark, 
Suzanne is fair, and Edith is between the two. In other 
words, owing to the interplay of the relations included in 
the test, the child, by substituting the judgment of 
membership (Edith and Suzanne are ' fair/ etc.) for the 
judgment of relation (Edith is 'fairer than' Suzanne), 

1 See J. Piaget, " Une forme verbale de la comparaison chez 
1' enfant/' Arch, de Psych., vol. 18, pp. 141-172. 



88 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

comes to a conclusion which is exactly the opposite 
of ours. Let us recall a few examples. 

Gw (13 ; 9) tells us : " Edith would be far the darkest 
of the three since she is darker than Lili, but then, on the other 
hand, she is fairer" Therefore she " is middling. Suzanne 
is fair. . . . Lili is dark. . . . Lili is the darkest and 
Suzanne the fairest" (p. 146). 

Other subjects see a contradiction in the test. Fo 
(9 ; 4) : " You can't tell, because it says that Edith is the 
fairest and the darkest" (p. 165). Hec (10; 2) : " You 
can't tell : Edith is fairer than Suzanne and darker than 
Lili!" (p. 165). 

Others make an attempt at the judgment of relation, 
but immediately divide the found relations into three 
classes. Mai (n ; 8) : " Suzanne is like Edith [and both 
are darker than Lili], and there is none in the middle. 
Since they are both ' darker ' they are the two dark ones 
(p. 160)." 

Gw (13 ; 9) at the fifth reading of the test : " Once 
Suzanne is the darkest and once Edith is, [therefore] Suzanne 
is the same as Edith, and Lili is the fairest " (p. 146). 

These answers clearly betray their kinship with those 
obtained by means of the three brothers test. In both 
cases judgments of relation are constantly being trans- 
formed into judgments of inherence (inclusion or member- 
ship). 

What is the origin of this difficulty in handling relations 
and of this tendency to replace the logic of relations 
by the simpler logic of membership and inclusion ? Our 
study of the different stages through which the child must 
pass before coming to the correct solution of Burt's test 1 
led us to the following conclusions. There is first a stage 
at which the child cannot retain the two premisses of 
the test in his memory and therefore fails to keep before 
his mind the relations in question. He retains only frag- 
mentary images : Edith and Suzanne =fair, Edith and 
Lili =dark, etc. Then there is a second stage in which the 
child achieves a single grasp of the various data, but 

1 See p. 89. 



IN THE CHILD 89 

reasons in the manner which we have described. Finally, 
there is a third stage in which he succeeds in reasoning 
correctly, but any distraction or momentary deficiency 
in the synthesis will throw him back on to mistakes 
comparable to those which belong to the earlier stages. 
All this looks as though a very important part were played 
by attention or rather by apperception or the form of 
synthesis. In so far as the field of consciousness is 
restricted, relations pass unnoticed, and only individuals 
are taken in with their particular characteristics inde- 
pendently of comparison. Hence the possibility of 
judgments of membership, since these call only for the 
perception of individuals taken singly, or taken as a whole 
but without comparison. But in so far as the field of 
consciousness expands, individuals are no longer given 
singly or ' en bloc/ they are compared in groups of two 
or more. At this point judgments of relation or comparison 
become possible. 

But this description which is adequate for the Burt test 
is still very static. The problem remains as to why the 
child's field of consciousness should be so narrow and 
why individuals should be perceived singly without any 
relations to each other nor to the child himself. Now, 
if the child makes no attempt to find the connexions which 
unite individuals severally, if he regards them as something 
absolute, without taking account of the relativity of 
their characters and of their points of view, might it 
not be because he has never compared himself to these 
individuals ? In other words, if he fails to understand 
^hy a friend of his can be both fairer than another friend 
and darker than a third, might this not be because the 
child has never suspected that such and such a person 
whom he has always considered fair may be looked upon 
as having chestnut-coloured hair by children who are 
themselves very fair, and so on ? In short, is it not because 
he has always taken his own point of view as something 
absolute that the child remains ignorant of the habits of 
relativity and comparison, and that his field of conscious- 



90 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

ness is still restricted ? Thus the difficulty in handling the 
logic of relations would seem to be a new consequence 
of childish ego-centrism ; ego-centrism leads to naive 
realism, and this realism, which is by definition the ignor- 
ance of all relations, leads to logical difficulties every time 
there is a question of substituting the logic of relations 
for that of membership or inclusion. 

These psychological factors show up very clearly in 
the case of the brother and sister relationship. One must 
be very careful, in examining children in the manner we 
have described, not to interpret their mistakes as actual 
fallacies, i.e. as mistakes in reason. The child's attitude 
betrays only a deficiency of attention or, strictly speaking, 
a faulty point of view, due to the fact that he has not 
yet asked himself the question as we ask it. He has always 
considered his brothers and sisters from his own point of 
view, calling them brothers and sisters, counting them up 
without including himself, or counting the family only 
as a whole. But the thought of their individual view- 
points has never crossed his mind ; he has never asked 
himself what he was to them, nor whether he counted as 
one in their collection of brothers and sisters. When, 
therefore, he is questioned on this point, he does not give 
the result of any previous reasoning nor even of any 
explicit reasoning at the moment, but instead, he brings 
to our notice what may be called an optical illusion of the 
intellect. This pseudo reasoning consists in a series of 
immediate judgments following one another in freedom 
from all logic. We have here what might be called ' inno- 
cence ' of judgment, in comparison to what Ruskin has 
called in the sphere of perceptions ' innocence of the eye/ 
by which he means ignorance of perspective. 

If then and this applies to our previous enquiries 
as well we have expressed child thought in the terms of 
adult logic, the reader must be careful not to see in these 
terms anything more than a mere system of notation, 
or, as we have said elsewhere, 1 a " label attached to the 

1 J. Piaget, loc. cit., Arch, de Psych., p. 143. 



IN THE CHILD 91 

facts/' As a psychological process the child's reasoning 
remains independent of these notations. It consists in 
a series of attitudes which bring each other into play 
according to psychological laws which should be specified 
in each particular case (as we are trying to do now in the 
case of the three brothers) and not in a string of concepts 
which imply one another logically. The task of carrying 
out this psychological analysis is still in its early stages, 
and nothing could be farther from our intention than to 
reconstruct the thought of the child on the pattern of 
adult mentality. On the contrary, it will perhaps one day 
be the task of child logic to explain that of adults, if as the 
historicocritical method maintains, it is to history that 
we must look for further light upon the nature of thought. 
There may therefore be a certain advantage in sticking 
to a logical terminology, precisely because of this eventual 
explanation of adult reasoning which we hope to draw 
from the formation of reasoning in the child. 

But to return to the ego-centric illusion of our children's 
judgments. In virtue of the ' innocence ' of his judgment, 
the child reasons as though he were the only thinker in 
question ; his point of view about his family seems to 
him the only one possible and excludes all others. For 
him therefore it is not a subjective point of view, but 
that of absolute reality. Consequently, as he is not con- 
scious of his own subjectivity, or more simply of himself, 
he places himself on a completely different plane from his 
brothers, and this is what prevents him from seeing that 
he is a brother to his brothers on precisely the same grounds 
as they are brothers to him. 

Thus when all is said and done, it is once more to the 
ego-centrism of thought that we must appeal in order to 
explain the incapacity for even the most elementary 
relativism of thought. To understand a relation that, 
for instance, of brother to brother means thinking of at 
least two points of view at the same time, those of each 
of the brothers. Absolute notions like those of ' boy/ etc. 
presuppose only one point of view. The judgment " Paul 



92 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

is a boy " remains the same whatever may be the perspec- 
tive adopted. 

The full importance of the ego-centric illusion will 
now be manifest. The explanation just given with regard 
to the notion of brother holds for all relative notions. If 
for the child things are absolutely to the right or to the 
left, or as we have just seen, absolutely dark or fair, and 
so on, it is because up to a certain age the child fails to 
realize this very simple fact that one of his companions 
whom he holds to be big, or dark, or horrid may perfectly 
well be regarded by a third party as small, or fair, or nice, 
without the third party being necessarily either a fool 
or a knave. 

We have two more remarks to make. The first is 
concerned with the distinction between the verbal and 
the concrete plane of reality. The difficulties we have 
been describing are independent of language, and even take 
place in ordinary life. They may therefore be said to 
disappear sooner than verbal difficulties. After the age 
of 7-8, as we shall see in the next chapter, i.e. at the very 
moment when primitive ego-centrism is on the wane, 
a certain proportion of the children succeed in saying how 
many brothers and sisters their own brothers and sisters 
possess (the test is successfully passed at the age of 10). 
The mistakes which go on after this age are therefore due 
to a shifting of these difficulties on to a new plane that of 
reality imagined verbally. This is why the Binet-Simon 
test of the three brothers is not successful till the age of 11, 
the age of formal thought. If the test were played instead 
of being spoken, if the characters were given concrete 
form, the children would make no mistakes. But as 
soon as they are talked to, they become confused. 

How do these difficulties come to be shifted from the 
plane of action to the verbal plane ? In other words, why 
does the mere fact of speaking a relation cause those diffi- 
culties to reappear which had been disposed of on the 
plane of action ? We do not think that the difficulty is 
only one of visualizing or imagining situations which in 



IN THE CHILD 93 

action the subject was able to perceive as such. There is 
more in it than that. The difficulty is one of conscious 
realization. For the child to be able to distinguish the 
adult verbal expressions which definitely characterize 
membership (we are three brothers) from those which 
denote relation (I have two brothers), something more is 
needed than simply to be able to imagine the different 
points of view ; the subject must have quite definitely 
and consciously become aware of a distinction which, 
though it may play a part in his actions, can do so without 
necessarily obtruding itself upon his notice. This is why 
language is so important. It is the index of what has 
become conscious, and too much care cannot be taken in 
the study of the verbal forms used by the child. In them- 
selves they mean nothing, and one must beware of taking 
them literally. Thus, when a boy of 10, for example, tells 
us : " You are not a brother'' or a girl of 4 : " I am my 
sister," it would be idle to find more in such statements 
than simple confusion. But in their current use such 
verbal forms are significant. If we look at them in a nega- 
tive light, as it were, and not in regard to their positive 
contents, they point to logical difficulties ; they show that 
the child has not yet consciously realized the difference 
existing between operations which on the practical plane 
he perhaps finds it quite easy to keep separate. 

And this is why, even if the difficulties relating to 
immediate judgments such as " I have % brothers " and 
" My brother Paul has % brothers " tend to disappear 
towards the age of 7-8, and have vanished at the age of 10, 
these same difficulties may very easily reappear on the 
verbal plane and prevent the Binet-Simon test of the 
three brothers from being passed before the age of n, 
i.e. before the age of formal and discursive thought. 

In this connexion and this is our second remark it 
might be interesting to enquire for what purpose the child 
uses such expressions as ' have ' (I have two brothers) or 
' my ' (my brothers) or ' of ' (the brother of} all of them 
forms which denote relations in adult speech, and which 



94 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

must consequently have a peculiar meaning for the 
child. 

Now it is obvious that our enquiries confirm the 
results which we obtained on another occasion : x the 
child still confuses the three different meanings of 
the term ' of ' the possessive, the attributive, and the 
partitive. 

When a child between 7 and 9 is asked what is meant 
by the expression " Part of my posy is yellow " or " Some 
of my flowers are yellow/' he will generally answer, 
even though he knows that a part is a fraction, that 
the posy is entirely yellow and that it is made of a part 
which is yellow. "The part that is with the posy" is a 
childish expression which we meet with occasionally, and 
which expresses just this peculiarity that the posy and 
the part are one and the same thing (the part being thought 
of simply as an object which is incomplete or isolated 
from the whole). 

If we analyse these phenomena we discover further that 
the three meanings of the genitive ' of ' are still further 
confused in the following manner : i the partitive sense 
(half of the cake) ; 2 the possessive sense (the hat of 
the gentleman) ; and the attributive sense (the nature of 
God). Thus the child understands ' Some of my flowers ' 
in the way in which one says ' the shape of the posy/ the 
shape belonging to the posy though it is inseparable 
from it. This undifferentiated childish relation we have 
named the relation of property. 

Now this phenomenon, apparent in the preposition 
' of ' can be recognized in the use of the relation ' to 
have'. For in the use of language the two relations 
' of ' and ' to have '.are equivalent. One can say " The 
nature of the man" or "The man has a nature . . ./' 
etc. The verb ' to have ' also denotes sometimes a posses- 
sive (I have a hat), sometimes an attributive relation 
(That line has a length of 3 m.), sometimes a partitive 
relation (this cake has six pieces) ; or it can mark the 

1 J. Piaget, Journ. de Psych., 1921, vol. 18, p. 470 sq. 



IN THE CHILD 95 

relation between the parts of the same whole (I have 
three colleagues, I have a brother, etc.). 

And the child, in effect, sometimes says : " I have three 
brothers " instead of " We are three brothers/' or " I am 
my sister," and in this he is confusing the possessive rela- 
tion with the attributive (taken in its widest sense) ; 
sometimes, as when he says, " I have two brothers," 
but denies to each of his brothers the possibility of having 
more than one brother, the relation is almost that of 
possession (as when one says " I have a father, but I am 
not a father "), and not that holding between the several 
units of one and the same whole. 



CHAPTER III 

THE GROWTH OF RELATIVITY IN 
IDEAS AND NOTIONS 

Yet let me ask you one more question in order to 
illustrate my meaning, added Socrates : " Isnot^s^^ 
brother to be regarded essentially as a brother ^some- 
thing ? Certainly, replied Agathon. That is, of a 
brother or sister ? Yes." PLATO, Symposium. 

THE last chapter gave us some idea of the importance 
attaching to the logic of relations, since a simple relation- 
ship like that of brother still presented insurmountable 
difficulties to the child of 9-10. The sequel will show us 
anew that childish realism, i.e. the inability to grasp the 
relativity of notions or ideas is one of the principal 
obstacles to the development of childish reasoning. 
For this realism stands in the way of that gradual improve- 
ment in deductive power which would free the child from 
the immediate ready-made reality of particular cases 
which have nothing to do with each other. Before going 
on to examine these consequences of realism, it will be 
well to investigate some new data taken fresh from 
the child's actual experience, and not drawn from what 
are, after all, very artificial tests, such as those which we 
have been analysing. We shall set out to verify the hypo- 
theses put forward in connexion with the three brothers 
test, by questioning the children of 4 to 12 about their 
own brothers and sisters. We shall also study (in the same 
children) the evolution of the notion of right and left, 
which is an extremely interesting part of the logic of 
relations ; then in a second part of the chapter we shall 
study the definitions given of the notions of family and 
country. 

96 



IN THE CHILD 97 

I. SOME TESTS IN THE LOGIC OF RELATIONS. 1 

When a certain number of children have been examined 
in conversation, one by one, the quality of the answers 
has always been obtained at the expense of their quantity, 
and the hypotheses which we proposed in the course of 
our study of the three brothers test needed to be verified by 
very extensive statistics. To this end we examined more 
than 200 children between 4 and 12 (180 of whom had 
brothers and sisters) , following in our method the procedure 
of the test, i.e. asking a certain number of ne varietur 
questions in a fixed order. (This of course does not 
exclude making sure N that the child has understood the 
question, so as to eliminate answers due to mere inatten- 
tion and not to a fault of logic.) 

Three of our previously reached conclusions will have 
to be verified in this statistical manner. 

In the first place, when a child is questioned about his 
own brothers and sisters the answers given point to the 
same difficulties as were called forth by the test of the three 
brothers. We must now ascertain up to what point this 
phenomenon is universal, and whether the age when it 
appears corresponds in some measure and when due 
allowance has been made for verbal difficulties to the 
ages at which the Binet-Simon test is unsuccessful. 

In the second place, we have interpreted these difficulties 
as due to the ego-centrism of child thought. The child 
reasons from his own point of view, and is unable to place 
himself at that of his brothers and sisters. This cause is 
obvious in the case of the child's own family, but we 
have extended it to cover cases in which the child talks 
about any family of which he is told the composition and 
about which he is asked to reason. It will be well to 
confirm the fact that these are two difficulties of the same 
order by showing, for instance, that the right solution of 
questions about the child's own family and that of ques- 

1 With the collaboration of Miles Sophie Escher, Ulrike Hanhart, and 
Suzanne Perret. 
G 



g8 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

tions about any family are correlative, i.e. are given at 
the same age. 

Finally, we have extended this explanation of the child's 
inability to handle the judgment of relation by applying 
it to ideas which are apparently removed from the influence 
of ego-centricity, such as the ideas of colour, etc. In 
studying relations such as those of right and left, it will 
have to be shown that from the point of view of logical 
structure these relations develop along the same lines as 
were traced by the evolution of the brother and sister 
relations. 

i. METHOD OF EXPERIMENT AND NUMERICAL RESULTS. 
We carried out individual examinations on about 240 
children between 4 to 12, of whom 100 were girls, and 
we asked them the twelve following questions in the 
given order. 

I. Brothers and Sisters. 

1. How many brothers have you ? And how many 
sisters ? [Let us suppose that the child has a brother A 
and a sister B.] And how many brothers has A ? And 
how many sisters ? And how many brothers has B ? 
And how many sisters ? 

2. How many brothers are there in the family ? How 
many sisters ? How many brothers and sisters altogether ? 

3. There are three brothers in a family : Auguste, 
Alfred, and Raymond. How many brothers has Auguste ? 
And Alfred ? And Raymond ? 

4. Are you a brother [or a sister] ? What is a brother 
[or sister, according to the sex of the child] ? 

5. Ernest has three brothers, Paul, Henry, and Charles. 
How many brothers has Paul ? And Henry ? And 
Charles ? 

6. How many brothers are there in this family ? 

II. Right and Left. 

7. Show me your right hand. Your left. Show me 
your right leg. Now your left. 

8. Show me my right hand. Now my left. Show me 
my right leg, now my left. [During these questions the 
experimenter must sit opposite the child.] 



IN THE CHILD 99 

9. [A coin is placed on the table to the left of a pencil 
in relation to the child.] Is the pencil to the right or to 
the left ? And the penny ? 

10. [The child is opposite the experimenter, who has 
a coin in his right hand and a bracelet on his left arm.] 
You see this penny. Have I got it in my right hand or 
in my left ? And the bracelet ? 

11. [The child is opposite three objects in a row : a 
pencil to the left, a key in the middle, and a coin to the 
right.] Is the pencil to the left or to the right of the key ? 
And of the penny ? Is the key to the left or to the right 
of the penny ? And of the pencil ? Is the penny to the 
left or the right of the pencil ? And of the key ? [Six 
answers altogether.] 

12. [The same questions as before with three objects 
in a row opposite the child, a key to the left, a piece of 
paper in the middle, and a pencil to the right. But the 
objects are only shown for half a minute and are then 
covered over with a copy-book, and the answers are 
taken down. The child is told] : Now listen, I am going 
to show you three things only for a tiny moment. You 
must look very carefully, and then afterwards tell me 
by heart how the things are arranged. Look out . . . 
(the experiment) .... Well now, is the key left or right 
of the piece of paper ? And of the pencil ? Etc. 

When the answers are sorted out, no mistakes must be 
overlooked. None of the 12 tests can be considered as 
passed unless all the questions in it are correctly answered. 
(Naturally the decisive answer is the only one that counts 
when the child himself corrects any initial mistake due 
to inattention.) There are therefore no half mistakes. 
For in the questions of left and right the chances are two 
to one that the child will be right if he answers at random. 
In certain of the questions on brothers and sisters he stands 
a very good chance of answering correctly without paying 
attention. So that any test in which only one or two 
points are passed must be considered unsuccessful. For 
instance, if the child passes only in 2 or 4 out of the 6 
points in test 11, then he has failed in test 11, unless 
of course he corrects himself in time. Naturally ~ the 
experimenter must take his time so as to eliminate 
inattention, and he may even divide the examination 
into two or three parts when there axe signs of fatigue 
on the part -of the subject. Moreover, one should not ask 



ioo JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

very young children questions which are obviously beyond 
them, except of course where they show special aptitude. 

For question 4 to be considered properly solved the 
child must state in one form or another that in order to 
be a brother one must oneself have a brother or a sister. 
It goes without saying that tests i and 2 cannot be 
applied to an only child. 

Here, then, are the results to which all this led us. We 
have followed the accepted custom of considering a test 
successfully passed when at least 75% of the children of the 
same age have answered correctly. 

Age. Tests passed. 

4 o. 

5 Test 7. 

6 Tests 2 and 7. 

7 Tests 2, 7, and 9. 

8 Tests 2, 3, 7, 8, 9, and 10. 

9 Tests 2, 3, 4, 7, 8, 9, and 10. 

10 Tests 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, and 10. 

11 Tests i-io, and 11. - 

12 Tests 1-12. 

We had hoped to discover a test of aptitude as well as 
one of age by sorting out the materials by the method of 
percentages, but we were prevented from publishing 
these results by two circumstances. In the first place we 
did not interview a sufficient number of children to 
establish homogeneous percentages, but above all we 
realized that there is no correlation between tests 1-7 
and tests 7-12. The correlation varies according to age 
from o or even 0-2 to about 0-5. This means that we 
cannot use these tests as tests of aptitude, and that each 
answer is conditioned by personal circumstances, such as 
the number of the subject's brothers or sisters. At the 
same time it is obvious that if we confine ourselves to purely 
statistical considerations, the use of these tests is perfectly 



IN THE CHILD 101 

legitimate. The fact that there is no correlation among 
the individual answers is no reason for neglecting the 
conclusion that on an average, tests I and 5 or tests 8 and 

10, which taken in pairs have the same logical meaning, 
are passed at the same ages respectively : the age of 10 
for tests i and 5 and the age of 8 for tests 8 and 10. 

Let us now turn to the analysis of what results we have 
obtained. 

2. BROTHERS AND SISTERS. The first thing to note 
about these tests is that they are genuine tests of age, 
i.e. that the percentage of right answers given to each 
question increases regularly with age. 

Here are the results of test i : 

Years . 4-5 6-7 8-9 10-11 12 
Percentage . 19% 24% 55% 87% 100% 

Thus test i, which is of particular interest to us as 
presenting a difficulty analogous to that of the Binet- 
Simon test, is solved unanimously only at the age of 12, 
and by 75% of the subjects only at the age of u. There 
is no need for us to repeat the qualitative analyses of 
the wrong answers. All the observed cases were found 
to be identical with those which we quoted in Chapter 

11, 3 (Raoul, Jacq, etc.). So that up to the age of 10, 
75% of the children are incapable, through their inability 
to leave their own point of view, of saying how many 
brothers and sisters their own brothers and sisters possess. 
At the age of 8 only half the children succeed in doing so. 
This is an excellent confirmation of the value of the 
Binet-Simon test. 

Question 2 (the number of children in the family) is far 
easier, since it is solved from the age of 6 by 75% of the 
subjects. The big difference existing between questions 
i and 2 thus confirms the usefulness of the distinction 
between the logic of classes (membership) and that of 
relations, and it shows how much easier is the former than 
the latter. For the child has far oftener had occasion to 



102 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

take up the point of view of his family as a whole than 
that of each one of his brothers and sisters. It is to be 
noted, however, that up to the age of 10 there are a number 
of mistakes arising from the fact that the child does not 
count himself among his brothers and sisters, which is 
one of the commonest forms of the realistic delusion of 
children. 

One cujious thing is that among very young children 
it is not always the same who answer questions i and 2 
correctly. In other words, the children who pass test i 
do not all necessarily pass test 2. But from the age of 
8-9 it is different. It is not till the age of 10 that children 
are able to say simultaneously how many brothers and 
sisters there are in the family and how many brothers and 
sisters each member of the family has. Thus tests i and 2 
combined give rise to difficulties which are identical with 
those of the Binet-Simon three brothers test. And since 
the latter is also not passed till the age of 10, we may con- 
clude that our analysis of the materials supplied by this 
test is justified. 

This impression will gain in strength if we now pass to 
an examination of the answers given by the child when 
he is questioned about a family other than his own by 
means of tests 3, 5, and 6. 

Question 5 which has the same logical structure as 
question i (How many brothers have X and Y, etc.) gives 
comparable results. It also is solved at the age of 10. 
Below the age of 7, however, it yields less satisfactory 
results than question i, which is only natural, considering 
the claim which it makes on the child's power of adapta- 
tion to such things as new names, etc. But after the age 
of 7-8 incidental circumstances cease to play an important 
part, and the logical difficulty alone comes into play, 
thus making this case analogous to that of test i. 

Question 6, on the other hand, is harder than question 2, 
and is solved only at the age of 10, like question 5, and not 
at the age 6, like question 2. But this is easy to explain. 
Before the interrogatory, the child has often thought 



IN THE CHILD 103 

about question 2 (the number of children in his family) 
and has done so independently of the point of view of 
each of his brothers. But question 6 calls for a certain 
effort of adaptation (new names, etc.) ; and above all it 
requires of the child that he should find the total sum 
of the brothers as a function of what he has just learned 
in connexion with question 5. Thus he will not add up 
the units directly as he does for his own family, but he 
will be forced to construct a judgment of membership 
with the judgments of relation taken from question 5. 
This construction is what constitutes the difficulty of 
test 6. 

Tests 5 and 6 taken together reproduce, it should be 
noted, the difficulties of the Binet-Simon test, and it is 
once again only at the age of 10 that these tests (5 and 6) 
come to be solved. 

Test 3, on the other hand, is solved from the age of 8. 
It is therefore easier than test 5 and even, curiously 
enough, than test i. The only explanation of this seems to 
be the following. In the case of test i the child has more 
difficulty in entering into the point of view of his brothers 
than into that of the three brothers of the test 3, because 
in the case of his own family it is not enough for him to 
enter into the point of view of others, he must also look 
at himself from the point of view of others, which is 
twice as difficult. Now in test 5 the child is placed straight 
away at a privileged point of view, that of Ernest. The 
difficulty is therefore analogous in a sense to that of test i. 
These considerations explain why test 3, which does not 
involve these peculiar difficulties, is found to be easier 
than test i. 

Be this as it may, the analogies presented by the 
results of tests i, 5, and 6 are sufficient in themselves to 
confirm the interpretations given in Chapter II. It is the 
mental habits acquired in his reactions to his own brothers 
and sisters that explain the child's way of reasoning when 
he is dealing with purely logical problems such as the 
Binet-Simon test of the three brothers. 



io 4 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

3. DEFINITION OF THE WORD ' BROTHER ' (OR ' SIS- 
TER '). We have one last counter-test to bring forward. 
If the difficulties we have described are really caused by 
an inability to handle the logic of relations, this same 
absence of relativity will have to be found in the definition 
of the word ' brother/ This will be shown to be the case 
by test 4. 

In the first place it should be noted that the first part 
of the question (Are you a brother ?) hardly presents any 
difficulties after the age of 4-5. The correct definition, 
on the other hand, is not found till the age of 9, and by 
correct we mean that which implies in one way or another 
the idea that in order to be a brother one must have a 
brother or a sister. 



The most primitive definitions consist simply in saying 
that a brother is a boy. 

Jo (age 5) considers that a brother is ' a little boy/ 
" Are all boys brothers ? Yes. Has your father got a 
brother? Yes, and a sister. Why is your father a 
brother ? Because he is a man" 

Lo (age 5) g. : " A sister is a girl you know. Are all the 
girls you know sisters ? Yes, and all the boys are brothers." 

Ba (6 ; 10) g. : "A sister is a girl. Are all girls sisters ? 
Yes. Am I a sister ? No. How do you know that 
I am not a sister. I don't know. But I have got a sister, 
then aren't I her sister ? Oh yes. What is a sister ? 
A girl. What must you have to be a sister ? I don't 
know" (Ba has two sisters and a brother.) 

Pi (age 6) : "A brother is a boy, Are all boys brothers ? 
Because some of them are little. If anyone is little isn't 
he a brother ? No, you can only be a brother if you are 
big." 

This is all the more curious because Pi has just said 
that he himself was not a brother. " Why not ? Because 
I haven't got any others, because I am alone" Implicitly, 
he seems to know what a brother is, but he has not become 
sufficiently conscious of the necessary characteristics to be 
able to give a definition. In such cases question 4 is 
naturally marked correct. But what shows very clearly 
that the conscious realization involved in definition is 
the thing to go by is that Pi is no better at handling the 
notion of brother than he was at defining it. He answers 



IN THE CHILD 105 

question 3 by saying that Auguste " perhaps has two " 
brothers, Alfred " three," and Raymond "four." Ques- 
tion 5 he answers by saying that Paul " perhaps had three 
brothers," Henry " one/' Charles "four," and there were 
altogether (question 6) three brothers in the family. 

Sob (age 7) considers that all boys are brothers. " Is 
your father a brother ? Yes, when he was little. Why 
was your father a brother ? Because he was a boy. Do 
you know your father's brother ? He hasn't got a brother 
(or a sister)." 

Kan (age 7$) : " It's a boy. Are all boys brothers ? 
Yes. Is your father a brother ? No. Why ? Because 
he is a man. Isn't your father a brother ? Yes. Why ? 
Because he used to be the same as little boys." 

Bo (age 8) : A brother, " why, that's a boy, it is some- 
one. Are all boys brothers ? Yes t and then there are 
cousins and nephews as well. Has your father got a 
brother ? Yes. Why is your father a brother ? I don't 
know. What must you have to be a brother ? / don't 
know. That's very hard." 

Po (8 J) g. : "A sister is a girl. Are all girls sisters 1 
Yes. Are you sure ? . . . A sister is a girl. Aren't 
there some girls who are not sisters ? No." 

Pon (age 9) and X (age 10) also consider that all boys 
are brothers. 

A second stage in definition is reached by those subjects 
who know that in order to be a brother there must be 
several in the family, but who do not assign the title to 
all the children. 

So (age 8) is not sure if he is a brother (he is an only child) . 
A brother : That's when someone has a child, well the child 
who comes next is a brother." So cannot answer either 
question 5 or question 6. Question 3 on the other hand 
is correctly solved. 

Hal (age 9) : " When there is a boy and another boy, 
when there are two of them. Has your father got a brother ? 
Yes. Why ? Because he was born second. Then what 
is a brother ? It is the second brother that comes. Then 
the first is not a brother ? Oh no. The second brother 
that comes is called brother" It would be impossible to 
show more clearly the absence of relativity from the 
word ' brother.' 



io6 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

There are other kinds of false definition, but they have 
no logical interest because they are simply incomplete : 

Cour (age 9) : "A brother is a little person who lives 
with us. Are all the boys who are with you brothers ? 
No, it must be a boy who is always with us." 

Pon (age 9) : " A brother is a boy who is in the same 
fiat." In such cases the child should be probed in other 
ways so as to find out whether or not he has realized 
that it is a question of children being in the same family. 

The correct definition is therefore that which implies 
the idea that there must be at least two in the same 
family for there to be a brother or sister. The child 
often knows this without being able to express it straight 
away, in which case he must be helped to make his idea 
explicit. There is a good proportion of such correct 
definitions from the age of 7 onwards (average of 60%). 

Mi (7^) : A brother is " a boy. Are all boys brothers ? 
Yes. Is a boy who is the only one in the family a 
brother ? No. Why are you a brother ? Because I have 
sisters. Am I a brother ? No. How do you know ? 
Because you are a man. Has your father got brothers ? 
Yes. Is he a brother ? Yes. Why ? Because he had 
a brother when he was little. Tell me what a brother is. 
When there are several children in a family." 

We were perhaps helping the child too much when we 
asked " Is a boy who is the only one in the family a 
brother/' but here are other cases. 

Fal (age 7) : " Are all boys brothers ? Yes. All of 
them ? No, there are some who have no sisters. To be a 
brother you must have a sister." 

Fa (age 7) : " Are all boys brothers ? There must be 
two boys together, a mother and two boys" 

Sait (age 7) : " A brother is a little boy who has another 
little boy with him" 

Rey (age 10) : "A brother, why, that's when there are 
two children" Bern (age 10) : "A brother is a relation, 
one brother to another." 

It is a remarkable thing that there is no noticeable differ- 
ence between only children and others. 
Although they are not directly derived from the judg- 



IN THE CHILD 107 

ment of relation, these definitions furnish a very useful 
counter-test by showing us that the relativity of the 
notion of brother comes to be realized very slowly. At 
first the notion is not relative at all : one is a brother 
as one is a boy, in the absolute sense of the term. During 
the second stage, relativity is guessed at, but the child 
still indulges in specifications, singling only one child out 
of the family and thus making all genuine relativity 
impossible. The peculiar interest which this second stage 
possesses for us will now be clear, since it gives a clue 
to the strange calculations indulged in by children of the 
first and fourth types in connexion with the Binet-Simon 
test. If, in the subject's opinion, all the children in a 
family are not brothers, then it is only natural that each 
brother should not have the same number of brothers as 
the others. Anyhow, such specifications in the notion 
of brother are sufficient to prevent the formation of any 
correct judgment of relation. Finally, the fact that the 
correct definition does not appear on an average until the 
age of 9 will enable us to understand why such simple 
tests as i and 5 are not passed until after this age. 

4. RIGHT AND LEFT. We must now look for the 
third confirmation which we had hoped to find, and see 
whether the progress made by the child in handling a 
notion like that of right and left is also due to the gradually 
decreasing ego-centrism of thought, as was the case in the 
brother relation. And we shall do this by showing that 
the idea of right and left in so far as it is a relative notion 
passes three successive stages which correspond to three 
successive points in the desubj edification or socialization 
of thought : the first stage (5-8) in which left and right are 
considered only from the child's own point of view; 
the second (8-n) in which they are also considered from 
that of the other person, of the person who is speaking 
to him; finally, the third stage (11-12), which marks 
the moment when right and left are also considered from 
the point of view of the things themselves. Now these 



io8 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

three stages correspond exactly to the three social stages 
we established before : the age of 7-8 marks the decline 
of primitive ego-centrism and that of 11-12 the discovery 
of formal thought which reasons from every point of view 
at once. But let us turn to the facts before us. 

The Binet-Simon tests tell us that the age of 6 is that 
at which a child can show his left hand and his right ear. 
But this does not necessarily mean that at that age right 
and left are known and handled as relations. These 
notions may very well still be ' absolute/ i.e. there may 
be a left and a right ' in themselves/ just as for the Greeks 
there was a 'high' and a 'low' independently of weight. 
The child's own body would 'naturally determine this 
absolute right and left to begin with, and an enormous 
amount of adaptation would still be necessary before the 
child could realize, first that there was a right and left 
for every one else, and later that objects themselves can 
be to the right or the left of each other even though their 
disposition in space is relative to us. 

Now this is exactly what our experiments proved to be 
the case. We began by trying to find out at what age 
the child knew his left. and his right hand (test 7). In 
the poorer districts of Geneva in which we worked it 
was at the age of 5, according to the 75% rule, which it 
is customary to use. 1 But the following fact is evidence 
that at this age left and right are only the names for a 
particular hand or a particular leg, and that the child is 
incapable of bringing these notions into relation with the 
different points of view of his interlocutors. When the 
experimenter stands opposite the child and says : " Show 
me your left hand. . . . etc/' (test 8), nearly three-quarters 
of the children are unable to do so. This test is not passed 
until the age of 8. Seeing the importance of this question, 
we decided to control the result by means of another test. 

1 It is interesting to note that according to Decroly's test (a Loto 
game in which the counters have to be moved to the right or the left), 
studied by Mile Descceudres at Geneva (Le d&veloppement de V enfant 
de deux & sept ans, Delachaux et Niestie, 1922, p. 219), the age of 
correct orientation is also 5-J-. 



IN THE CHILD 109 

Now test 10 contains exactly the same problem under a 
different wording ; and here again it is at the age of 8 
that it comes to be solved. We can therefore say that it 
is only at the age of 8 that the child is able to place him- 
self at the point of view of others with regard to left and 
right, i.e. three years after having succeeded in dealing 
with these notions from his own point of view. And, 
be it said once again, it is precisely at the age of 7-8 
that ego-centrism undergoes a considerable diminution 
(L.T., Chap. I). 

The relativity of left and right in connexion with the 
actual objects emerges far more slowly, and here again 
we must beware of being misled by appearances when we 
begin to question the children. Thus question 9 (finding 
whether a coin is to the right or the left of a pencil) is 
solved at the age of 7 (nearly 70% at the age of 6). But 
it is obvious that in such cases the child is judging objects 
only in relation to himself. The adult does the same, 
and all logicians know that the notions of right and left 
cannot be defined without referring implicitly or explicitly 
to the position of one's own body. But the difference is 
that when the coin and the pencil are presented to the 
adult, he will say that the coin is to the left of the pencil, 
whereas the child will simply say that it is to the left, in 
the absolute sense of the word. The shade of difference 
is not verbal but from the logical point of view essential, 
and its importance is proved by the fact that the child does 
not pass test n before the age of n precisely because he 
does not understand the expression to the left of as applied 
to the relation between two objects. The success of test 9 
at the age of 7 is therefore in no way a proof that the 
child has realized the relativity of the ideas of right and 
left in connexion with objects taken by themselves. 1 

One ought to have asked the child this did not occur 

1 M. H. Delacroix has observed data which tally completely with 
ours. Cf. Le Langage et la Pensie, Alcan 1924, foot-note on p. 550. 
We take this opportunity of expressing our regret at not having been 
able to deal in these pages with M. Delacroix's admirable volume which 
was published after we had gone to press. 



no JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

to us until after the experiment had been completed 
to go to the other side of the table after having said that 
the coin was to the left of the pencil and to have added, 
" Now is the penny to the left or to the right of the pencil ? " 
It would be interesting to repeat the experiment along 
these lines. The proof of the non-relativity of the notions 
of right and left is therefore supplied by the results of tests 
ii and 12. By placing three objects in a row before the 
child and asking him to state exactly how these objects 
stand to one another, we force him to discover the rela- 
tivity of the ideas of position. The key, which is between 
the coin and the pencil, can no longer be said to be ' to the 
right ' or ' to the left ' in the absolute sense of the word ; 
it is to the right in relation to the coin and to the left in 
relation to the pencil. Left to himself, the child will say 
that the key is ' in the middle/ but we then ask him 
more explicitly : "Is the key to the left or to the right of 
the penny? And of the pencil? " If the child is not ac- 
customed to make use of the notions of left and right in 
relation to objects taken by themselves, this expression 
' to the left of will be unintelligible to him. And this is 
precisely what proves to be the case in experiment. 
This test is not passed till the age of 11. At 9 only about 
15% of the children understand it at all. 

The age of 11 is therefore very important as marking 
complete assimilation of the notion of right and left as 
applied to objects in themselves. Test 12, it is true, is 
not passed until a year later, but this interval is easy to 
explain. For test 12, having the same logical structure 
as test n, calls in addition for retention of the data by 
means of a certain topographical memory (knowing the 
position of three objects in a row which have been pre- 
sented for half a minute) . It is simply a matter of imagin- 
ing the relations instead of merely seeing them. 

It is interesting to note that tests n and 12 supply a 
complete confirmation of the results previously obtained 
by means of Burt's test, and which were summarized in 
Chapter II, 4 : " Edith is fairer than Suzanne ; Edith is 



IN THE CHILD in 

darker than Lili. Which is the darkest of the three, 
Edith, Suzanne, or Lili ? " Now this test bearing upon 
colour and our tests n and 12 have exactly the same 
logical structure, viz. the comparison of the middle unit 
of a series of three to the two extreme members of the 
series. We have been criticized however for making use 
of this test of Burt's, for it is one that requires a consider- 
able effort of attention, even on the part of adults, if 
the phenomena which it brings under observation are 
to belong to the psychology of logical relations and not 
merely to the psychology of attention. Our answer 
to this was to point to the facts and to show how once 
the child has read the test often enough, once he has it 
sufficiently engraved upon his mind and difficulties of 
attention no longer exist, the logical difficulty still subsists 
of understanding how a little girl can be at the same time 
fairer than a second and darker than a third. We are 
now, moreover, in a position to give a still better answer 
to prove the child's inability to deal with the logic of 
relations, and that is the answer suggested by tests 
ii and 12, or at least by test n alone. This test is very 
simple from the point of view of attention. To begin with, 
it must be played instead of being spoken, i.e. the child 
has the objects before his eyes as he speaks. In the 
second place and this is most important there is no 
need during the whole of this test for the child to think 
of the three objects at once. He is asked six successive 
questions, which he answers separately : " Is the pencil 
to the left or to the right of the key ? . . . etc." At 
the same time this test has the same logical structure as 
that about the colour of the girl's hair. 

Now the answers obtained were found to be the exact 
equivalents of those obtained by means of the Burt test. 
In the first place, the Burt test is successful on the average 
between the years of 11 and 13, if the child is given time 
to think ; and this age corresponds with that of our tests 
ii and 12. But the analogy is most striking from the 
point of view of the mechanism of the answers. In 



ii2 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

the case of the colours, the child's fallacy (in logical par- 
lance) consists in treating the relations, ' fairer than/ etc. 
as judgments of membership (Edith is fair or dark, 
Suzanne is fair, Lili is dark). Exactly the same thing 
happens in the case of the right and left. The child asserts 
that the coin is to the right and the pencil to the left, but 
these terms are not in any sense relational. Consequently 
in the case of the colours the child does not know what to 
do about Edith she is both fair and dark ! Similarly 
in the present case the child cannot understand how the 
key (the middle object) can be both to the left of the coin 
and to the right of the pencil. He simply states it to be 
' in the middle/ If he is forced to be more precise and is 
made to say whether the key is to the left of the coin, 
he will also say that it is to the left of the pencil. If one 
begins with the pencil, and the child pronounces the key 
to be to the right of the pencil, he will answer the question : 
" Is the key to the left or to the right of the penny ? " 
by saying that the key is also to the right. In a word, the 
key is to the left or to the right in the absolute sense of the 
word, and cannot be both at the same time. Thus the 
analogy is complete between Burt's test and our tests 
ii and 12. The evolution of the ideas of right and left 
is as complex as that of other relative notions, and obeys 
exactly the same laws. 

What conclusion can we draw from these facts ? Do 
they admit of the proposed explanation which consists 
in tracing the non-relational character of childish ideas 
back to the ego-centricity of thought ? It would seem that 
we can. There are three very definite stages in this evolu- 
*ion of right and left. During the first the child places 
himself at his own point of view, during the second at 
the point of others, and during the third at a completely 
relational point of view in which account is taken of objects 
in themselves. The process is therefore precisely that of 
the gradual socialization of thought ego-centrism, social- 
ization, and finally complete objectivity. The curious 
thing is that the three stages are determined by ages 



IN THE CHILD 113 

which happen to correspond to the ages of important 
changes in the child's social life, viz. 7-8, diminution of 
ego-centrism, and 11-12, the stage of rules and of thought 
which has become sufficiently formal to reason from all 
given points of view. Later on we shall show that these 
three stages also mark three phases in the development of 
reasoning properly so-called : ' transduction ', primitive 
deduction, and completed deduction. 

Even if these ages come to be modified by subsequent 
research, the order in which the stages follow on one 
another will remain the same, and this order of succession 
is the only important consideration for general psychology. 

II. SOME DEFINITIONS OF THE IDEAS OF FAMILY 
AND COUNTRY GIVEN BY BOYS BETWEEN SEVEN 

AND TEN. 1 

So far we have been examining the difficulties felt by 
the child in thinking about and handling ideas as appar- 
ently simple in character as those of brother and sister, 
right and left, which difficulties were found to proceed 
from the child's inability at a certain age to grasp the 
relational character of these ideas. The following sections 
though extending over a realm of subjects apparently 
unconnected with the logic of relations will serve never- 
theless as a complementary study. In the family we 
touch upon a notion closely related to that of brother and 
sister ; and we shall see how children come to grips with 
the relational idea of family kinship. In the definition 
of country, town, or district we are faced with difficulties 
arising from the relation of part to whole which is again 
a relation of fundamental importance for the child. 
Finally, between the idea of family and that of countiy 
there are connexions which will appear more or less clearly, 
for both are bound up with the idea of a group or whole. 

We need hardly tell the reader that our enquiry was 
never thought out in so systematic a fashion. Otherwise, 

1 With the collaboration of Mile Lisa Hahnloser. 
H 



H4 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

we might rightly be suspected of having forced the facts. 
On the contrary, our results were obtained, as before, 
through an accident of research. M. Bovet, in search of 
information on the social conceptions of children, had asked 
in the classes for definitions of such words as country, 
family, uncle, cousin, stranger. About 200 children 
between the ages of 8 and 10 answered these questions. 
But instead of answers with affective tone, he obtained 
hardly anything but verbal answers requiring analysis. 
We carried out this analysis on about 30 boys from 7 to 
10 who were examined individually. In the case of each 
definition we followed the line of thought adopted by the 
child, using conversation to get beyond the purely verbal 
character of the process. 

Children's definitions are always interesting, but they 

are not easy to interpret, for all definition is conscious 

realization. Now Claparede's law of conscious realization 

(prise de conscience) tells us that the more automatically 

an idea is handled, the harder is the process of its conscious 

realization. Ask even an educated adult what is the 

difference between ' because ' and ' since ' ! Even though 

he is perfectly capable of assigning different though 

slightly overlapping uses to these terms, this does not 

mean that he can realize the difference straight away. 

And even though children axe perfectly capable of only 

using the words ' uncle ' or ' country ' in sentences which 

make sense, this does not mean that they can define these 

words. That is why, in studying a child's definition, a 

careful distinction should be made between conscious 

realization and the actual idea which the child possessed 

unconsciously in a sense, or at any rate implicitly, but was 

unable to express. 

It is our belief, with this reservation, that the ideas of 
country and family are still verbal between the ages of 
7 and 9. This means that the actual idea which the child 
possesses implicitly and of which he becomes more and more 
aware as he comes to define it, is an idea occasioned by 
adult thought and not by direct or spontaneous experience. 



IN THE CHILD 115 

To put it in another way, the child is constantly hearing 
the words ' country/ ' family/ etc. and he makes them 
correspond to a certain more or less syncretistic schema in 
which he incorporates an image ; and it is not the image 
that has given rise to the schema but conversely. Our 
study will therefore be concerned with verbal intelligence 
and not with concrete or practical intelligence, i.e. that 
which is directly brought into play by observation of the 
external world. 

For by verbal thought we mean the child's faculty for 
adapting himself, not to actual reality, but to the words 
and expressions heard in the mouths of adults and other 
children and through which he tries to imagine reality. 
And just because verbal thought is partly divorced from 
reality, the pedagogue must refrain from cultivating it 
in the child, except with certain necessary precautions. 
But to the psychologist it is of the greatest interest, often 
showing as it does the schematism of the child's thought 
more clearly than in the case of concrete ideas. When 
the child hears the word country, for example, he is free 
to entertain what idea he chooses, and what idea he 
chooses to entertain is far less dependent than one would 
think upon environment. Whatever the child has heard, 
since it is not bound up with any concrete perception, is 
distorted and selected from according to laws of thought 
peculiar to each stage in the child's development. It 
will be sufficient for our purpose if we know exactly what 
we are doing in dealing with verbal thought, and if we 
distinguish this form of mental activity very clearly 
from that which is the direct outcome of perception. 

5. THE FAMILY. It is our intention to show that 
definitions of the family supply a useful counter-test of 
the conclusions of our study of the brother and sister 
relation, in as much as before the age of 10 these definitions 
take no account of the blood-relationship. These defini- 
tions go through three stages. During the first stage 
the child calls family all the people who live with him, 
he is not interested in blood-relationship and defines the 



u6 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

family by the house or the name. In the second stage 
the child makes use of the idea of blood-relationship, 
but limits the family to those members of it who are in 
his immediate vicinity. Finally, in the third stage, the 
definition is generalized so as to include all blood-relations. 

Here are examples of the first stage : 

Bet (age 7) : " It means people who live together in 
the same flat." Uncles and aunts are not in the family. 
Bet questions the fact of the experimenter having a 
family. Jacq (age 7) : " It means people, it means that 
there are lots of people." This definition has the same mean- 
ing as the first. 

Ku (7 ; 7) : A family is " when they are all together. 
Is this a family ? No, when they both have the same family 
name" But cousins and aunts are not in the family 
" because they do not live with us. If your aunt lived with 
you would you say she was in the family ? Yes" 

Bus (8 ; 6) gives the same definition. A cousin does 
not belong to the family. " // he was in the family he 
would live with us. If I lived with you, would I be in 
the family ? Yes" The grandmother is in the family 
" because she used to live with daddy " This last remark 
belongs implicitly to the second stage, although the only 
explicit appeal is to the fact of ' living with/ 

Bon (age 9) denies that his brother is in the family : 
" No, he is in Savoy" Then after a little reflection he widens 
the scope of the family : " He is in the family but he is in 
Savoy" The ' but ' shows clearly that Bon sticks to his 
original conception, otherwise the phrase would have 
no meaning. Bon's grandfather is not in the family 
but in the family of Bon's father, " because when [my 
father] was little he lived with grand-papa" (Same remark 
as Bus.) 

Lev (10 ; 9) defines the family by saying : " They are 
all in the same flat" Then he adds the idea of a common 
name. 

We need not multiply our examples. At this stage the 
child defines the family by the circumstance of living 
together, with or without addition of a clause about a 
common name. Cousins, grandparents, and brothers 
are in the family when they live with the child and not 
otherwise. It must not be thought that children are 



IN THE CHILD 117 

ignorant of blood-relationship. A proof to the contrary 
is to be found in the definitions of the words ' cousin ' 
and ' uncle ' which we asked the children to give and 
which they supplied with varying degrees of generality, 
but always with accuracy : " An uncle is a brother of 
Father's or Mother's, etc." " A cousin is the son of an 
aunt, etc." But just as a child can know of which parents 
his brother is the son and yet not be led to the reciprocity 
of the relation of brother, so in attempting to define his 
family he gets no further than the point of view of the 
moment. Though he knows who are his real relations, 
he calls family only those who are actually near him. 
This realistic line of thought is worth noting, for though 
it does not lead in this case to actual ignorance of relations, 
it does at least explain how by pursuing just some such 
line of thought as this, many of the most serious delusions 
can arise out of childish realism. It will be remembered 
that the correct definition of the word ' brother ' was not 
given till the age of 9. 

During the second stage the idea of relationship inter- 
venes but does not yet supplant the fact of living together. 

Matt (9 ; 3) defines his family: "A father, a mother, 
and children." But neither his father nor his mother 
have a family. " When daddy was little he had a family " 
(Cp. Bon). Mar (9 ; 7) after having defined the family as 
" It is parents/' goes so far as to say that " Daddy isn't 
quite in the family/' 

Viq (age n, backward) : The family " is a group of 
relations. How many are there in your family ? 
Three . . . in my family, tut there can be more. Why 
three ? Those who have dinner together'' 

Chav (12 ; 9, backward) : The family " is a succession of 
people. How many are there in your family ? Four, 
because my sister is away." 

Vo (age 9), speaking about his grandfather, who is 
still living, makes the following remark which is worth 
noting : " He was my mother's daddy." 

Family relationships are therefore not yet thought of 
by the child as independent of time and place. Even 



uS JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

when the child refers explicitly to the idea of relationship, 
at the back of his mind he is still thinking of the family 
from the immediate or realistic point of view. 

Finally, in the third stage the child discards this 
realism and defines the family solely by relationship, 
and at the same time he almost immediately substitutes 
the wider sense of family (grandparents, uncles, aunts 
and cousins) for its narrow denotation (parents and chil- 
dren). 

Pro (age 8, forward) : " It means all the relations 
together.'' Pio (12 ; 3) : It is " a generation" etc. 

In conclusion, this rapid sketch of the evolution of the 
definitions of the family confirms our analysis of the 
brother relation. Owing to his ego-centric habits of 
thought the child does not attempt to go beyond his 
immediate perception of things. The family is thought 
of as the whole collection of people who surround the 
child, independently of the idea of relationship. This 
immediate point of view is realistic in the sense that 
family kinship, not having been separated from the 
circumstances of time and place in which the child is 
living, is not yet conceived in the nature of a relation. 
And this immediate point of view is intimately connected 
with an indifference to existing relations, as has been 
sufficiently emphasized by our study of the brother 
relation. 

As to the nature of this realism, which in this particular 
case seems to be exclusively visual, it looks as though the 
image of the flat or of ' living together ' were the pre- 
dominant factor in the simple definitions we have enumer- 
ated. As a matter of fact, images are always present 
in the child's mind ; but this does not mean that we can 
describe his characteristic realism as visual, without any 
further qualifications. The whole problem is to know 
what the image replaces and what it stands for : causal 
relations, spatial relations, simple juxtaposition of terms 
thought of without synthesis, etc. Now, in the case of the 



IN THE CHILD 119 

family the image, however visual, however remote from 
the logical fact in question (family relationships), is none 
the less comparable to the form of realism which leads 
the child when he is drawing a bicycle, for example, to 
replace spatial relations (symbolizing causal sequence) 
by juxtaposition of the parts which are conceived as 
simply ' going together. 1 In this connexion, to define the 
family by saying " they all go together " is to give proof 
of a realism comparable to the intellectual realism which 
produces juxtaposition in the drawing. 

The ages at which our three different stages are reached 
are approximately 9 for the second and n for the third. 
If subsequent research leaves these ages unaltered, it 
will be desirable to establish synchronisms with the age 
when the brother relation and relations in general are 
properly handled. 

6. COUNTRY. We have often had occasion, inde- 
pendently of the enquiry with which we are concerned 
at present, to ask the school children whom we were 
examining : " Are you Swiss ? " Very frequently the 
answer was as follows : " No, I am Genevan. Then you 
are Swiss ? No, I am Genevan. But your father is 
Swiss ? No, he is Genevan'' We then made it our 
custom to ask : " Are you Genevan ? " But the child, 
even if he comes from Geneva, will sometimes answer : 
" No, I am Swiss." Finally we asked a large number 
of Swiss schoolboys from all the cantons : " Are you 
Genevan (or Vaudois, etc.) ? " then, " Are you Swiss ? " 
or in the reversed order, then, " Can anyone be both 
Swiss and Genevan ? " Up to the age of 9, three-quarters 
of the children denied the possibility of being both Swiss 
and Genevan (or Vaudois, etc.). 

What does this come from ? Is it perhaps due to 
local patriotism ? We never discovered any trace of it. 
Neither the children from Geneva nor those from Neu- 
chatel, the Vaux, the Valais, nor even from Berne showed 
the slightest signs of pride of district. It was not because 



120 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

they had thought about the question that the children 
answered it in the negative. It was simply one that had 
never occurred to them. Often it even struck them as 
eccentric. 

It may be suggested that this was due to ignorance, 
to defective information which would rob such judgments 
of all their interest. And indeed the claim might be 
made that since there is no school teaching as to what 
is meant by Switzerland and the cantons until the age 
of 9-10, the child talks of Switzerland as he would talk 
of China. It is a country that is ' further away.' But 
this is a point for experiment to decide. In certain cases 
(such as we shall meet with in the first stage) this claim 
may be conceded. When this happens, it is always inter- 
esting to ask the child what Switzerland or any other 
country is, just to see how much he has assimilated or 
selected of the snatches of conversation which he may have 
chanced to hear in his family or in the street. But the 
child's answer will be of no direct interest to logic. In 
other cases, however, it is quite obvious that the child 
has some exact information about Switzerland or about 
other countries, but his tendency to deny the possibility 
of being both Swiss and Genevan, survives the information. 
One boy tells us that Switzerland is "all the cantons taken 
together. Then you are in Switzerland ? No." Others 
will know that Geneva is in Switzerland, but deny that 
they themselves are Swiss. This second group of cases is 
therefore by far the more interesting, for we are faced 
here, not with a deficiency in information but with a 
difficulty of schematization. 

The initial difficulty consists in creating a visual repre- 
sentation, a schema with the right connexions ; but even 
when this schema has been attained, the child has still to 
understand how it is that a part inserted into a whole 
really forms part of the whole, and that a man who is 
fixed inside the part remains none the less within the whole. 
The difficulty in question will perhaps be made clearer 
by the answer of this child Bel (9 ; 2), which may serve 



IN THE CHILD 121 

as a prototype. Bel knows that Geneva is in Switzerland 
and that Switzerland is bigger than Geneva, but he 
cannot realize that even though one is in Geneva one is 
nevertheless also in Switzerland. We then draw him a 
large circle containing several small ones, and explain 
that the big circle stands for Switzerland, and that one 
of the little ones stands for Geneva, the other for Vaud, etc. 
and we point out to him that by being in the little circle 
one is also in the big circle. But he has so failed to grasp 
the schema that when we ask him whether anyone can 
be both Genevan and Vaudois he promptly answers yes, 
since both Geneva and Vaud are in Switzerland. 

In short, the child's difficulty arises from the fact that 
he juxtaposes territories but does not connect them. 
He realizes that Geneva is in Switzerland but not that it 
' forms a part J of Switzerland. The difficulty lies in the 
relation of part to whole, and this is our reason for includ- 
ing the question of the definition of the word ' country ' 
in a chapter devoted to the child's use of relations. 

Three stages mark the evolution of the idea of country. 
During the first, country is simply a unit along with 
towns and districts, and of the same magnitude as these. 
Switzerland is therefore alongside of Geneva and Vaud. 
During the second, town and districts are in the country 
but do not form part of it. Thus Switzerland surrounds 
Geneva and Vaud. These are in Switzerland but do 
not really ' form part of ' Switzerland. Finally, in the 
third stage the correct relation is discovered. 

Here are some examples of the first stage : 

Schla (7 ; 11) : A country " is another town/' Le Saleye 
is " a mountain in another town," that is to say " in a big 
village, France, like la Chaux-de-Fonds." Savoy is " a 
smaller village. 33 A town is " a pile of houses." Schla 
seems to give his answers out of pure ignorance. For 
it is the most natural thing for the child, unless he has 
been specially told the contrary, to juxtapose country, 
towns, and villages on the same plane instead of making 
them form part of one another. And the interesting thing 
is that Schla knows how to use the correct verbal formulae : 



122 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

He tells us spontaneously that " A town is part of a 
country." " A country is for travelling. What is there 
in a country? Houses, gardens, trains, trams, people. 
And towns ? Yes. . . . No." 

In other words, Schla has heard enough to form a correct 
schematization. If the idea of part were really under- 
stood by the child, the expression " the town forms part of 
the country " would imply the enclosure of Geneva inside 
Switzerland. But the tendency to juxtaposition is too 
strong, and Schla goes on thinking of Geneva as alongside 
of Switzerland, and of countries as identical with towns. 

Jacq (age 7) comes from Vaud, but thinks that one 
cannot be both Vaudois and Swiss. For him Switzerland 
is a district or a country on a level with Geneva. He 
knows, however, that a canton is bigger than a town. 
Like Schla he can use the correct verbal expressions, 
but fails nevertheless to reach the schematization of part 
and whole. 

Bos (6 ; 9) can say that " Geneva is in Switzerland/' 
but he conceives Geneva, Switzerland, and France as 
juxtaposed cities. Switzerland is "further away'' than 
Geneva. 

Bus (age 8) presents a similar case. He also says that 
Geneva is in Switzerland. We make him a drawing of 
Geneva in the form of a circle and ask him to show us 
where Switzerland is. He then draws another circle 
alongside of the first. Switzerland is also "further away." 

Tie (age 10) is the same. Geneva is in Switzerland 
(but next to it). You cannot be both Genevan and Swiss, 
because the Swiss are " in Switzerland." 

These five examples are significant, as the children in 
question do not err through lack of information. They 
know how to make use of the correct verbal formulae, 
but they translate them into a schema of juxtaposition. 
Of course there are in addition to these all the children 
who do not spontaneously use these formulae, and in 
whom juxtaposition is simply the result of ignorance. 
For this schema is after all the most economical. It would 
even be strange if children were to begin by seeking for 



IN THE CHILD 123 

a hierarchy of part to whole among the units they hear 
named Switzerland, Geneva, Vaud, France, etc., instead 
of simply juxtaposing them so as to make a collection 
of towns, whether contiguous or otherwise. The inter- 
esting thing, however, is that this schematism of juxta- 
position, natural as it is, should be sufficient to hamper 
verbal adaptation in the child, i.e. should prevent him 
from understanding expressions used around him and 
from which he would otherwise have derived correct 
notions of reality. Nearly three-quarters of the children 
at this stage, even if they are not as explicit as Schla, are 
able to say that Geneva "is in Switzerland/' But even 
so, the habit of juxtaposition proves strongest, so that 
Switzerland is imagined as situated " further away " 
than the cantons. 

During the second stage we meet with an even more 
curious conflict between the tendency to juxtaposition 
and the relation of part to whole. Geneva is now definitely 
" in Switzerland/' actually and not merely verbally ; 
only and the interest of the phenomenon lies here 
Geneva does not form part of Switzerland, it is like a piece 
of land enclosed in a foreign country, and one cannot be 
both Genevan and Swiss at the same time. The paradox 
is of course not always as clearly marked, as this, and 
along with the unmistakable cases there are a great many 
that are vague and fluctuating. In the following examples, 
however, the phenomenon is quite obvious. 

Stu (7 ; 8) says that " Geneva is in Switzerland," and 
that " Switzerland is bigger [than Geneva]." But Genevans 
are not Swiss. " Then where must you come from to be 
Swiss ? From Switzerland." We draw a circle represent- 
ing Switzerland, and ask Stu to put the cantons in their 
places. Instead of alongside of it (like Bus) Stu inscribes 
within the circle three or four smaller ones Geneva, 
Vaud, etc., but he still maintains that Genevans axe not 
Swiss people. The Swiss are the inhabitants of the big 
circle. 

Max (9 ; 7) is not familiar with, the nomenclature, and 
makes of a country "a part of a canton/' But even so, 



124 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

it is obvious that he applies the partitive relation to 
countries, at any rate in his language. " It is Switzerland 
at Geneva, no rather Geneva is in Switzerland." But this 
is a purely verbal relation, for Max subsequently denies 
that Genevans are Swiss. We point out the contradiction 
to him: "You thought we were in Switzerland. No, I 
knew we were in Geneva ! " In other words, Geneva may 
be " in Switzerland/' but there is still no genuine hier- 
archy of part to whole. 

Let us recall the very clear case of Bel (9 ; 2) quoted 
at the beginning of this paragraph and belonging to this 
second stage. Bel begins by telling us that he is not 
Swiss but Vaudois. Switzerland "is a country/' Vaud 
" is a canton." A canton, so Bel informs us, " is smaller." 
We draw a large circle for Switzerland and ask Bel to 
draw Geneva and Vaud. He puts two smaller circles 
inside the large one, which so far is correct. " If a man 
is in the canton of Vaud, then he is in Switzerland ? 
Yes. And he is in the canton of Vaud ? No . . oh 
yes, he is [Bel seems to have understood]. Can anyone 
be both Genevan and Vaudois ? Yes, if he is in Geneva 
he is in Switzerland, and if he is in Switzerland he can also 
be Vaudois [pointing to the circle designating Vaud] ! " 
Bel has therefore failed to grasp the relation of part to 
whole. 

Ober (8 ; 2) says he is from Freiburg but is not a Swiss. 
" Do you know what Switzerland is ? The whole country. 
The twenty-two cantons" " Is Geneva in Switzerland ? 
Yes, it is a tiny little country in Switzerland" Ober seems 
to have understood, but he still denies that he is a Swiss. 
" What is a Swiss ? They live in Switzerland. Is Frei- 
burg in Switzerland ? Yes, but I am not Fnbourgeois 
and then Swiss. And those who live in Geneva ? They 
are Genevans. And Swiss ? / don't know. No, its like 
me. I live in Freiburg which is in Switzerland, but I am not 
Swiss. It's the same thing for the Genevans. Do you know 
many Swiss people ? Not many." " Are there any Swiss 
people ? Yes. Where do they live ? I don't know." 

Mey (9 ; 5) : Geneva is in Switzerland, and Switzer- 
land is bigger than Geneva (correct schematization), 
but you cannot be in both at the same time. 

As we have said, the schematization of this second stage 
is naturally not always so clear. It is even probable 
that the obviously visual schematism of the subjects just 



IN THE CHILD 125 

mentioned was occasioned by our questions which is 
not the same thing as to say that it was suggested by them. 
In the unexpressed thought of the child, things seem to 
happen more or less as follows. In the first stage the child, 
having no concrete notion of Switzerland and the towns 
he hears people talking about, simply juxtaposes them. 
At the third stage he grasps the correct notion. Between 
the two stages he learns that Geneva really is in Switzer- 
land and that it belongs to Switzerland. He then estab- 
lishes between Geneva and Switzerland an undifferentiated 
relation which is neither one of part to whole nor properly 
one of possession, but a relation which fluctuates vaguely 
between these two interpretations. It is therefore the 
relation of ' property ' about which we spoke in Chapter 

II (4). 

Finally, it should be recalled that the third stage marks 
the advent of correct schematization. A country, says Wi 
(10 ; 10), is the whole of the cantons, and Geneva forms 
part of Switzerland. One can be Genevan and Swiss at 
the same time. 

7. CONCLUSION. These observations on the schema- 
tism of the idea of a country will enable us to complete 
the conclusions which were adumbrated with regard to the 
notion of family; through them we shall be able to 
examine and check the bond which unites absence 01 
relativity and childish realism. 

In what way, to begin with, does the style of thinking 
which we have been describing reveal difficulties in the 
use of relations ? Obviously in so far as Geneva, though 
conceived as a ' part ' of Switzerland or as situated ' in 
Switzerland ' does not really constitute * a part ' in the 
adult sense of the word. In an earlier work x we have 
endeavoured to show how complicated is the evolution 
of the partitive relation in the child. We did not study 
the partitive relation in itself, i.e. as it is used in concrete 

1 J. Piaget, " Essai snr quelques aspects du dSveloppement de 
la notion de partie chez renfant," Journ. Psych., vol. 8, 1921* 
p> 449, 



126 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

observations through the activity of the mind in percep- 
tion* We confined ourselves, as in the present enquiry 
to the verbal expression of the idea of part, i.e. to that 
decomposition into parts and a whole which is effected by 
the mind with regard to objects which are spoken of but 
not seen. Taking a Burt test and modifying it slightly 
for our purpose we asked the following question : " Jean 
says to his sisters : Part of my flowers are yellow. Then 
he asks them the colour of his posy. Marie says : All 
your flowers are yellow. Simone says : Some of your 
flowers are yellow. And Rose says : None of your 
flowers are yellow. Which of them is right ? " Now 
the curious thing is that most of the boys of 9 and 10 
answered : i That Jean's posy was all yellow ; and 2 
that Marie and Simone were saying the same thing. 
In other words, the expression ' part of ' or ' some of ' 
is not understood. The expression ' part of my flowers ' 
therefore means " my few flowers which form a partial 
posy, or a little posy/' We have here a special sense 
attributed to the preposition ' of * which has already been 
discussed (Chapter II, 4). But we also have something 
more, and this is the point we wish to drive home. We 
have the child's capacity at least on the verbal plane, 
which is the only one that concerns us here of thinking 
of the part independently of the whole, without trying to 
find the whole or to make the partitive relation more 
definite. 

"A part is something that isn't quite whole " (loc. tit., 
p. 466). " A half is something that is cut/' says Ben 
(7 ; i). " And the other half ? It has been thrown away" 
" It means that it [the posy] is half yellow. And the other 
half ? There isn't any more " (p. 467). The posy "is a 
part. And the yellow flowers ? No, it is the part that 
is with the posy '* (p. 471). 

What interpretation are we to put upon these data ? 
They would seem to be due both to an incapacity for 
logical multiplication and to an incapacity for the logic 
of relations. On the one hand, when the child is faced 



IN THE CHILD 127 

with two or more logical classes (in this case a posyx 
yellow flowers) he does not look to see whether they 
interfere, but tends from the first to juxtapose or to 
confuse them (see below, Chap. IV, 2) . On the other hand, 
if this tendency to juxtaposition in preference to multipli- 
cation or interference is so strong, this is due to the child's 
invincible habit of thinking about things absolutely, and 
not in relation to each other. This will show us very 
clearly how dependent is the logic of classes upon that 
of relations. Classes are only snap-shots of the moving 
play of relations. 

These same phenomena recur in connexion with Switzer- 
land. Even the children who define Switzerland as the 
whole of the cantons or as a whole of which Geneva ' is 
a part/ or again as a country ' in which ' Geneva is 
situated, do not grasp the relation of part to whole before 
reaching the third stage. Either the whole is for them an 
abstraction (e.g the case of Rey and especially that of 
Dup who regards Switzerland as smaller than Geneva) ; 
or else it is something less than the sum of the parts, as 
in the opinion of Stu, since he places * the Swiss f in the 
part of the large circle which surrounds the cantons and 
extends beyond them. 

In short, the data we have been analysing clearly reveal 
a tendency to think of the part by itself, though it is 
known to be a part, and to forget the whole, which then 
becomes either an abstraction or another part. The 
same facts meet us if we analyse the development of the 
idea of fraction in the child, and above all, if we analyse 
children's drawings ; the various parts of the same whole 
(manikin, house, motor-car, etc.) are always drawn, 
i.e. conceived independently of the whole, before being 
correctly synthesized. This is a very wide-spread pheno- 
menon, which points once more to that universal tendency 
on the part of the child to avoid relations and to replace 
them by notions that can be thought of in themselves 
as something absolute. 

What are the factors with which this tendency is 



128 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

connected in the particular case before us ? Undoubtedly, 
with that realistic tendency which makes the child take 
his own immediate point of view as the only real one, and 
prevents him from bringing this point of view into relation 
with the experiment. But what is this immediate point 
of view ? It is not visual nor spatial. The children we 
examined seemed to have no geographical interest what- 
ever. Not only were they ignorant of the location of the 
places about which we talked to them, but they had not 
the slightest notion of distances. When one is 7 or 8, 
Africa is not very much farther away from Geneva than 
Switzerland or Lausanne. This lack of interest might even 
serve as an objection to our enquiry, for as a general rule 
it is useless to question children on subjects which do not 
interest them. In such cases the child either answers 
at random or invents. But in this particular case the 
objection is not valid, for countries do interest the child. 
They do so, however, from a point of view which is very 
different from that of spatial realism, and this is just 
what explains the absence of relativity from the child's 
conceptions, and more especially the absence of the rela- 
tion of part to whole. 

This point of view is above all that of nominal and 
artificial realism. What interests the child is the name. 
A large number of children defined a country as " A piece 
of land that has a name" In other words, the same thing 
happens here as in the drawings, where it is also an 
intellectual or even nominal realism that produces juxta- 
position of the pieces and absence of definite spatial 
relations. For example, before reaching the age of 7-8 
the child, when he draws a bicycle, knows that he must 
have ' wheels/ ' pedals/ a ' cord ' or c chain/ a ' little 
wheel/ etc. He is therefore content to draw these side 
by side and to think that these various pieces ' go together/ 
but he does not trouble himself with their mode of contact. 
Since they exist and have a name, they are necessary, 
but there is no need to bother about their reciprocal 
relations* Similarly, in the case of a country : a country 



IN THE CHILD 129 

is really a group of houses and a piece of land which have 
been built and had their boundaries fixed by a ' man ' 
and to which the ' man ' has given a name so as to dis- 
tinguish them from other territories. According to the 
' man's ' good pleasure these countries maintain with 
each other more or less complicated relations of possession. 
And these are the only relations the child has in mind 
when he says that Geneva ' forms part of J Switzerland, or 
' is in ' Switzerland. But by the mere fact of having a 
name, Switzerland exists somewhere, further away, inde- 
pendently of the cantons. The child loves accumulating 
names in his memory (the ' Gex country ' is often put on 
the same level as Switzerland, France, and America), and 
his interest consists not in locating the newly-named 
country nor in thinking of it as really * part * of another 
(even when his verbal expression would seem to indicate 
this), but in conceiving of it as existing anywhere, after 
having been manufactured alongside and at the expense 
of the others. 

Thus, in this particular case, as in many others (e.g. draw- 
ings), the absence of any relation of part to whole corre- 
sponds to the intellectual and nominal realism of the child. 

This is not the place to examine children's ideas on the 
origin of countries, which is a completely different subject, 
but here are a few examples of these conceptions, which 
show how far removed from spatial relations is the interest 
of the child. 

Schla (7 ; n) considers that " France belongs to another 
man [than Switzerland] . And does Switzerland belong to 
a man ? No, yes, to the man who wanted to give us pass- 
ports." According to Stu (7 ; 8) a country is " a big 
fiat surface. What is that ? A drawing. Does it 
really exist ? In earth." According to Froh (age 7) 
building contractors make countries as the need for them 
arises. Pro (age 8) says that you recognize countries by 
their railway stations " because it is written in the stations' 9 
Similarly Cont (age 9), " It is marked [in the stations]. 
And if you walk there ? It is on the roads^ it is marked 
up, there is a sign-post" 



130 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

In a word, just as in regard to his family the child 
made no attempt to get outside his own immediate 
point of view, so here he posits as something absolute 
his purely nominal conception of what is meant by a 
country. He is then led by this nominalistic realism to 
locate a country, not on a spatial plane capable of sus- 
taining the relations of part to whole, but on an imaginary 
plane where things are thought of as absolute in them- 
selves and without relations one to another, or at any 
rate without any beyond such vague and undifferentiated 
relations as those of ' property ' (" this going with that "). 

In the case of country as in that of family, of brothers, 
and of right and left, realism, due to the ego-centric 
habit of sticking to the immediate point of view, entails 
a complete lack of relativity, or what comes to the same 
thing, a complete inability to handle the logic of relations. 

III. CONCLUSIONS 

What conclusions about the child's capacity for reason- 
ing can we draw from these facts ? In the discussion on 
the ideas of brother, of right and left, of family and country 
we were concerned only with the schematism of judgment. 
The task that now confronts us is .the synthesis of all 
this material with the material contained in Chapters 
I and H. 

The chief conclusion of Chapter I was that the child, 
owing to the difficulty he experienced (a difficulty due to 
ego-centrism) in becoming aware of his own thought, 
reasoned only about isolated or particular cases ; general- 
ization and consequently any sustained deduction do not 
come naturally to him. He juxtaposes successive judg- 
ments instead of connecting them, so that there is a lack 
of internal necessity about his thought. Even when the 
child comes to generalize and deduce with less difficulty, 
formal deduction is still a closed book to him, because he 
cannot shake off his personal beliefs nor reason from 
assumptions suggested from the outside. 



IN THE CHILD 131 

Our subsequent study of the judgment of relation gave 
complete confirmation of these results by showing their 
universality from a diiferent angle. 

The conclusion to which we are finally led is this. The 
child does not realize that certain ideas, even such as are 
obviously relative for an adult are relations between at 
least two terms. Thus he does not realize that a brother 
must necessarily be the brother of somebody, that an 
object must necessarily be to the right or left of somebody, 
or that a part must necessarily be part of a whole, but 
thinks of all these notions as existing in themselves, 
absolutely. Or again he defines a family, not by the 
relation of kinship which unites its members, but by the 
space they occupy, by the immediate point of view from 
which he sees them grouped around him in a house. It 
should be noted that such behaviour is universal, and 
that the list of examples might have been added to 
indefinitely. We are indebted, for example, to the kind- 
ness of Mme Passello, a Geneva schoolmistress, for the 
knowledge of the fact that at the age of 7 the notions of 
' friend ' and ' enemy ' are still devoid of relativity. 
An enemy is " a soldier," " someone who fights/' " a 
horrid person" " someone who is horrid/' " someone who 
wants to hurt you" etc. It is therefore not a person who 
is an enemy in relation to someone else, but an enemy 
in himself. Similarly for a friend. 

We discovered innumerable examples of the same kind 
with Mile Hahnloser in connexion with the word 'foreigner'. 
At the age when children can say that foreigners are 
people from another country (about 9-10), they are still 
ignorant of the fact that they are themselves foreigners 
for these people. All the more reason therefore for their 
ignorance of the reciprocity of this relation when the 
term is reserved for people coming from another country 
but living in Geneva. Such examples could be multiplied 
indefinitely. 

M. Reichenbach, schoolmaster at La Chaux-de-Fonds, 
has been kind enough to send us the following observation. 



132 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

Some of his scholars (aged about 10-11) told him that Berne 
was ' in the north ' because the north wind came from 
Berne (which is true at Chaux-de-Fonds). He then asked 
them where the north was for Bale, and where the north 
wind came from at Bale. The children replied unanimously 
that the north wind still came from Berne and that Berne 
was still in the north. We have ourselves observed that 
Parisian school-children of 10 or n still hold that Versailles 
is situated ' to the west ' in an absolute sense, as much to 
the west of Bordeaux as to the west of Paris. And we 
have known children in Geneva who were unable to 
understand how Switzerland could be both north of 
Italy and south of Germany. If it is north it is not south ! 
The points of the compass are absolute values. 

Now such a tendency as this realistic because it is 
ego-centric helps just as much as failure in conscious 
realization of thought, which is equally the outcome of 
ego-centrism, to confine the reasoning process of the 
child to individual or particular cases. For why does 
the inability to become conscious of thought lead to a 
form of reasoning that concerns itself only with individual 
objects? Because, by leaving in the unconscious the 
motives which guide his thought, and the consciousness 
of which alone would lead him to general propositions, 
ego-centrism functioning unconsciously as it inevitably 
must, leads the child to reason about immediate data only, 
about such or such an object given without any relation 
to other objects. And it is obvious that we are led to 
exactly the same result, from another angle by the childish 
realism which we have been examining. Just because he 
fails to grasp the relativity of a notion such as that of 
brother, or of right and left, the child will be unable to 
generalize it. 

This is why he cannot succeed in finding which is the 
darkest of the three little girls who are compared to one 
another by colour relations, nor which is the most to the 
right of the three objects in a row before him. 

Even when he is reasoning about single objects, the 



IN THE CHILD 133 

child cannot generalize relative notions sufficiently to 
apply them to all possible cases. Here again we have a 
spurious generality in place of true generalization. The 
child unconsciously extends his own immediate point of 
view to all possible points of view (realism), instead of 
consciously generalizing a relation which he has conceived 
clearly as relative and reciprocal (relativism). 

Realism is therefore a kind of immediate, illegitimate 
generalization, while relativism is a generalization that 
is mediate and legitimate. 

With regard to generalization then our study of the 
logic of relations confirms that of the logic of classes. 
In both cases the apparent generalization of childish 
logic comes from a particular and immediate schema 
being unconsciously applied to all the objects that will 
more or less fit into it, and in both cases the unconscious 
and uncontrolled character of the application prevents the 
actual formula of the reasoning from extending beyond 
the particular cases. In both cases, in short, the realistic 
or immediate character of the reasoning process prevents 
the establishment of relations and stands in the way of 
generalization. (See note on page 134.) 

In addition to this, childish realism, as opposed to adult 
logic of relations, also leads to a confirmation of the results 
we reached in studying formal reason. We saw there that 
until the age of 11-12 children were incapable of entering 
sufficiently into the point of view of their interlocutors to 
be able to reason correctly about the latter's beliefs, i.e. 
that they were incapable of reasoning from pure assump- 
tions, of reasoning correctly from premisses which they 
did not believe in. Now, this age of 11-12 at which such 
reasoning becomes possible is likewise the age when the 
relations of brother and of right and left are beginning 
to be completely mastered. This may be more than a mere 
coincidence, for the mastery in both cases has the same 
trait desubjectivation of thought and the power to see 
relations as such and handle them' in an objective manner. 

Our study of the logic of relations thus confirms that 



134 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

of the logic of classes and of more general logical relations. 
Both of them show that the thought of the child passes 
from a state of ego-centric immediacy, in which single 
objects only are known and thought of absolutely, and 
made to bear no relation to one another, to a state of 
objective relativism in which the mind extracts from these 
objects innumerable relations capable of bringing about 
the generalization of propositions and reciprocity of 
different points of view. 

We shall return to these conclusions in greater detail 
in the following chapter and from a new angle. Chapter I, 
by showing us how the child juxtaposes his judgments, 
instead of making them employ one another, made it clear 
that childish logic is lacking in necessity. Chapters II and 
III, by showing the child's inability to handle the logic 
of relations, led us to the very root of this defect. It is 
because he fails to grasp the reciprocity existing between 
different points of view that the child is unable to handle 
relations properly. We have yet to show the inner struc- 
ture of a mind whose thought is ignorant both of logical 
necessity and of the logic of relations. We shall see that 
necessity and reciprocity constitute an essential character 
of logical thought its reversibility. We shall therefore 
endeavour to show that the most general character of 
reasoning in the child is what may be called its irreversi- 
bility. 

M. Claparfcde has achieved the following remarkable formula for 
the conscious realization of unconscious schemas : " En r^alite" nous 
constatons un double mouvement : de la generalisation implicite et 
inconsciente a 1'individualisation inconsciente ou consciente : puis 
de cette individualisation a la generalisation consciente." Arch, de 
Psych., Vol. XVII, 1919, p. 77. 



CHAPTER IV 
HOW THE CHILD REASONS 

IN the foregoing chapters we have tried to emphasize 
certain features in the structure of childish judgment by 
dissociating ourselves as much as we could from the 
usual framework of the logical text-books. For it is not 
by taking the ready-made schema of adult reasoning 
(and of explicit scientific or legal reasoning at that) and 
by submitting this schema to, say, syllogistic tests so as 
to see whether the child conforms to our practical and 
scholastic habits of thought, that we shall succeed in 
finding the true nature of child logic. It is rather in 
connexion with certain problems raised by the child him- 
self, in connexion with his language, and especially with 
the evolution of the meaning which he attaches to certain 
expressions of logical relation (conjunctions, relational 
substantives, prepositions, etc.) that the most significant 
and the most unforeseen features will be discovered. 
But a certain looseness inevitably attaches to this indirect 
method, and after three preliminary studies we are left 
with very fragmentary results which would have to be 
classified and interpreted in the light of fresh facts in 
order to yield the outline of a psychology of childish 
reasoning. 

We made no special enquiry into the structure of 
reasoning in children for the obvious reason that any 
direct method of investigation would have been artificial, 
seeing that we knew neither what we were looking for 
nor in what terms to state the problem. The only legiti- 

185 



136 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

mate method, at least in the beginning, is the indirect one, 
viz. the comparison of results collected on the spot in 
our previous or in any other enquiries. Our materials 
will therefore be taken partly from preceding chapters of 
this book, partly from documents compiled in view of a 
study of children's ideas (physical causality, idea of force, 
animism, etc.) or of the development of the idea of number. 
These studies are unfortunately neither published nor 
even completed. We shall collect them into one or two 
volumes devoted to the contents and not to the structure of 
child thought. It is regrettable no doubt that we should 
have to anticipate by referring to childish reasoning 
about causality although we repeat it our concern is 
solely with the structure of children's reasoning not with 
the content of their ideas. But in the first place we 
should have been depriving ourselves of interesting data 
by eliminating such useful observations for the description 
of childish reasoning, and in the second place we should, 
by publishing a study of the ideas of children before 
showing how children reason, have been guilty of an even 
graver mistake, for such a reversal in the order of exposi- 
tion would have undermined any actual understanding 
of our material. All we ask of the reader is that he will 
take our word for the generality of the facts to which we 
shall refer later on. 

The course we intend to adopt is as follows. In the 
first section we shall try to show the difficulty experienced 
by the child in becoming conscious of his own thought 
(thus verifying the results obtained in Chap. I). The 
second section will describe one of the consequences 
of this by showing the difficulty which children have in 
giving definitions or in handling logical addition and multi- 
plication. In a third section the following important 
deduction will be made : children do not know how to 
avoid contradicting themselves nor do they wish to do so. 
Finally, we shall attack the question of the actual nature 
of childish reasoning, or, as it has been called; of ' trans- 
duction.' 



IN THE CHILD 137 

i. Is THE CHILD CAPABLE OF INTROSPECTION ? * 
The fact that the child thought is less conscious of itself 
than is ours has already been hinted at in Chapter I. 
For ego-centrism of thought necessarily entails a certain 
degree of unconsciousness. Anyone who thinks for him- 
self exclusively and is consequently in a perpetual state 
of belief, i.e. of confidence in his own ideas will naturally 
not trouble himself about the reasons and motives which 
have guided his reasoning process. Only under the pressure 
of argument and opposition will he seek to justify himself 
in the eyes of others and thus acquire the habit of watch- 
ing himself think, i.e. of constantly detecting the motives 
which are guiding him in the direction he is pursuing. 

Is it possible to go beyond these simple assumptions 
and to show by means of an appropriate technique the 
capacity for introspection of which the child gives proof 
at the different stages of his development ? Theoretically, 
it can be done by any test of reasoning. It is sufficient 
after the child has given his answer whether right or 
wrong it is of no matter from the point of view of intro- 
spection to ask him : " How did you find that out ? " 
or " What did you think so as to find that out ? " In 
practice, nothing is so well fitted for this study of childish 
introspection as simple problems of arithmetical reasoning. 
On the one hand the adult will see by the child's answer 
what line he has followed in his reasoning (which are the 
operations that have taken place), and on the other hand 
introspection does not require any considerable verbal 
facility on the part of the child, since it is sufficient for 
him to say : " I took that away " or " I added that/' 

Now what struck us in studying some fifty boys between 
7 to 10 by means of these little arithmetical problems, 
spoken or treated as a game, was the child's initial diffi- 

1 In collaboration with Mile Marcelle Roud. Some of the following 
pages have been written by Mile Roud, and are based on material 
which we collected together in view of a study on the notion of fraction 
and of elementary arithmetical operations. This study will appear in 
a future volume, and remains independent of any remarks which we 
shall make about children's capacity for introspection. 



138 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

culty in telling us how he obtained a solution (whether 
right or wrong is of no importance here). Either the child 
is incapable of retracing the steps he has taken, or else after 
the operation is over he invents an artificial series of steps 
and becomes the dupe of illusions concerning the perspec- 
tive of his own thought, taking as the starting-point what 
was really the final goal. In a word, everything happens 
as though the child reasoned in the same way as we do 
ourselves when we solve a purely empirical and partly 
manual problem (a puzzle, a trick-box), viz., when we 
are conscious of each result (failure or partial success) 
but do not direct or control our movements, and above all, 
are incapable either by introspection or by retrospection 
of recapturing the successive steps which our mind has 
taken. Of course we only came upon this difficulty of 
introspection in the child indirectly. Our aim being at 
first solely the study of the notion of number, we asked 
the children what steps they had taken to obtain each 
of their answers, and this was all the more necessary 
as the answer was often incorrect, and we had at first some 
difficulty in grasping what it was. For the children 
would recount their own reasoning process in so fanciful 
a manner, so totally unfitted to throw any light upon 
what had really taken place in their minds, that we were 
thus led indirectly to ask the question in the slightly 
biassed form which we have given it above. 

Before turning to the facts we must distinguish between 
two phenomena, one of which undoubtedly gives rise 
to the other, but which must nevertheless be kept 
strictly apart. We mean difficulty in introspection and 
difficulty in giving a logical reason. When we ask : 
"Why do you say 5 ? " of someone who has given that 
answer to the question : "It takes 20 minutes to walk from 
here to X. Bicycling is 4 times as fast. How much is 
that ? " the answer may be : " Because I divided 20 by 
4 " or " A quarter of 20 is 5." In the first case the speaker 
limits himself to an account of -syhat he has done, to a 
retrospective view of Ms own reasoning process. In the 



IN THE CHILD 139 

second case he gives the logical reason. When we maintain 
that children cannot make their own reasoning process 
the object of introspection, all we mean to say is that 
it is extremely difficult for them to give an account of 
the psychological ' how ' of this process, quite inde- 
pendently from the question whether or not they can give 
a logical reason for the result they have obtained. But we 
shall see (as was hinted at in Chapter I) that is just this un- 
conscious attitude towards his own thought which explains 
the child's difficulties in dealing with logical justification. 

To turn to the facts. Three stages can be distinguished 
in the evolution of childish introspection. During the 
first the child, if he is presented with an easy question, 
immediately finds the answer by quasi-automatic adapta- 
tion, but is incapable of saying how it was done. During 
the second, the child has to search and grope for the 
solution, but he is still incapable of retrospection or even 
of immediate introspection. During the third stage 
introspection becomes possible. 

Here are examples of the first two types. We give them 
as they come (though they may later on be subjected to 
a rough classification, for each partakes of several types, 
and it would be arbitrary to make the divisions too rigid). 
Thus the answer is sometimes immediate (ist stage), with 
or without manual operation, sometimes it requires pro- 
longed fumbling (2nd stage), either manual or mental 

Weng (age 7) : " This table is 4 metres long. This one 
three times as long. How many metres long is it ? 
12 metres. How (fid you do that ? I added 2 and 2 
and 2 and 2 and 2 always 2. Why 2 ? So as to make 
12. Why did you take 2 ? So as not to take 
another number." " This window is 4 metres high. 
Another window half as high would be how many metres ? 
2 metres. How did you do that ? I took away the 
other 2V (t Here are 12 matches. Make me a pile three 
times as small/' After fumbling about a little, Weng 
makes a pile of 10 matches (by subtraction: 12 3, 
with a mistake of calculation into the bargain). " How 
did you find 10 ? / added 4 and 4 and 2." 



140 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

This case of Weng's is very typical. Weng gets the 
result automatically. When he is asked how he found 
it, he starts from the result and reconstructs it anyhow, 
by means of any arbitrary expedient. Unable to recover 
his own reasoning process he invents a device which will 
somehow lead to the same result. 

With other children the retrospective description given 
of their own reasoning also presupposes the result, but the 
description is better : 

Ferr (age 8) : "There are 10 matches here, and there, 
three times as many. How many are there there ? 
40 : There, there are 10, and there are three times as many. 
How did you find that out ? / counted 10, 20, 30, 40." 
" Here are 20 matches. There, there are twice as many. 
60. Why 60 ? I counted/' " A wall is 12 metres high. 
Another wall is twice as small ? That makes 9 ... I 
counted up to 9." 

Gath (age 7) : " You are 3 little boys and are given 
9 apples. How many will you each have ? 3 each. 
How did you do that ? / tried to think. What ? 
I tried to think how much it would be. I tried to think in my 
head. What did you say in your head ? I counted. 
What did you count in your head? ..." Gath only 
gives answers like " I guessed, I counted.' 1 " I tried to see 
how much it was and I found 3." With practice, however, 
he begins to see what is wanted. Only the first intro- 
spections he gives us manifestly reverse the actual order 
of things and presuppose the result obtained : "It takes 
me 20 minutes to walk to Carouge. I go twice as fast on a 
bicycle. That will be ? You'll take 10 minutes. How 
did you do that ? I took away 10. Why 10 ? To find 
out. Why did you take away 10 ? Because there were 
20. Why 10 ? Because it takes you 2 minutes longer 
(=twice as fast)." 

Here are some more examples : 

Bel (9 ; 2) : " It takes you 50 minutes to walk to 
Carouge. On a bicycle you get there five times quicker. 
How long does it take you on a bicycle ? 45 minutes. 
How did you count ? I said 50 minus 5, then I went 
down to 40 and I saw it was 45." Spie (9 ; 3) gives 25 in 
answer to the same problem, but cannot explain how he 
has done it : "I can't explain, but I know how to count, 



IN THE CHILD 141 

it's easy, but not to tell anyone." As a matter of fact he 
has, like many of the other children, simply taken half 
of 50. Mey (9 ; 5) answers 35 and maintains that he 
found 35 because he said to himself : 5 x 7 =35. Tree 
(9 ; 6) gives 10 as an answer (dividing 50 by 5). "How 
did you find 10 ? \ of 5 is i, then I added an o. 
Why? . . ." 

Thus in no case is the child able to explain what he was 
looking for nor what he did to find his answer. Instead 
of giving an accurate retrospect he starts from the result 
he has obtained as though he had known it in advance 
and then gives a more or less arbitrary method for 
finding it again. 

But we have every right to be suspicious of these answers. 
They are obviously fanciful. Either they show that 
the child does not know how to handle introspection and 
therefore answers just as he pleases, or else they prove 
that he has not understood what was required of him. 
Sometimes, for example, the child will imagine that he is 
being asked a school question on arithmetic, and proceeds 
to recite additions or to produce devices for the simplifica- 
tion of difficult multiplication, e.g. to find 4x6 you take 
(4x3) + (4x3). The only way of being sure that the 
answers in question are genuine examples of faulty 
introspection is to take cases where the child is obviously 
his own dupe, or rather the victim of an illusion in 
mental perspective, taking systematically as a point of 
departure what is the result of his calculation. 

Here are such cases. 

Bis (9 ; 6) : " One little boat costs 3 francs. How 
many could you buy with 18 francs ? 6. How did you 
get at 6 ? I did 3 times, I did 6 times 3. ... [He is 
therefore taking the result as a starting-point, instead of 
saying * I divided 18 francs into 3.'] I counted, and then 
I found that it made 6. . . .," etc. Only at the end of a 
long discussion does Bis declare : " I looked to see how 
much it would be to go up to 18." Thus, in attempting to 
gain a retrospect of his reasoning, Bis has thoroughly 
inverted its order. 



142 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

Bon (9 ; 6) presents an even clearer case, for we heard 
him counting to himself. We asked him to find three- 
quarters of 16 matches. He then mutters to himself : 
"A quarter of 16=4; 3x4=12," and hands us the 
matches with the answer : " 12. How did you find 12 ? 
/ said 4 times 3 =12. To go up to 16 makes 4. I took 4 
[matches from the pile of 16] and I gave back the rest." 
Bon has therefore completely reversed the correct process 
which he had muttered to himself and presents us with 
a line of reasoning devoid of logical direction. 

There is no need to add any more of these examples, 
for they are all alike. It will be sufficient for our purpose 
to arrange them according to the following schematiza- 
tion. During the first stage or at least when he first 
attempts to handle a notion, the child either fumbles with 
his fingers, as when he tries to divide a pile of matches 
into two halves, or else applies automatically the ideas 
resulting from these manual operations. In both cases 
reasoning consists of a succession of operations either 
manual or mental, but neither of them directed by a mental 
process that is entirely conscious. In such cases, of course, 
introspection is not possible. During the second stage 
the problem becomes more difficult, and instead of being 
solved by automatic adaptation, it calls for a certain direc- 
tion of thought and control of judgment. But it is a 
question not only of reasoning, but of reflecting on one's 
reasoning, or of relating it, which comes to the same thing, 
since all reflection is a narrative told mentally to oneself ; 
and here again we find introspection to be deficient. Either 
the child remembers only a few terms of his reasoning, 
and then combines them as best he can, arbitrarily and 
regardless of gaps and additions, or else he reverses the 
whole process, starting from the conclusion and arguing 
towards the premisses as though he had known from the 
first whither these premisses were leading him. Finally 
comes the third stage in which introspection enables him 
to reflect upon the whole course of his reasoning. 

When does this third stage appear ? It is hard to say, 
because estimates of this kind depend upon such delicate 



IN THE CHILD 143 

shades of distinction. Nor should the reader take things 
too literally and conclude from our examples that childish 
reasoning is unconscious. From 7 onwards we find cases 
of first-rate introspection. 

Hour (7 ; 10) : " It takes you 50 minutes to walk to 
Carouge. Bicycling you go 5 times as fast, so that would 
take ? It doesn't take a minute. Why ? 50 minus 5 
times [50], 50 minus 50 makes o." (This is the definition 
which several children give of the expression " x times 
less/' Whether the definition is correct need not concern 
us here.) 

Ober (age 8) gives 25, then 45 in answer to the same 
question : " How did you do that ? / took 25 from 50, no 
5, then 5 times as fast would be 45. I thought of taking 25 
from 5. . . . / took half of 50 / " 

Any statistical treatment of our material would be 
misleading, as the types under observation are not suffi- 
ciently pronounced, but we may say in conclusion that 
up to the age of 7, introspection seems to be completely 
absent, and that from 7-8 until 11-12 there is a consistent 
effort on the part of thought to become more and more 
conscious of itself. 

The question may now be raised as to the causes and 
the consequences of the difficulties which the child 
experiences in knowing the motives and directions of 
his own thought. The explanation is simple. M. Clapa- 
rede has shown in a remarkable contribution to the subject l 
that we become aware of the relations which have been 
woven into the texture of things by our action in so far 
as automatic usage fails, and some new mode of adaptation 
is forced upon us. The child cannot express the relations 
of resemblance between a bee and a fly, for example, 
although he is perfectly conscious of the differences 
between them. This is because when in relation to the 
bee he goes through reactions which he has acquired in 
relation to the fly, he is only performing an automatic 

1 Ed. Claparede, " La conscience de la ressemblance et la difference 
Chez 1'enfant," Arch, de Psych. t VoL XVII. 



144 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

act which requires no conscious realization, whereas when 
he reacts differently in response to a special feature (the 
discovery one day of yellow flies which he has heard 
people call 'bees'), his experience is not automatic and 
consequently entails a certain degree of consciousness. 
The ' law of conscious realization/ as M. Claparede calls 
it, can therefore explain why introspection is so difficult 
for the child. For introspection is really a variant of 
conscious realization, or rather it is conscious realization 
in the second degree. And if we try to generalize Clapa- 
rede's law we are inevitably led to the view that the things 
which call forth a new adaptation on our part, and which 
consequently excite consciousness in us are always changes 
occurring in the external world in contrast to the inner 
vagaries of mental activity. If the difference between 
objects strikes us sooner than their resemblance it is 
because their resemblance is subjective, it is the product 
of our own thought, or rather of the identity of our 
reaction to these objects. Difference, on the other hand, 
is objective, i.e. is given by the things themselves. From 
this angle it becomes obvious that all introspection is 
extremely difficult, for it requires that we should be con- 
scious not only of the relations which our thought has 
woven, but of the actual activity of thought itself. If 
consciousness is directed entirely to the unadapted, the 
new, its exclusive focus will necessarily be the external 
world and not thought as such. 

Now the ego-centric character of childish thought only 
reinforces these circumstances which are already important 
for the adult. Never without the shock of contact 
with the thought of others and the effort of reflection 
which this shock entails would thought as such come to 
be conscious of itself. 

Let us now turn to an examination of the consequences 
of this inborn unconsciousness of thought towards itself. 
They are numerous, and this is why we opened this chapter, 
which is devoted to the psychology of childish reasoning,' 
with a section on the difficulties of introspection. For 



IN THE CHILD 145 

subconscious thought is i far less inclined to reasoning 
and more allied to action than is ours, and 2 much further 
removed than ours from the need for logical justification 
and the deduction of judgments one from the other. 

The first point is of the utmost importance, but it is 
very difficult to deal with, because of the poverty of the 
existing psychological vocabulary. We shall therefore 
be as brief as possible. What is thought which has little 
or no consciousness of itself ? Can one really speak of 
unconscious reasoning ? To our mind, if the greatest 
ambiguity is to be avoided, it must be allowed that 
unconscious thought merges into action. An unconscious 
thought is a series of operations, not actual but potential, 
not manually performed but none the less outlined in the 
organism. Ribot's view that this unconscious life can be 
resolved into movements is the most intelligible that has 
yet been put forward. These movements and operations 
are a preparation for conscious reasoning in so far as 
they reproduce and prepare anew the manual operations 
of which thought is a continuation. They obey, more- 
over, a logic of their own in that they do not merely 
reproduce previous actions, but recombine them according 
to special laws (the Pleasure principle or Lustprinzip as 
regards dreams, laws of economy and assimilation 
between various operations, etc.). But to attribute logical 
implications to these movements, to say that their func- 
tioning is controlled, in short to assign to them all the 
features of spoken and fully conscious thought would be 
to take a wholly unwarrantable step. Thus the only 
kind of implication of which we can talk in connexion 
with subconscious thought is one which merges into the 
determinism which unites one action to another; it is 
internal and of a nature intermediate between physical 
and logical necessity; we may call it psychological or 
mental necessity. 

So that everything we have said in this work to show 
that the thought of the child is less conscious than ours 
has ipso facto led us to the conclusion that childish 

K 



I 4 6 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

thought is devoid of logical necessity and genuine implica- 
tion ; it is nearer to action than ours, and consists 
simply of mentally pictured manual operations, which, 
like the vagaries of movement, follow each other without 
any necessary connexion. This will explain later on why 
childish reasoning is neither deductive nor inductive ; 
it consists in mental ' experiments ' which are non- 
reversible, i.e. which are not entirely logical and not sub- 
ject to the principle of contradiction. 

Our second remark in connexion with the child's diffi- 
culties in conscious realization was that for a type of 
thought that is not conscious of itself logical justification is 
impossible. This view has already been argued in Chapter I. 
We saw how hard it was for the child to find a logical 
reason for the judgments he expresses. Either he gives up 
the attempt to justify them logically and gives a psycho- 
logical motive, where only an intellectual reason would be 
in place, or else he tries to justify his statements, but for 
lack of having consciously realized the factors which 
guided his thought, he succeeds in giving only a very 
incomplete logical justification. The reason for this is 
n<*w apparent. The logical justification of a judgment 
takes place on a different plane from the invention of 
this judgment. Whereas the latter is the unconscious 
result of previous experiences^ the former requires reflection 
and thought, in a word introspection which will construct 
on top of spontaneous thought a ' thinking about thinking ' 
which alone is capable of logical necessity. The proof of 
this is that among the children quoted above, those who 
were incapable of introspection were also those who were 
prepared to give a fantastic and illogical justification of 
any of their statements (Weng, Gath, Tiec), whereas 
those more skilled in introspection also showed greater 
aptitude for demonstration (Mour and Ober). 

2. THE DEFINITIONS AND CONCEPTS OF CHILDREN ; 
LOGICAL ADDITION AND MULTIPLICATION. We do not 
propose to deal with the problem of children's definitions 



IN THE CHILD 147 

by itself. We shall merely discuss it, in so far as it touches 
upon the problem which we have set ourselves in the last 
section, and especially in so far as the subject of definitions 
serves as an introduction to the study of elementary logical 
operations (logical addition and multiplication) and con- 
sequently to the discussion of the problem of contradiction. 

With regard to the first point, if children really have 
consistent difficulty in grasping the progress of their own 
reasoning by means of introspection, they must experi- 
ence the same difficulty in giving definitions, at any rate 
exhaustive definitions ; for from the psychological point 
of view, definition is the conscious realization of the use 
which one makes of a word or a concept in the course of 
a process of reasoning. In this connexion the stage which 
will interest us most, i.e. during which this difficulty will 
be most apparent is the stage beginning at 7-8 and which 
marks the first appearance of logical definition. 

Previous to this stage, i.e. up to the age of 8, inclusively 
according to Binet and Simon, 1 exclusively according to 
Terman, children are either incapable of defining, and 
simply point to the objects or repeat the word to be 
defined (a table ... is a table), or else they define 
things '* by their uses." Thus, when the child is asked, 
" What is a fork ? " he answers : " It is to eat with." 
" What is a mother ? . . . For cooking the dinner. What 
is a snail ? It is to crush." Constantly in the course of 
our enquiries we came across definitions of this type, 
characterized by the words ' it's for/ A mountain, " It's 
for climbing on to", a country, "It's for travelling", 
rain " It's for watering" etc. The reader will readily per- 
ceive that such a method of definition is prior to any 
logical habits of thought if he refers to our analysis of 
precausality (L.T., Chap. V). For to the question : 
" What is it ? " as to the question ' Why ' ? the child 
gives an answer which is neither causal nor physical 
(rain is the result of . . .) nor logical, viz., i.e. an answer 

1 Binet, A., et Simon, Th., La mesure du developpement de Vintelli- 
gence chez les jeunes enfants, Paris, 



148 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

which will define the concept by the use to which it is 
put in a sentence (rain is water that falls from the sky). 
The answer he gives is equally far removed from physical 
causality as it is from logical definition, and appeals to a 
notion situated midway between these two extremes viz. 
to the notion of motive or utility : " Rain is for watering." 
Definition by usage, like the abundance of ' whys ' which-4s 
contemporary with it, is therefore really a sign of the phen- 
omenon of precausality, or what comes to the same thing, 
of an interest which is midway between the psychical 
and the physical. Thus the real nature of an object lies 
neither in its physical cause, nor in the concept one has of 
it, but in a reason or in a motive for its existence which 
imply both a directing intelligence and a physical realiza- 
tion. At this stage clearly there can be no question of 
making the child conscious of logical definition, i.e. 
of the use which he has made of a concept in his reasoning. 
Thought at this stage remains entirely realistic ; the mind 
projects it into things and confuses it with them. Owing 
to the phenomenon of precausality the child will be 
unable to distinguish between concept and object, since 
things do not yet form an independent order but are still 
permeated with intention and finalism. Or to put it in 
another way the child will fail to distinguish between 
logical justification (since all definition whether logical 
or conceptual, consists in a justification of the use made 
of a concept in reasoning) from explanation. For explana- 
tion at the precausal stage is still harnessed to justifica- 
tion and not yet differentiated from it. So that, unable 
to distinguish between justification and explanation, the 
child is consequently debarred from consciously realizing 
what use he is making of a concept in his reasoning : 
hence the absence of logical definitions at this stage. 

After the age of 7-8, on the contrary, as the decline 
of precausality sets in, the child begins to distinguish 
thought from things, and logical justification from causal 
explanation ; from this moment he begins to be conscious 
of his reasoning process as it unfolds itself. At this age 



IN THE CHILD 149 

we meet with the first logical definitions, i.e. definitions 
according to the formula by genus and specific difference 
(e.g. A mother is a lady who has children). When these 
definitions are perfect and exhaustive they presuppose 
conscious knowledge i of a ^eneral proposition (" All 
mothers are ladies ") ; and 2 of an interference or 
' multiplication ' of two general propositions (All ladies 
are not mothers, nor are all people with children mothers 
mothers therefore entail the interference of these two 
conditions). But these logical definitions do not appear 
in perfected form from the beginning. At first and up till 
the age of about 11-12 the child is incapable of giving 
exhaustive definitions : he simply defines by the genus 
(A mother is a lady), or by a feature that is particular but 
not specific (A cousin is the son of an aunt or an uncle) 
without generalization of the notion. 1 If the reader will 
recall the conclusions we reached in Chapter I, showing that 
the child is for a long time incapable of reasoning about 
general propositions, and the conclusions of Chapters II 
and III showing that the child always forms his judgments 
from an immediate and ego-centric point of view which 
makes him incapable of grasping the relativity of ideas 
to the extent of being able to generalize them, the state- 
ments we are now making about children's definitions 
will seem perfectly natural to him. We are drawing atten- 
tion to these facts again in order to show how they arise 
from the difficulties which occur when children introspect, 
and to what incessant contradictions they lead when 
children reason. For if, on the one hand, children are 
incapable of exhaustive logical definitions, this is because 
they are not conscious of the meaning which they assign 
to the concepts and words which they use, and on the 
other hand this unconsciousness is what involves them 
in incessant contradiction. For if the child were conscious 
of the meaning of a given word he would ipso facto transfer 
this meaning to the plane of reflection where it would 

1 Cf. L'intermSdiaire de$ Educateurs, Vol. I, pp. 69-75 (1913). M. Bovet 
places definitions by genus only chiefly at the age of 9. 



150 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

acquire a fixity that would admit of generalization. 
But so long as the meaning is only implicit it remains 
subject to all the fluctuations of subconscious thought, 
i.e. to all the particular and irreversible cases of pure 
action or of elementary ' mental experiments/ 

The first of these two phenomena shows with particular 
clearness in definitions of such notions as ' alive ' or 
' strong ' (force), concepts which the child frequently uses 
in his spontaneous questions and explanations. We have 
already shown (L.T., Chap. V) the importance of questions 
about life and death, and no very searching enquiry need be 
made to see that in his explanations of how boats float on 
the water, how motors move along the road, how trains 
run, how bodies act mechanically on each other, how 
rivers flow, etc. the child is constantly invoking the idea 
of ' force ' : a pebble has ' force/ the wind has ' force/ 
The question may therefore be raised whether the children 
who spontaneously use these ideas realize the meaning 
which they themselves attach to them. For this reason 
we have undertaken, with the help of certain ladies, a 
systematic enquiry into the nature of childish animism and 
the idea of force. Our results will be published later on 
from the point of view of the ideas themselves, i.e. of 
the contents of the thoughts. But without prejudicing 
the result of our labour by dealing with these ideas as such, 
we can nevertheless draw conclusions from them which 
are essential not to their contents but to their form, i.e. 
to the manner in which children define to themselves the 
notions of which they made use in their talk. 1 

Naturally, there is no question of asking the children : 
" What is life ? " or even " What does ' being alive * 
mean ? " This would be to expect them to possess the 
power of making abstractions, and it would be absurd to 
conclude from the lack of such power to the inability to 

1 The examples which, follow are taken from, a study of animism 
in collaboration with Miles H. Kraft and S. Ferret and from a study 
on the idea of force in collaboration with Mile J. Guex and Mme V. J. 
Piaget. These studies will appear in a later volume. 



IN THE CHILD 151 

be conscious of meanings and to give definitions. The 
following method, on the contrary, raises no such diffi- 
culties. You give the child a list of familiar objects, 
asking about each in turn, "Is it alive ? " and adding 
after the affirmative or negative reply, " Why is it (or 
is it not) alive ? " The only thing to avoid is suggestion 
by perseveration. In view of this it is best to begin with 
objects that are obviously alive or obviously inanimate, 
and then only after making sure whether there is or is not 
a definite systematization in the child's mind, can he be 
questioned about objects which strike him as doubtful. 
The order to be observed is therefore roughly as follows : 
a dog, a fish, a fly, then a pebble, a table, a bench, then 
the sun, the moon, the clouds, the rivers, fire, wind, a 
marble, a bicycle, a train, a boat, etc. 

Now in using this method which seems to call only for 
a very limited power of abstraction, the following pheno- 
menon immediately becomes apparent. The child cannot 
define the idea which he has of the words ' to be alive/ 
or to put it differently, he assigns life to the sun and 
denies it, say, to a boat. He is not conscious of the 
apparently consistent meaning which he attributes to the 
concept ' life/ One group of children, for example, 
confine the word ' alive ' to everything that seems animated 
by its own movements, thus excluding from the category 
of living beings objects to whom movement has been 
communicated. But these children will not be able to 
express this condition, to say, for example, that the sun 
is alive ' because it moves by itself/ It is we who grope 
towards the discovery of the child's unconscious intention 
and sometimes succeed in making him indirectly own to 
it. Left to himself the child will simply say ' because it 
moves ' and will be greatly perplexed when he has to 
explain why a motor-car, which also moves, is not alive. 1 

1 We say nothing here on the subject of childish animism. The fact 
of children saying that the sun is alive does not mean that they also 
attribute to it consciousness and intention. A far more delicate method 
is required to detect the features of animism in the child. 



152 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

This will show that the difficulties bound up even with 
implicit definition are closely related to what we saw 
(Chap. I) of the child's inability to give complete logical 
justifications or reasons. 
Here are some examples. 

Grand (age 8) assigns the quality of being ' alive ' to 
fishes " because they swim," to flowers " because they grow" 
to the moon " because it comes back in the evening" to 
the wind " because it can blow" to fire " because it burns" 
but he denies it to clouds, bicycles and watches, etc, 
When we came to analyse some of Grand's answers, 
such as this one : " Water is not alive, it hasn't got any 
hands, it can't run on the grass" and especially when we 
compare his answers with most of those given by children 
of his age, we see that he regards as living those objects 
which have a movement of their own, whereas he denies 
this quality to clouds, because they are driven along by 
God, to machines because they are worked by men, to 
rivers because their movement is regulated by the slope 
of their bed and especially by their banks, etc. But the 
interesting point is that Grand is not conscious of this 
implicit conception. When he explains why certain 
objects are alive, Grand certainly says that they move 
(they swim, fly, blow, come back, drive along), but never 
that they move ' by themselves.' In his explanations of 
why certain objects are not alive, however, Grand has no 
fixed definition at his service. He says of clouds that they 
are not alive " because they don't move" but he admits 
that they very often do move. In Grand's language 
then " They don't move " obviously means " They don't 
move by themselves," " The wind makes them move/' 
etc. But he is not explicitly conscious of this shade of 
meaning which however plays an important part in 
his implicit thought, as is shown by his choice of objects 
classed as alive and of objects classed as inanimate. 
Rivers also are not considered to be alive by Grand, 
ostensibly because they do not run about and have no 
hands. But neither sun nor fire have hands, and yet they 
are allowed life in so far as they have movement. Grand 
begins by saying of a watch that it is alive " because it 
goes" but he adds immediately that it is not alive. There 
is therefore a momentary and purely superficial con- 
flict between his deep conviction (it is not alive) and the 



IN THE CHILD 153 

incomplete definition of the word ' alive * (life = move- 
ment and not self-movement) which alone is in his mind. 
In a word, Grand conceives life as the power of self-move- 
ment, but he defines it consciously simply as movement. 
His definition does not cover his conception, or more 
precisely, his prise de conscience does not extend to the 
full use which he makes of the word * alive/ Grand has 
not yet become conscious of his own thought. 

Schei (6 ; 6) is in the same case. He defines life by 
movement ; clouds are alive " because they move," a table 
is not alive " because it does not move" But he is thinking 
of self-movement and not of movement in general (he 
does not think like Grand that clouds move because 
God pushes them, but that they travel by themselves). 
He refuses life to motor-cars, etc. but cannot say why : 
" Is a motor-car alive ? No. Why not ? . . . Does 
it move ? Why is it not alive ? Dunno" Same attitude 
with regard to bicycles, rivers, etc. 

Horn (6 ; 3) regards animals, sun, moon, clouds, and 
wind as alive, because " they move/' but not motor-cars 
nor bicycles, etc., but is unable to say why. 

Cal (age 5) says that to be alive means " that you move," 
but denies that motor-cars, etc. are alive. 

In short, out of a large number of children who con- 
ceive life as autonomous movement, hardly one can give 
a proper definition of the word ' alive ' nor even say why 
such and such an object is or is not alive. Every now and 
then an isolated case (Barb 5j says that to be alive is " to 
move by yourself") shows that this prise de conscience 
is possible among the most intelligent, and also confirms 
the validity of our interpretations ; but the bulk of the 
children under 7-8 axe incapable of reaching this stage. 

So far we have chosen the simplest case, that in which 
the child implicitly assigns a single meaning to the word 
' alive/ viz. self-movement. But it goes without saying 
that this is not always so. The concept of life frequently 
subsumes a number of heterogeneous qualities. For 
example : movement, the fact of having hands, a face, 
blood, or some activity useful to man, etc. What takes 
place in such cases ? To the difficulties of simple con- 
scious realization which we have just been analysing 



152 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

This will show that the difficulties bound up even with 
implicit definition are closely related to what we saw 
(Chap. I) of the child's inability to give complete logical 
justifications or reasons. 
Here are some examples. 

Grand (age 8) assigns the quality of being ' alive ' to 
fishes " because they swim" to flowers " because they grow" 
to the moon " because it comes back in the evening" to 
the wind " because it can blow" to fire " because it burns" 
but he denies it to clouds, bicycles and watches, etc, 
When we came to analyse some of Grand's answers, 
such as this one : " Water is not alive, it hasn't got any 
hands, it can't run on the grass" and especially when we 
compare his answers with most of those given by children 
of his age, we see that he regards as living those objects 
which have a movement of their own, whereas he denies 
this quality to clouds, because they are driven along by 
God, to machines because they are worked by men, to 
rivers because their movement is regulated by the slope 
of their bed and especially by their banks, etc. But the 
interesting point is that Grand is not conscious of this 
implicit conception. When he explains why certain 
objects are alive, Grand certainly says that they move 
(they swim, fly, blow, come back, drive along), but never 
that they move ' by themselves/ In his explanations of 
why certain objects are not alive, however, Grand has no 
fixed definition at his service. He says of clouds that they 
are not alive " because they don't move" but he admits 
that they very often do move. In Grand's language 
then " They don't move " obviously means " They don't 
move by themselves," " The wind makes them move," 
etc. But he is not explicitly conscious of this shade of 
meaning which however plays an important part in 
his implicit thought, as is shown by his choice of objects 
classed as alive and of objects classed as inanimate. 
Rivers also are not considered to be alive by Grand, 
ostensibly because they do not run about and have no 
hands. But neither sun nor fire have hands, and yet they 
are allowed life in so far as they have movement. Grand 
begins by saying of a watch that it is alive " because it 
goes" but he adds immediately that it is not alive. There 
is therefore a momentary and purely superficial con- 
flict between his deep conviction (it is not alive) and the 



IN THE CHILD 153 

incomplete definition of the word ' alive * (life = move- 
ment and not self-movement) which alone is in his mind. 
In a word, Grand conceives life as the power of self-move- 
ment, but he defines it consciously simply as movement. 
His definition does not cover his conception, or more 
precisely, his prise de conscience does not extend to the 
full use which he makes of the word ' alive/ Grand has 
not yet become conscious of his own thought. 

Schei (6 ; 6) is in the same case. He defines life by 
movement ; clouds are alive " because they move," a table 
is not alive " because it does not move" But he is thinking 
of self-movement and not of movement in general (he 
does not think like Grand that clouds move because 
God pushes them, but that they travel by themselves). 
He refuses life to motor-cars, etc. but cannot say why : 
" Is a motor-car alive ? No. Why not ? . . . Does 
it move ? Why is it not alive ? Dwino." Same attitude 
with regard to bicycles, rivers, etc. 

Horn (6 ; 3) regards animals, sun, moon, clouds, and 
wind as alive, because " they move/' but not motor-cars 
nor bicycles, etc., but is unable to say why. 

Cal (age 5) says that to be alive means " that you move" 
but denies that motor-cars, etc. are alive. 

In short, out of a large number of children who con- 
ceive life as autonomous movement, hardly one can give 
a proper definition of the word alive ' nor even say why 
such and such an object is or is not alive. Every now and 
then an isolated case (Barb 5 J says that to be alive is " to 
move by yourself 91 ) shows that this prise de conscience 
is possible among the most intelligent, and also confirms 
the validity of our interpretations ; but the bulk of the 
children under 7-8 are incapable of reaching this stage. 

So far we have chosen the simplest case, that in which 
the child implicitly assigns a single meaning to the word 
' alive/ viz. self-movement. But it goes without saying 
that this is not always so. The concept of life frequently 
subsumes a number of heterogeneous qualities. For 
example : movement, the fact of having hands, a face, 
blood, or some activity useful to man, etc. What takes 
place in such cases ? To the difficulties of simple con- 
scious realization which we have just been analysing 



154 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

are now added the difficulties of becoming simultaneously 
conscious of two or more elements. This is a difficulty 
of synthesis which will form an additional obstacle to 
adequate definition on the part of the child. Let us 
examine one or two examples which will show us wherein 
these phenomena differ from the mental processes that 
take place in the educated adult. 

Duss (age 9) conceives life as determined by two hetero- 
geneous qualities : activity and the fact of having blood. 
Thus a lizard is alive " because he has blood," a tree 
" because it has sap " (cf. blood), the sun is also alive 
" because it lights " (activity), the cloud " because it makes 
rain " (activity), fire " because it bums " (activity). 
But Duss varies in his judgments according as he thinks 
of blood or of activity. Thus immediately after having 
said that the sun was alive because it lights, he declares 
that it is not alive " because it has no blood." The same 
applies to clouds and fire. Consequently Duss has no 
satisfactory definition to give of life. He hesitates between 
blood and activity without achieving a synthesis between 
the two. 

Im (age 6) subsumes three heterogeneous notions 
activity useful to man, the fact of giving heat (perhaps a 
variant of the first), and movement. In this way clouds, 
sun, moon, stars, and wind are alive if considered from the 
angle of movement or activity (clouds are alive " because 
they show us the way ") but are not alive if viewed from the 
angle of heat. For after telling us that the sun is alive 
" because it warms us " and the wind because it blows, Im 
says that fire is not alive " because it warms us and then 
it burns us " (non-useful activity), and neither is wind : " It 
blows, but it is not alive. Why ? Because it makes us cold" 

Thus Im's three ideas of useful activity, heat and move- 
ment clash. Wind is said to be alive when Im is thinking 
of its movement, and not alive when he is thinking of the 
cold which it causes. In this way Im never succeeds in 
giving a fixed definition nor in becoming simultaneously 
conscious of the various factors which determine his 
thought at each moment of the interrogatory. 

Pig (age 9, backward) considers that the sun and the 
moon are alive because they move, but npt a bicycle, 



IN THE CHILD 155 

" because it has to be pushed" nor fire, " because it has to 
be made'' nor rivers " because the air makes them move 
along." It would seem then that Pig presented a typical case 
of a child who identifies life with self-movement. But he 
denies life to the North wind although it moves by itself. 
It is not alive " because it doesn't talk. But fishes don't 
talk and they are alive ? They swim" 

Pig's case is therefore very clear and very representa- 
tive. Life according to him is characterized by two 
heterogeneous qualities self-movement and speech. But 
Pig has not become conscious of these two conditions 
simultaneously, and he fluctuates between the two, 
unable to synthesize them. If life were characterized by 
addition (self-movement) + (speech), the North wind would 
have to be regarded as alive ; if life were defined by 
interference between two conditions ( =objects endowed 
both with speech and with self-movement) fishes would 
have to be excluded from life. In both cases therefore 
Pig would be inconsistent. To put it more simply, we 
can say that Pig has never asked himself the question, 
because he has never been conscious of this dualism. 
The same thing is true of the two children studied before 
Pig, and of all those who could be quoted. 

The same phenomenon comes out very clearly in 
connexion with definitions of force. To obtain these 
definitions we proceed in exactly the same way, giving the 
child a list of objects and asking him whether they have 
force, and why. Now here, even more than in the case of 
life, the child's conceptions are the outcome of various 
heterogeneous factors, but here no more than in the previous 
case can the child achieve consciousness of this multiplicity 
nor consequently arrive at a synthesis which alone would 
make definition possible. Here is an example. 

Hellb (8 ; 6) hesitates like most of his companions 
between two separate ideas of force : force as cause of 
movement and force as resistance. Force he tells us is 
" when you cany a lot of things. Why has the wind got 
force? It's when you can move along" Hellb's opinions 



156 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

are therefore frequently changing according to the point 
of view he adopts. At one moment of the interrogatory 
the wind has force because it moves, at another it has none 
because it does not carry anything. The same pheno- 
menon appears as regards water. Rivers have force 
" because it [water] runs, because it goes down." A moment 
later water has not got force because it carries nothing. 
Again, a moment after this a lake has force " because it 
carries boats." 



From the point of view of form, all these conceptions 
resemble one another. It is therefore needless to multiply 
examples, especially as these will be found, though 
treated from another point of view, in our forthcoming 
studies on children's ideas. 

Two fundamental conclusions can be drawn from these 
considerations. The first is concerned with conscious 
realization in thought, the other with the arrangement of 
notions and ideas into a hierarchy. On the one hand, 
when the child has to deal with complex conceptions 
(such as those in which the notion in question is deter- 
mined by several heterogeneous factors) he is, as is only 
natural even less conscious of the definition of the concepts 
than when he makes use of simpler notions. This can 
be very clearly seen in a case like that of Hellb. Hellb 
defines force as resistance even when he has just behaved, 
and will again immediately behave, as though force were 
to be defined solely by activity and movement. 

On the other hand and this is fundamental for what 
follows this inability to become conscious of the guiding 
factors of one's own thought entails a second phenomenon 
which is of the utmost importance for the psychology 
of childish reasoning, and in particular for the analysis 
of contradiction in the child. We mean the absence of 
logical hierarchy or of synthesis between the different 
elements of the same conception* For most of our ideas 
too are determined by several heterogeneous factors 
and even by factors which are often the same as those 
used by children. Thus we, like children, define life as 



IN THE CHILD 157 

self-movement, as the fact of having blood (or sap, or 
any kind of circulation), etc. We also define force as 
activity and as resistance. Where we differ from the 
children we have just been discussing is that we always 
have the component parts of the concept simultaneously 
in mind. Thus we say that a river has force because it 
flows fast, but we do not deny that a bench has resisting 
force even though it makes no movement. The child, 
on the contrary, thinks, not simultaneously, but alternately 
of the two determining factors. When he is thinking of 
resistance he denies force to rivers because a pebble 
sinks to the bottom of the water, and when he is thinking 
of motor force he denies force to a bench because it 
moves neither itself nor anything else. 

We find ourselves here in the presence (under a new 
form) of the phenomena of juxtaposition and syncretism 
which have already been sufficiently dealt with (see 
L.T., Chap. IV, and Chap. I of this volume, especially 
the conclusion). We can say that childish conceptions 
are the result of the juxtaposition and not of the synthesis 
of a certain number of elements, which are still disparate 
and will only gradually come into relation. Thus * life ' 
is for Duss a juxtaposition of two concepts activity 
and the fact of having blood. Now by the very fact of 
these childish concepts being the product of juxtaposition 
and not of synthesis, their apparent unity will be that 
which syncretism gives to a diversity of elements, viz. 
a subjective unity which cannot be made to serve as a 
foundation for logical reasoning. The proof of this is 
that the moment the children we have quoted begin to 
apply their conceptions, they contradict themselves to 
no slight extent. Once again, therefore, we find verifica- 
tion of that necessary bond of union between juxtaposition 
and syncretism which was so carefully emphasized in 
the conclusion of Chapter I. 

This strange phenomenon of concepts by conglomeration 
may be compared to what, in a totally different sphere, 
has been called ' over-determination * of images. It is 



158 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

well known that Freud, when he was studying the images 
and symbols which occur in dreams, day-dreams, and 
imagination, in short in undirected, autistic thought, 
was led to the view that each one of these images was the 
resultant not of one content which alone could determine 
it, but of several contents which insert themselves into 
the image with various degrees of complexity. Thus 
a man will dream that he is looking for a room. If the 
association of ideas evoked by this image be analysed, 
it will be found that the image is related to the actual 
situation (the subject happens to be looking for lodgings), 
but also that in view of this situation the dream is the 
depository of numerous circumstances in which the subject 
also has actually looked for a room. 

So that from the point of view of this person's psycho- 
logy, the image has not one content but a large 
number of contents. It is in this sense that an image 
or a symbol is said to be ' over-determined/ Now this 
is a phenomenon which we always find in primitive, ill- 
directed thought. The mind always begins in chaos. 
Simplicity is an effect of art and is in nowise given in the 
complex that forms the beginning of mental activity. 
The childish conceptions which we have been analysing 
are therefore very rarely a sign of simplicity. Each is the 
product of an over-determination of factors. The word 
life is over-determined by a list of factors piled upon each 
other without order or hierarchy movement, the fact of 
speaking, of having a face, or blood, of being useful to 
man, and so on. 

Children's explanations often point to the same pheno- 
menon. 1 

It might be thought that these over-determinations 
were identical with what takes place in our case, for each 
of our concepts is determined by an enormous number 
of heterogeneous components. But, we must repeat it 
once again, what distinguishes over-determination from 

1 J. Piaget, " La pensSe symbolique et la pensSe de 1'enfant/' Arch. 
de Psych., t. XVHI, p. 296. 



IN THE CHILD 159 

this sort of determination, or rather what distinguishes 
disorder from complexity is that in the case of over- 
determination there is no hierarchy, no real composition 
among the factors. And the child never having become 
conscious simultaneously of these factors, they act upon 
his reason in alternation with one another, penetrating 
the field of attention at different moments in time. The 
concept therefore resembles a metal ball that is attracted 
successively and in no fixed order by six electro-magnets, 
and jumps without rhyme or reason from one to the other. 
Because thought has not first become conscious of itself in 
every direction, over-determination is an unstable system 
of equilibrium, or to take a chemical image, it is a case 
of false equilibrium, like a state of apparent rest due 
simply to adherences or viscosity (syncretism). The com- 
plexity of an adult concept on the other hand does not 
exclude equilibrium. The mind has become conscious 
of each factor, not in isolation from, but in relation to 
the others, so all these factors act on the concept at once ; 
there is synthesis and hierarchy. 

These phenomena of psychological equilibrium can be 
translated into the language of formal logic. In terms of 
this language the child is incapable, both of systematic 
logical addition and multiplication. The reader is doubt- 
less familiar with these terms. Let us take concepts in 
extension, or two classes such as the class of vertebrates 
and the class of invertebrates. Logical addition consists 
in finding the smallest class that will contain them both, 
viz. the class of animals. Therefore (animals) = (verte- 
brates) -f (invertebrates). Take two other classes, say 
that of Protestants and that of Genevans. Logical 
multiplication is the operation which consists in finding 
the largest class that is contained in both these classes, 
or in other words the sum total of elements that are 
common to both, viz. the class of Genevan Protestants, or 
that of Protestant Genevans. Therefore (Protestant) x 
(Genevan) (Genevan Protestant). In the example of 
vertebrates and invertebrates there is no common element, 



i6o JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

no invertebrate-vertebrate. So (vertebrate) x (inverte- 
brate) =o. To multiply is always to exclude. For to 
find the sum total or to determine the concept of Genevan 
Protestants is to exclude i Non-Protestant Genevans, 
2 non-Genevan Protestants. 

The reason why adult concepts are in a state of equili- 
brium is that they are the products of logical addition 
or multiplication. If moving objects (like rivers) have 
force, and resisting objects (like a bench) also have force, 
then the concept of force will result from the logical addi- 
tion of these various classes : (Objects animated with 
force) -(moving objects) + (resisting objects) + . . ., etc. 
But the children we quoted above never add up these 
factors or classes of objects. They think of them alter- 
nately, without bringing them together, and that is why 
they cannot define the word. They do not say : " Force 
is when one can support things and also or or else when 
one can move along." But they say, like Hellb : " It 
is when one can support things," and once they have 
forgotten this initial proposition, "It is when one can 
move along." Thus a bench sometimes has force because 
it 'supports' things, sometimes it has none because it 
does not move. There is no logical addition of the factors 
in question, there is only chaotic over-determination. 

In the same way the adult, like Duss, defines life, at 
least among the animals, by self-movement and the fact 
of having blood. But he multiplies these two factors by 
each other. In other words he defines life by the fact of 
having both blood and self-movement (and not by one 
or the other, as in logical addition) . Thus for the adult the 
sun is not alive, because it has no blood but only self- 
movement, and a corpse is also not alive because it has 
only blood but no self-movement. The child on the other 
hand reasons like Duss. He does not multiply the two 
factors but considers them separately. He says that the 
sun is alive because it moves, forgetting that it has 
no blood. Or even if in limiting cases the child thinks 
of this second clause, it will not disturb him in his affirma* 



IN THE CHILD 161 

tion that the sun is alive (though bloodless) so long as he 
keeps the idea of self-movement before his mind. In a 
word, logical multiplication does not take place, and the 
factors involved are not compounded; each works 
separately on its own. 

It is interesting to note that these facts, which were 
obtained by simple talks with the children, entirely con- 
firm the results previously reached by a far more artificial 
method. 1 By applying and modifying a test of Hurt's 
we found that children were incapable of logical multipli- 
cation even in apparently very simple cases. Here is one of 
these cases. The child is shown the following test, written 
on a piece of paper which is left before him : "If this 
animal has long ears, it is a mule or a donkey. If it has 
a thick tail it is either a horse or a mule. Now this animal 
has long ears and a thick tail. What is it ? " Now experi- 
ment shows that among very young children (up to the age 
of 8, the period that especially interests us in this chapter, 
and which we have elsewhere called the unreflecting stage) 
the two conditions cannot be held before the mind simul- 
taneously, nor even collected into a single mental act, 
Sometimes the child thinks of the long ears, but as he 
forgot that the animal must also have a thick tail, he 
cannot see why the animal in question should not just as 
well be a donkey as a mule. Sometimes he thinks of the 
tail but forgets that the animal must have long ears, so 
that he cannot see why the animal should be a mule 
rather than a horse. It therefore matters very little 
whether the animal is a horse, a donkey, or a mule. Now 
what is still more curious is the fact that even at the age 
when the child succeeds in thinking of both conditions 
at the same time, the habit of thinking by simple juxta- 
position still holds the field and prevents him from makr g 
a logical multiplication. r 'For example, Fourn (9 ; 10), in 
spite of four long readings cannot decide between the 

1 J. Piaget, " Essai sur la multiplication logique et les debuts de la 
pens6e fonnelle chez I'enfant," Journ, Psych., Vol. XIX (1922), pp: 222- 
261. 

L 



162 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

horse, the donkey, and the mule, because " It might be a 
donkey since it says : if the animal has long ears, it is a 
donkey or a mule. And it might be a horse since it says : 
if the animal has a thick tail it is either a horse or a mule" 
etc. There is no logical multiplication and exclusion 
(either ... or) has not taken place. 

The child's inability to perform logical multiplication 
therefore seems fairly general, since in addition to these 
experiments which are specially designed to reveal it, 
it is implied in the very common difficulty which he experi- 
ences in giving definitions that cover the whole of the 
object to be defined. 

We have just seen, moreover, that the lack of hierarchy 
in children's concepts is more far-reaching than we had 
thought, since it affects logical addition as well as logical 
multiplication. At the time of writing the article quoted 
above, we thought that the children simply had a tendency 
to replace logical multiplication by logical addition. 
But, as a matter of fact, they have not even added the 
conditions ' long ears * and ' thick tail ' in the test in 
question ; they have simply juxtaposed them. Otherwise, 
we might be able to say, in connexion with the definitions 
of force, for example, that the child replaces logical 
addition by multiplication ; in reality, he is equally 
incapable, at least systematically, of both these operations. 
This is only natural, since logical addition and multipli- 
cation are closely bound together. 

It should be pointed out from the first that this difficulty 
in handling elementary logical operations goes through the 
whole structure of childish reasoning, for without logical 
addition or logical multiplication, except of the simplest 
kind, reasoning can only proceed from particular to par- 
ticular. The syllogism rests mainly upon the right use 
of general concepts or classes which are the product of 
additions and multiplications of more elementary classes ; 
and even if the syllogism does not play the part which has 
been assigned to it in deduction, it is at least necessary 
for the verification of new cases by old ones. Moreover, 



IN THE CHILD 163 

if the child is ignorant of logical multiplication, this 
involves the use of alternation and exclusion, for to 
multiply two classes is, in most cases at any rate, to 
exclude something from each. If, on the other hand, the 
child cannot exclude with any consistency, the door is 
open to every kind of contradiction. All these are funda- 
mental phenomena which we shall now proceed to examine. 
This throws new light upon the results obtained in 
Chapter I, namely, the child's deeply-rooted inability to 
use the terms and relations of discordance. To insert 
discordance between a cause and an effect presupposes 
consciousness of the expression of a rule. Expression is 
exclusion, and if the use which the child makes of exclusion 
depends upon his capacity for logical multiplication, it 
follows that the possibility of discordance depends upon 
that of this fundamental logical operation. This will 
enable us to understand why the relation of explicit 
discordance is so late in appearing. 

3. CONTRADICTION IN CHILD THOUGHT. It will be 
clear from the above analysis that until he reaches a 
certain age (7-8 at least) the child is insensible to contra- 
diction. If he is really incapable of defining even such 
notions as are unequivocally determined, this already 
supplies an element of contradiction. The particular use 
which he makes of a concept being unconscious, there 
will be throughout his reasoning a constant oscillation 
between the implicit conception which he possesses 
and the partial definition which he gives. And if his 
complex notions are really due to an over-determina- 
tion of factors such that the child can neither add 
nor multiply these factors logically, i.e. can never 
have them all simultaneously in his mind, this will 
constitute an even more important source of contra- 
diction. To show this in greater detail we shall 
begin by classifying the different types of contradiction 
'which occur in the child. 

These could be grouped by means of a table with double 
entry, two headings referring to the structure of the 



164 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

contradiction, and two to the subject-matter of the 
judgment. The structural types may be called contra- 
diction by amnesia and contradiction by condensation 
(or by over-determination of which it is a product). 
The types classified by subject-matter are contra- 
dictions about concepts and judgments of classification, 
and contradictions about explanations and judgments of 
causality. 

Contradiction by amnesia is not a specifically childish 
type, but it is far more abundantly represented in the 
child than in us for the following reason. The child 
hesitates, as we often do ourselves, between two opinions, 
as for example that the moon is alive and that it is not. 
He has very good reasons for each, but instead of choosing 
or of suspending his judgment, the child affirms each 
one in turn. For instance, he will maintain that the 
moon is alive. A few days or even a few moments later, 
when he is questioned again, he will quite sincerely 
deny that this is the case. Now after each volte-face 
the child really forgets his previous belief. He remembers 
what he said, but forgets his reasons for believing it ; 
he can no longer enter into a state of mind that is past. 
The same thing happens to us, not in purely intellectual 
problems (for then we know that our beliefs are changing, 
and we do not forget what we have rejected) but in prob- 
lems where judgments of value play an important part. 
In ethical or religious questions, for example, the adult 
often behaves like the children we have spoken of : he 
may completely forget a belief which he held sincerely 
only a few minutes before, and then return to it a few 
moments later. 

This form of contradiction is, however, far more fre- 
quent in the child, especially in view of the two following 
circumstances. 

In the first place, as we have pointed out elsewhere 
(L.T., Chap. V, 9), modality of judgment is a very different 
thing for us from what it is for the child. For us reality 
is always, if not distributed on one plane, at least unified, 



IN THE CHILD 165 

coherent, and submitted to a hierarchy by means of a 
single criterion experience. For the child, on the con- 
trary, there are several heterogeneous realities ; there is 
play, there is what is immediately observed, there is 
the world of things he has heard and been told about, and 
so on ; and these different worlds are more or less chaotic 
and independent of each other. So that when the child 
turns from a state of belief to a state of play, or from a 
state of submission to adult talk (verbal reality built 
up upon faith in what adults say) to a state of personal 
investigation, his opinions are apt to undergo singular 
transformations ; he may deny what he has just affirmed, 
and so on. In this mutability or rather this remarkable 
instability of belief we have a very important factor in 
contradiction by amnesia. There is even no paradox 
in maintaining that the child's belief varies as a function 
of his environment. According as he is with his parents* 
with his school-teachers, byhimself , or with his companions, 
the child may very well have three or four interchangeable 
systems of belief. I have seen children of 8 years old 
state in all seriousness and with a degree of conviction 
that admitted of no doubt that there were ogres near 
Geneva on the Saleve, and then, the moment they saw 
me smile, assure me that they never believed in them. 
Obviously there are two groups of contradictory beliefs, 
and when he is with strangers like us the child does not 
know at first which to adopt. Besides, this mentality 
survives in a great many adults, and it would not be hard 
to find working people who believe in the Devil when 
they are in church and cease to do so when they are in 
their work-shops. 

A second circumstance in favour of the frequence of 
this type of contradiction is the very general character 
of childish amnesia. It is curious to note what illusions 
of perspective children are subject to with regard to their 
own thought, and to what lapses of memory with regard to 
what they have said and believed. A child will affirm, 
for example, that all rivers have been dug by the hand of 



166 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

man. Somebody corrects this opinion and explains to 
him that water can bore out its own bed. Shortly or even 
immediately after this explanation, the child thinks that 
he has reached this newly-learned idea by himself and 
that he has always believed it. A large number of boys of 
6 to 8 believe that one thinks through one's mouth or 
that thought is a voice inside one's head. The word 
' brain/ when they know it, is always a recent acquisition. 
But as soon as they know it, they completely forget their 
former ideas, they claim never to have dreamt of thinking 
through one's mouth, and believe themselves to have 
discovered the word and the concept ' brain/ 

For example, Reyb (8 ; 7) states that we think " with 
our brains. Who told you ? No one . . . Where did 
you learn that word ? I've always known it. What is a 
brain ? Tubes in the head." A moment later : " Who told 
you it was tubes in the head ? No one. Did you hear 
some one say it ? No," etc. 

A child of the same age who has been asked to tell us 
what the moon is made of, says he doesn't know. We show 
him our watch and ask him what it is made of. Answer : 
Gold. " And the moon ? Also gold. Since when do you 
know that ? I've always known it. Did someone tell you 
or did you find out alone ? I found out alone. Since 
when ? I've always known, 3 ' etc. 

We have dwelt sufficiently in an earlier work a on the 
chaotic nature of memory and attention in children of 
7-8, to allow ourselves to be very brief on the subject of 
these phenomena of amnesia. We need only recall the 
fact that these difficulties are closely bound up with the 
child's inability to become conscious of his own thought, 
It is because the child is not accustomed to notice the 
progress of his own thought, that the latter is subject to 
these illusions of perspective, these amnesias and conse- 
quently these contradictions. 

1 See Arch, de Psych., Vol. XVIII (1921), p. 167. What we have 
called the ' implicit stage ' of the solution of logical problems is the 
stage when the child cannot hold two or three elements together in his 
mind without immediately forgetting at least one of them. 



IN THE CHILD 167 

Belonging to the same type of contradiction are those 
arising from the fact that the child has no conscious 
grasp of definitions which have been determined by a single 
factor. It is obvious that this discordance between the 
definition of a concept and the use to which it is put must 
lead to contradiction. Thus Schei (6 ; ^), as we saw in the 
last section, considers a cloud to be alive because it moves, 
but not so motors, although they also move. Theoretically, 
i.e. when we know the reason for these fluctuations there is 
no contradiction, but actually the children do not know 
the cause of their own inconsistency, and if we take 
account only of what they say and think, there is contra- 
diction. This contradiction is not really due to amnesia, 
but to something analogous, viz. an inadequate prise de 
conscience. 

Contradiction by condensation is much more important 
theoretically, because it is peculiar to the child ; unless 
indeed one regards it as the characteristic of all concepts 
in process of formation, and compares it to those contra- 
dictions to which scientists are sometimes driven when 
they are dealing with concepts whose full elaboration has 
not been completed (such as were for a long time the 
concepts of cause, force, action at a distance, the ether, 
and so on). Most childish concepts are, as we saw, over- 
determined by a large number of heterogeneous factors, 
as, for instance, resistance and activity for the concept 
of force, blood and activity for the concept of life, and these 
factors are simply thrown together by the child without 
being submitted to logical addition or multiplication. 
Such a lack of selection and hierarchy necessarily leads 
to contradiction, and this over-determination points not 
to any mystical capacity for dispensing with the principle 
of identity, but simply to an inability for restraint and for 
elimination. In this way the child is constantly faced with 
alternatives, both of which, for lack of the power to 
perform logical multiplication, he accepts simultaneously, 
and is consequently involved in contradiction. Condensa- 
tion is therefore the result of over-determination; a 



168 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

concept formed in this way is not a system but a 
heterogeneous and contradictory conglomeration, the 
result of simultaneous participation in several different 
realities. 

It is easy enough to detect this phenomenon in the 
examples given in the last section in connexion with 
over-determination, and it is not necessary to add to these, 
for they axe all alike. Duss (age 9), for example, looks 
upon the sun sometimes as alive, sometimes as not alive, 
according as it is determined by one of the component 
factors (because it gives light) or by the other (because it 
has no blood). In Duss's mind this concept is therefore 
a conglomeration, a contradictory condensation. Simi- 
larly, Imh regards the wind as sometimes alive and some- 
times not, the concept ' life ' being for him a contradictory 
condensation of the quality of having movement (blowing) 
and of that of giving heat. Pig, Hellb, Berg, etc. present 
analogous cases. 

These children's ideas of ' force ' and ' lif e ' are there- 
fore genuine contradictory condensations. Such contra- 
dictions abound before the age of 7-8, and can, moreover, 
be produced by experiment. Thus, in the Burt test quoted 
above (Chap. II, 4) " Edith is fairer than Suzanne, 
Edith is darker than Lili : Which is the darkest of the 
three ? " we made the following discovery. The child 
cannot conceive of a girl being both fairer than one and 
darker than another. In a sense then he seems more 
eager to avoid contradiction than we do. But this is 
so only in appearance, and is due to the fact that the child 
fails to make proper use of the judgments of relation. 
The proof of this is that the child who thinks that Suzanne 
is fair and Lili dark ends by finding contradictory (and 
accepting) the solution which assigns a ' darkish brown ' 
to Edith. So that Edith is both darker than Suzanne 
(who is dark) and fairer than Lili (who is fair) ! The 
enormity in this case is of course only momentary, and 
due to the conditions of the experiment, but the fact 
that children experience so much difficulty in controlling 



IN THE CHILD 169 

their hypotheses shows us what must be going on in 
their minds from day to day. 

In addition to these contradictions by condensation, 
which affect concepts and judgments of classification or 
of simple relations, we can constantly note the occurrence 
of contradictions in causal explanations either by amnesia 
(to which we need not return) or by condensation. Here 
is an example. 

To (7^) thinks that boats float " because they are wood. 
Why does wood stay on the water ? Because it is light 
and the little boats have sails [over-determination]. And 
those that have no sails why do they not sink ? Because 
it is light. . . . And how about big boats ? Because 
they are heavy. Then heavy things stay on top of the water? 
No. Does a big stone ? No, it sinks. And big boats ? 
They stay because they are heavy. Is that the only 
reason ? No. What else ? Because they have big sails. 
And when these are taken away ? Then they are less 
heavy. And if the sails are put on again? The same 
thing happens. They stay [on the water] because they 
are heavy." 

Theoretically, i.e. if we look for To's unconscious 
tendencies, the contradiction is perhaps not quite so 
flagrant as it appears to be, for it may be that To 
regards weight as a sign of strength. Big boats would 
float because they were strong and little ones because 
they were supported by the water. But To says 
nothing about this and is in no way conscious of it. 
Actually, i.e. on the plane of conscious formulation, 
there is contradiction. 

We shall meet with more examples later on in connexion 
with transduction. Moreover, these contradictions occur- 
ring in explanation do not differ in structure from those 
contained in simple fragments of classification or logical 
relation. 

4. THE PSYCHOLOGICAL EQUIVALENT OF NON-CON- 
TRADICTION AND THE NOTION OF MENTAL REVERSIBILITY. 
It will now be of interest to enquire into the psycho- 
logical significance of childish contradictions. The prob- 



170 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

lem is important and should be clearly stated if the 
subject of reasoning in the child is to be approached in 
its widest aspects. 

What is contradiction between two judgments or 
within one and the same concept ? From the point of 
view of logic it is an ultimate and indefinable notion 
which can only be described by showing the mental 
impossibility of affirming contradictory propositions simul- 
taneously. But from the psychological point of view we 
have here a problem because we cannot see how it comes 
about that the mind wishes to avoid contradiction nor 
what are the conditions of non-contradiction. We cannot 
say straight away of the psychological (as opposed to the 
logical) structure of thought any more than of the struc- 
ture of any other natural phenomenon that it is non- 
contradictory. For it is only too obvious that there is 
within the organism, for example, a host of antagonistic 
tendencies existing in an unstable condition and such that 
the growth of one involves the decay of the others. Mental 
life in its primitive, instinctive, or affective aspects will 
naturally obey the same laws. There is not a single emotion 
that does not contain a hidden bi-polarity or, as Bleuler 
has called it, an ambivalence which from the point of 
view of consciousness is a contradiction. How then are 
we to characterize from the psychological point of view 
behaviour or mental states which are the concomitants 
of logical non-contradiction in distinction to those other 
forms of behaviour which, if they were translated into 
fully explicit judgments, would be contradictory ? Such 
is the problem which we wish to deal with in the very 
briefest outlines. 

Broadly speaking, we may make the following funda- 
mental distinction : non-contradiction is a state of equili- 
brium in contrast to the state of permanent disequilibrium 
which is the normal life of the mind. For, as every one 
knows nowadays, sensations, images, pleasure and pain, in 
short all the ' immediate data of consciousness ' are borne 
along on a continuous ' stream of consciousness/ Exactly 



IN THE CHILD 171 

the same thing applies to the immediate data of the 
external world ; they constitute Heraclitus' eternal 
becoming. A certain number of fixed points stand out 
in contrast to this flux, such as concepts and the relations 
subsisting between them, in a word, the whole universe 
of logic, which in the very process of its formation is 
independent of time and consequently in a state of 
equilibrium. We can therefore say that every notion, 
while still in the making, contains a certain amount of 
contradiction, and that on reaching a state of equilibrium or 
immobility it is enabled to eliminate this element of 
disharmony. 

But this is only a rough approximation to the facts. 
It is not true to say that notions are immobile. Every 
idea grows, finds fresh application, becomes generalized and 
dissociated. These operations, which are due to the 
incessant work of the judging activity, do not necessarily 
lead to contradiction, and though the permanence of an 
idea may be an index of its logical identity, identity 
and non-contradiction certainly do not cover the same 
ground. Mathematical equations are not identities, and 
yet they escape contradiction. The balance we are 
trying to determine therefore presupposes something 
permanent, but it cannot be defined as the absence of 
all movement ; it is a * moving equilibrium.' 

This equilibrium can be quite shortly defined as the 
reversibility of the operations in the balance. A non- 
contradictory operation is a reversible operation. This 
term must not be taken in the logical sense which is 
derivative, but in the strictly psychological sense. A 
mental operation is reversible when, starting from its 
result, one can find a symmetrically corresponding opera- 
tion which will lead back to the data of the first operation 
without these having been altered in the process. Thus 
to extend, as does the child, the notion of * force =* 
activity ' to the notion of ' force = resistance ' simply by 
means of syncretic condensation devoid of logical addition 
is not to perform a reversible operation ; the condensed 



172 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

notion resultant upon the operation alters both the 
original notions. The child therefore becomes involved 
in the contradictions which we pointed out. Logical 
operations, on the contrary, are reversible. If I divide a 
given collection of objects into four equal piles, I can 
recover the original whole by multiplying one of my 
quarters by four : the operation of multiplication is 
symmetrical to that of division. Thus every rational 
operation has a corresponding operation that is sym- 
metrical to it and which enables one to return to one's 
starting-point. Contradiction may therefore be detected 
in the irreversibility of any particular process, in the 
fact that no exactly symmetrical relation could be found 
whereby to control the original operation. 

This description is so obvious from the logical point of 
view that it seems absurd to lay so much stress upon it, 
but a logical truism may very well conceal serious com- 
plexities of a psychological order. The child will naturally 
not prove capable of reversible operations from the first, 
and the psychological conditions of reversibility will 
have to be closely analysed if we are to grasp the full 
significance in the history of thought of the desire to avoid 
contradiction. 

Let us begin by confining the problem to the sphere 
of directed thought. For it is obvious that non-directed 
thought, i.e. that in which the individual has set himself 
no real problem, but seeks only to satisfy some desire 
which is not conscious, or not wholly so it is obvious 
that such thought is by its very nature irreversible. 
This feature is even what constitutes its chief originality. 
A train of associations is irreversible, because association 
of ideas is nearly always directed by an affective tendency 
which nothing obliges to remain the same. Thus if from 
the idea of ' table ' I am led by the interests of the moment 
to the idea of ' Napoleon/ it is extremely unlikely that 
I shall travel back along the same route and by means 
of the same connecting stations (table, castle, Malmaison, 
Napoleon) when a few hours later I am asked to associate 



IN THE CHILD 173 

my ideas to the word ' Napoleon/ The path I shall follow 
is far more likely to be the irreversible stream of my own 
spontaneous thought. Similarly, in dreams we have an 
irreversible procession of images guided by a desire or 
an unconscious tendency, which is akin to the work of 
imagination in simply retracing the various phases of 
an event. Here there are no logical or causal relations, 
no implications, none of those 'if ... then's ' which 
alone would enable the dreamer or the day-dreamer to 
really work upon his cinematograph, i.e. to reconstruct 
previous images by means of present ones, and thus in a 
measure to travel back up the stream of time. In a word, 
we have here a stream of images devoid of reversible 
relations. If we want reversibility, we must have proper 
operations, i.e. either a manual or a mental process of 
construction or decomposition whose aim it is to anticipate 
or to reconstruct phenomena. A mere succession of 
images with no other direction than that imposed upon 
it by an unconscious desire is therefore not sufficient to 
create a reversible process. 

But in thought that is really directed, that obeys 
conscious direction, what are the conditions to which the 
mental operations will have to be submitted in order to 
be really reversible ? The thought of the child, like every 
other kind of thought, is swayed by two fundamental 
interests whose interaction is precisely what determines 
this reversibility. These are imitation of reality by 
the organism or the mind, and assimilation of reality 
by the organism or the mind. Imitation of reality is the 
fundamental tendency of childish activity to reproduce, 
first by gesture and then by imagination, the external 
movements to which the organism is compelled to adapt 
itself, and later and more generally the succession or partial 
successions of events and phenomena which call for the same 
adaptation. Imitation is the self's desire to be always 
repeating the history of things so as to become adapted 
to them ; it matters little whether this reproduction is 
corporal or mental. Now there is nothing reversible about 



174 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

thought as an organ of imitation. 1 The order in nature 
of phenomena is clearly reversible, except for certain 
mechanical successions which the mind only succeeds in 
grasping very late, and thanks to certain experiments 
intended to secure the very reversibility which he was 
hoping to find. Thus such and such a word which the 
child is imitating will be pronounced by his parents with 
different inflexions and used in a different sense on 
separate occasions. Such and such an old man whom the 
child is trying to imitate in his play or in his drawing will 
be dressed one way one day and differently on the next. 
It is therefore only natural that imitation should not 
immediately produce reversible mental operations, so 
long as imitation does not link up with genuine assimila- 
tion of reality to the self. That boats should float one 
day because they are light, and the next day because they 
are heavy appears to be a matter of course so long as the 
mind does no more than recall a set of disconnected 
stories such as the story of the little boat put into the 
basin, or of the heavy boat made to sail on the lake. 
Imitation of reality cannot therefore lead to irreversibility 
short of combining with the assimilative faculty. 

At first sight the assimilative tendency shown by 
thought seems sufficient to secure stability in judgments. 
To assimilate, in psychology as in biology, is to reproduce 
oneself by means of the external world ; it is to transform 
perceptions until they are identical with one's own thought, 
i.e. with previous schemas. Assimilation is therefore 
preservation and, in a certain sense, identification. Thus 
the child, feeling himself to be alive, also regards animals, 
stars, clouds, water, and wind as alive : these disparate 
phenomena are all assimilated to a single schema. Within 
the constant stream of particular experiences and stories 
of which imitation recalls the image, assimilation seems 

1 The ' circular reaction ' by means of which. M. Baldwin has 
attempted to define imitation (Mental Development in the Child and the 
Race, London, 1907) does not seem to us to characterize imitation pure, 
but is already the result of a combination between imitation and 
assimilation. 



IN THE CHILD 175 

to create a fixed element, a uniform manner of reacting 
to the flux of becoming. 

The facts show, however, that this process of assimila- 
tion has a far more complicated history in the child's 
mental life than at first appears to he the case. If assimi- 
lation is really the fusion of a new object with an already 
existing schema, this fusion may very well have originally 
been a kind of reciprocal destruction : the object, because 
it is new and until this moment unknown, will remain 
irreducible to the schema, and both will be altered by 
being identified with one another. The object, in other 
words, will lose its specific character, and the schema will 
be not only widened and generalized, but fundamentally 
changed. 

Now, a large number of facts show us that this is actually 
what happens in primitive or, as in this sense we may call 
it, in ' deforming ' assimilation. In undirected thought, 
assimilatioh is always deforming to begin with. At least 
this is how we can interpret the constant condensation 
in dream and imagination described by Freud. To con- 
dense two images is to fuse them into one composite 
image (as, for example, one person combining the features 
of two distinct persons) ; it is not to subsume them under 
one schema which will leave them their respective indi- 
viduality, but to force them into a schema which is the 
result of their confusion. In the child's directed intelli- 
gence, on the other hand, there are several phenomena 
analogous to this deforming assimilation. There is, for 
example, the phenomenon of syncretism which we have 
shown elsewhere (L.T., Chap. VI) to be exactly half-way 
between ' condensation ' of undirected thought and the 
generalization of directed thought. In the experiments 
we dealt with then, the child reads a given sentence A 
and a given sentence B, and although for us the sentences 
have nothing in common, the child, whose task it is to 
find two sentences meaning the same thing, actually 
fuses the two sentences into a common schema built up 
out of all the given elements. Assimilation is therefore 



176 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

present, but here again it is clearly ' deforming/ in the 
sense that if A digests B, A also deforms B (the child 
would have understood B quite differently if he had not 
previously read A) and is in its turn digested and deformed 
by B, * Over-determination/ of which we spoke in the 
last section, is simply a special case of syncretism, and 
consequently of deforming assimilation. But in this case 
the various components are not completely assimilated, 
but remain partly estranged from one another ; it is only 
for a moment that one component disfigures another 
or is disfigured by it. 

In short, the tendency of thought to assimilate the 
external world cannot, in the first place, lead to the 
reversibility of mental processes. On the contrary, in 
its early stages, as is shown by the phenomena of con- 
densation and syncretism, assimilation tries to be too 
thorough, and destroys both the assimilated object and 
the assimilating schema. Now once the object and the 
schema have been altered in this way, the mind cannot, 
after the act of assimilation, turn back and dis-assimilate 
them, so to speak, so as to find them identical with what 
they had been. Take, for example, the two sentences 
of which we spoke just now, or the two terms of a condensed 
image, or again the two components of an over-determined 
concept. In such cases the schema A and the object B 
do not give rise to a synthesis (A + B) or (A x B) as would 
be the case with us, but to something which partially or 
totally destroys both A and B. The process is therefore not 
reversible. It is not A + B->C in such a way that one can 
retrace one's footsteps C->A 4- B. It can only be schema- 
tized as follows: A-fB-C such that C->A' + B' or 



In conclusion, neither the imitative nor the assimilative 
tendency is sufficient by itself to secure for child thought 
a reversibility that will render it free from contradiction. 
Left to themselves, each will lead either to dream or play, 
both of them activities in which the irreversibility of 
thought is practically complete. 



IN THE CHILD 177 

What then is necessary for the presence of reversibility 
in mental operations ? The answer is that assimilation 
and imitation will have to collaborate instead of pulling 
in different directions as they do in the early stages of 
mental growth. 

After all, wherever thought has reached a certain degree 
of development, imitation and assimilation constitute 
two opposite poles. If a new phenomenon takes place 
within an organism, the organism can adapt itself to it, 
and in so doing breaks away from its previous habits of 
reasoning or imagination in order to create a new and 
original image which will faithfully copy the unknown 
phenomenon . This is the imitative tendency, which consists 
in reproducing objects by means of gesture or thought, 
and consequently in deforming earlier thought and gesture 
as a function of the new-found objects. Or else the 
organism can force the new phenomenon into the habitual 
motor or intellectual schemas, as happens in children's 
games, in childish syncretism of thought or in the con- 
densation of dreams. This is the assimilative tendency, 
which consists, not in reproducing things by gesture or 
thought, but in feeding and reproducing personal motor 
tendencies or earlier schemas of thought by means of 
things, and consequently in deforming the new-found 
objects as a function of earlier thought or gesture. This 
shows that at root imitation and assimilation are funda- 
mentally antagonistic. 

And this antagonism is really what produces the irre- 
versibility of thought. For why does assimilation in 
fusing an object B and a schema A deform both one and 
the other ? It is because at the moment when the mind 
is assimilating, it ceases to imitate ; in other words 
imitation ceases to preserve in all their specificity the 
images corresponding to A and to B. If in spite of assimi- 
lating B to A the mind could preserve intact the images 
subsumed under A, it is obvious that the process A-i-B-s*- 
C would be reversible and that = A + B. The element C 
would then represent the synthesis and not the confusion 
M 



178 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

of A and B. In short, the necessary and sufficient con- 
dition for assimilation to constitute a reversible process 
is that it should go hand in hand with an imitation of 
phenomena which shall be directly proportional to their 
assimilation. And why, conversely, does imitation, by 
confining itself to the reproduction in action or imagina- 
tion of the history of things, constitute an irreversible 
process exactly similar to the flux of becoming ? It is 
because the child, imitating one day the phenomenon A 
and the next day phenomenon B, gives up the attempt to 
assimilate them one to another. In logical parlance, he does 
not try to generalize his experiences and his observations. 
The condition for a reversible imitation is therefore that 
there should be a corresponding proportion of assimilation. 
In so far, then, as imitation and assimilation are 
antagonistic to one another, there is irreversibility of 
thought, and in so far as these two tendencies succeed 
in harmonizing with one another there is reversibility. 
From the logical point of view these are only truisms, 
but for the psychologist there is a certain interest in 
analysing the conditions of a systematization as difficult 
for the child as that which will give rise to logically rever- 
sible processes of thought. By showing that logical contra- 
diction is the result of the conflict (fundamental from 
the genetic point of view) of imitation and assimilation, 
we have at least a psychological picture of the logical 
structure of thought, and such presentations of the facts 
are never wholly devoid of utility. 

And now we may ask what are the factors which will 
bring about the solidarity of imitation and assimilation ? 
To appeal to the presence of a desire for unity would 
be to involve ourselves in a vicious circle, and to explain 
non-contradiction by itself. But in order to escape from 
this circle (supplied in this case by the facts themselves) 
we must bear in mind that imitation and assimilation 
involve one another from the moment that they begin 
to function. For it is impossible for the mind to assimilate 
without a factor of differentiation which will in a measure 



IN THE CHILD 179 

keep apart the objects to be assimilated, in other words, 
without a certain degree of imitation ; and it is impossible 
to imitate a new phenomenon without ipso facto creating 
in oneself a process that tends to perpetuate and to 
reproduce indefinitely the image of this phenomenon, 
which henceforth ceases to be new, and enters the domain 
of assimilated objects. This is why Baldwin, in trying to 
characterize imitation, brings in a definitely assimilative 
element into his description (circular reaction). If assimi- 
lation and imitation remain antagonistic for so long, 
this is solely due to the pressure of external reality and to 
the excessive novelty and change of the images which it 
is constantly bringing before the mind. But as soon as 
reality is assimilated, an increasing solidarity comes to 
be established between assimilation and imitation. 

When does this binding process become sufficiently 
powerful to produce genuine reversibility in thought ? 
At the moment when the solidarity in question ceases to 
be mechanical, and becomes logical or mental, and is 
regulated by definite and conscious judgments of value. 
Here again, social factors enter into the development of 
thought, and join themselves to the biological factors 
whose work they bring to completion. 

The ego-centrism of thought which characterizes the 
early life of the child entails a consistent antagonism 
between assimilation and imitation. In the first place, 
an ego-centric mind will assimilate everything to itself 
and to its own point of view. Syncretism, the non- 
relativity of childish concepts, etc. are all due to this 
ego-centric assimilation. Now it goes without saying 
that this assimilation deforms its objects, i.e. that it has 
no respect for their specific nature. Imitation is there- 
fore not sufficient. In the second place, in virtue of his 
very ego-centrism the child is not conscious of his own 
thought, he has not the feeling of his own ego ; conse- 
quently, he is always imitating things and people, owing 
to that sort of confusion between self and others which 
Janet made the characteristic feature of imitation. At 



r8o JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

such moments imitation is complete, but is not accom- 
panied by assimilation. 

Such, then, are the two antagonistic poles between which 
the child is constantly fluctuating : deforming assimilation 
due to his ego-centrism, and imitation devoid of assimila- 
tion due to his lack of consciousness of self arising from 
ego-centrism. 

But as soon as thought becomes socialized, a momentous 
factor comes into play ; imitation and assimilation are 
transformed, solidarity is established between them, and 
thought becomes increasingly capable of reversibility. 
For the capacity for leaving one's own point of view 
and entering into that of other people robs assimilation 
of its deforming character, and forces it to respect the 
objectivity of its data. The child will henceforth attempt 
to weave a network of reciprocal relations between his 
own point of view and that of others. This reciprocity 
of view-points will enable him both to incorporate new 
phenomena and events into his ego, and to respect their 
objectivity, i.e. the specific characters which they present. 
Gradually, this same reciprocity of view-points will accus- 
tom the child to the reciprocity of relations in general. 
Henceforth, imitation of reality will find its completion 
in assimilation of reality by the mind. 

Social life, by developing the reciprocity of relations 
side by side with the consciousness of necessary implica- 
tions, will therefore remove the antagonistic characters 
of assimilation and imitation, and render the two processes 
mutually dependent. Social life therefore helps to make 
our mental processes reversible, and in this way prepares 
the path for logical reasoning. 

5. TRANSDUCTION. The preceding pages may have 
seemed to the reader to be very far removed from the 
psychology of childish reasoning. But this is not the case, 
for the child's contradictions and the irreversibility of 
his thought are precisely the factors which will explain 
the nature of transductive reasoning. The whole structure 
of childish reasoning before the age of 7-8, and even in 



IN THE CHILD 181 

a certain measure up to the appearance of real deduction 
at the age of 11-12 can be explained by the fact that the 
child reasons about individual or particular cases between 
which he does not enquire whether there is contradiction 
or non-contradiction, and which give rise to mental 
experiments which are as yet not reversible, 
Here is an example. 

We show Mull (age 8) a glass of water into which we 
put a pebble, and then ask him why the level of the 
water has risen. Mull tells us that it is because the pebble 
is heavy. We show MuE another pebble and try to make 
him foresee what will happen. Mull says about the pebble : 
" It is heavy. It will make the water go up. And this one 
[a smaller pebble] ? No. Why ? It is light. 3 ' 

Mull seems to be carrying out a syllogistic argument 
which consists in applying a general law to particular 
cases : " Heavy objects raise the level of the water. . . . 
Now this pebble is heavy, or light . . . tnerefore it will, 
or will not raise the level of the water/' If we bear in 
mind what has been said about conjunctions of causality 
and of logical sequence (Chap. I) or about tne unconscious- 
ness of childish reasoning (present chapter, i and 2), 
we certainly cannot suppose that Mull is conscious of the 
general proposition : " All heavy objects raise . . .," 
but this is of no consequence : Since Mull behaves 
logically as though he had this general law in his mind, 
we can admit that he has reasoned by implicit syllogisms, 
in short, by enthymeme. This conclusion gains in strength 
from the fact that Mull's explanation is that ot practically 
all the boys of his age. Up to the age of 9 three-quarters 
of the children say that the pebble raises the water because 
it is heavy, because it weighs on the water, etc. 1 But to 
return to the experiment. 

" Is this piece of wood heavy ? No. If it were put in 
the water would it make it rise ? Yes, because it isn't 

1 We have borrowed this example from an enquiry into the develop- 
ment of physical causality which was carried out in collaboration with 
Mile L. Hahnloser, and the results of which will appear in a subsequent 
volume devoted to the study of explanation in the child. 



i82 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

heavy. Which is heaviest, this wood or this pebble [a 
small pebble and a large piece of wood] ? The pebble [cor- 
rect], Which will make the water rise highest ? The wood 
Why ? Became it is bigger [because it has more volume 
than the pebble]. Then why did the pebbles make the 
water rise just now ? Because they are heavy. If I put 
that in [a handful of pebbles] ? It will run [the water will 
run over], Why ? Because it is heavy.' 9 

This example shows the mechanism of childish reason- 
ing very clearly. In the first place, there has been no 
syllogism. Not only is Mull in no way conscious of the 
general proposition we spoke of just now (" Heavy 
objects make the water rise ") but, what is more important, 
he does not apply it even implicitly. He claims, for 
example, that the wood makes the water rise <r because 
it is not heavy/' immediately after having said that the 
pebble did so " because it is heavy." Now where does 
this illogicality come from ? Clearly, from the factors 
which we have just been studying, and in particular from 
the fact that the subject is not conscious of his own 
thought. For Mull has not contradicted himself for the 
pleasure of doing so ; he simply had several things in his 
inind at the same time. On the one hand, he thought that 
heavy objects, as such, caused the water to rise, and not 
in their capacity of bigness. On the other hand, he knew 
implicitly that large, voluminous objects caused the 
level of the water to rise. Unconsciously guided by this 
schema, he affirms that the wood will make the water 
rise " because it is not heavy," but he only becomes cons- 
scious of this reason a little later and under pressure of 
the comparison which we force him to make between a 
large piece of light wood and a small heavy pebble. This 
conscious realization is, however, so weak that immediately 
after having said that the wood makes the water rise 
" because it is big," Mull once again maintains that the 
handful of pebbles will do so " because they are heavy." 
In short, Mull has in his mind the concept of volume and 
is occasionally guided by it, but he has only become 



IN THE CHILD 183 

conscious of the concept of weight, as though objects were 
heavy in proportion to their size. When discordance 
appears between volume and weight, Mull invokes some- 
times weight and sometimes size in his explanations. 
The two following conclusions should be borne in mind. 
i Mull contradicts himself in his explanations of the rise 
of the water-level, because his explanations are over- 
determined by two heterogeneous factors (weight and 
volume), because he is not conscious of this dualism, and 
because in consequence of this he cannot submit these 
two factors to logical addition or multiplication. These 
phenomena have been analysed at great length in the 
preceding sections of this chapter. 2 Now (and this is 
the most important point for us at present) this absence 
of synthesis is what forces Mull, when he reasons con- 
sciously, i.e. when he makes his implications explicit, to 
reason only about individual or special cases. There 
is no (deductive) reasoning and no induction that is 
possible for Mull, because as soon as he tries to generalize 
an explanation he contradicts himself. So that he will 
either generalise and contradict himself, which is the same 
as not generalizing, or he will not contradict himself and 
will reason only about particular cases. 

Mull's example is far from being unique ; it is the proto- 
type of all childish reasoning up to the age of 8 or more. 
With regard to the way children reason when they are 
being questioned, we found in the first place (preceding 
sections) cases of unconsciousness, of inability to give 
definitions, of inability to perform logical operations 
(addition and multiplication) and cases of contradiction. 
All these phenomena go to prove that the child does not 
reason by syllogisms, but by inferences from particular to 
particular, made without any logical rigour. In addition 
to this, the study of the spontaneous language of children 
and of the conjunctions of logical relations (Chap. I) leads 
us to exactly the same result. In their spontaneous 
reasoning children infer only from particular to particular. 
Or, to put it in a different way, all the reasoning processes 



1 84 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

that have been collected are ' mental experiments ' 
carried out on individual cases without any attempt at 
generalization or appeal to laws previously generalized. 
" I can shut my [cardboard desk] if I want to. That is 
why it doesn't stick. Afterwards [if it sticks] I shan't be 
able to shut it any more." The list of spontaneous logical 
reasons enumerated in 5 of Chapter I (in connexion 
with the word ' then ') is sufficient in itself to show how 
even spontaneous attempts at proof appeal to nothing 
beyond non-generalized mental experiments. 

Children's reasoning, in short, does not move from 
universal to particular (All voluminous objects make the 
water rise, therefore this pebble makes the water rise 
because it has volume), nor from particular to universal 
(This piece of wood has volume and raises the water ; 
this pebble is smaller and raises the water less, therefore 
all voluminous objects raise the water-level), but from 
particular to particular : this pebble makes the water 
rise because it is heavy, therefore this other pebble will 
also do so because it too is heavy ; this piece of wood will 
make the water rise because it is large, this one will there- 
fore do so because it also is large, etc. To each object 
belongs a special explanation and consequently special 
relations which can only give rise to special reasoning. 
This of course is only natural, considering what we know 
of childish language and judgment, and it is a charac- 
teristic which has attracted the attention of every psycho- 
logist from John Stuart Mill and Ribot onwards. Stern 
has christened this form of reasoning transduction, in 
contrast to deduction and induction. But all we possess 
as yet is a description of this process of transduction ; 
an explanation of it has yet to be found. To say that the 
child cannot generalize is simply to make a statement of 
fact. The task still remains of bringing this statement into 
relation with what we have found to be the general con- 
ditions of child thought. 

It should be noted, moreover, that transduction is not 
opposed to deduction in the sense that Stern supposed 



IN THE CHILD 185 

it to be. Stern simply adopted the definition of classical 
logic : deduction is a passing from the universal to the 
particular. But logicians themselves, and subsequently 
M. Goblot * have shown that deduction may very well 
deal with individual or special objects, as is often the case 
in mathematics, and so lead from the particular to the 
universal. For in order to prove that the sum of the angles 
of a triangle is equal to 180 we work on a single triangle, 
and only afterwards do we generalize about all triangles 
by modifying the figure on which we have worked. As 
M. Goblot says, quoting Mach, we simply ' construct ' by 
means of a mental experiment the conclusion that is to 
be proved. Wherein, then, does transduction differ from 
deduction ? Clearly by its lack of logical necessity ; mathe- 
matical deduction has a rigour which is absent from trans- 
duction. But wherein does this rigour consist ? According 
to M. Goblot, a mental construction leads to necessary 
conclusions in so far as it obeys rules, and these are not 
the rules of logic, but previously admitted propositions 
which are now applied syllogistically. The rules, then, 
are general propositions, but in this new interpretation, 
deduction does not consist in drawing the looked-for 
conclusion from these propositions ; it consists in applying 
these propositions to a mental or actual construction 
which will allow the desired consequence to be found. 
This solution, however, cannot meet the problem as we 
have stated it here, for it still remains to be determined 
how, from the psychological point of view, the child has 
been able to establish these propositions and to handle 
them with any degree of logical rigour. 2 

1 Traitg de logique, Paris, 1918. 

2 In order to dispose in a few words of this point of logic before 
resuming our analysis of transduction, we may be allowed to point 
out that M. Goblot's solution does not steer clear of all the difficulties 
presented by the problem. For either deduction is limited to drawing 
conclusions from previous propositions which is a view that M. Gob- 
lot rightly rejects or the strictness of the mental construction which 
gives rise to the conclusions is not due solely to the earlier propositions 
applied syllogistically to these constructions. For if the latter were 
the case, our original constructions, those for instance, which by 



186 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

The problem is then as follows. Transduction is a 
form of reasoning which proceeds from particular to 
particular without generalization and without logical 
rigour. Deduction is a form of reasoning that proceeds 
from particular to particular, from universal to particular, 
or from particular to universal, but always with logical 
rigour. What are the relations between this rigour and 
these generalizations ? Can we say that generalization 
leads to rigour, or is it the other way about ? It will 
be our object to show that the absence of rigour from 
transduction is what prevents the child from generalizing, 
and that this lack of rigour is itself due, as we hinted in 
the last paragraph, to the irreversibility of thought. 

Here, then, is a child who claims that a pebble raises 
the water-level because it is heavy, and that a piece of 
wood produces the same result because it is large. The 
child generalizes neither of these explanations, and does 
not feel them to be mutually contradictory. Why ? 
Let the relation be one of cause and effect. " The water 
rises because the stone is heavy." Even in reasoning 
about this particular case a mind accustomed to handle 
deduction would conclude to the existence of a reciprocal 

addition, subtraction, etc. give rise to positive or negative integral 
numbers, ought to be lacking in rigour for want of any previous mathe- 
matical propositions. It may be said in reply to this that the propositions 
on which these operations or constructions rest are the axioms and 
definitions of those same operations. But axioms and definitions are 
not external to construction. The operations or constructions which 
underlie the fertility of mathematics must therefore be their own 
guarantee, and must not be subject to an appeal to any earlier proposi- 
tions. The axiomatic element of science only appears after the science 
in question, and does no more than to emphasize by isolating it the 
verifiable element which the constructions or operations of this science 
contained in themselves. This is why although we accept M. Goblot's 
profound criticism of the syllogism and his notion of construction 
which is so fertile from the psychological point of view, we feel that we 
must go one further and say that ' mental construction ' must itself 
furnish the explanation not only of the fertility but of the rigidity, 
rigour, and strictness of deductive reasoning. It is our opinion that 
a construction becomes rigorous to the extent that it is reversible, and 
that this reversibility of the operations is what makes generalization 
possible, 



IN THE CHILD 187 

relation between the fact of the water rising and the weight 
of the pebble. For each relation of cause and effect there 
is a corresponding relation of effect to cause, and if such 
and such a cause can be reconstructed surely such and such 
an effect can be anticipated ; it is simply a matter of 
altering the original data so as to know whether the 
explanation was right, or of making a supplementary 
experiment to confirm or invalidate the consequences 
drawn from the hypotheses that had arisen during the 
first. Thus our child could have said to himself, by simply 
inverting the relations : " This pebble will make the 
water rise because it is heavy : this piece of wood which 
is not heavy will not make the water rise. If the water 
does rise, then there is no necessary connexion between 
weight and the rise of the water, etc." This shows clearly 
that the discovery of a general law is bound up with the 
possibility of using relations in all directions and of finding 
the reciprocal counterpart to every relation. If the child 
in this particular case has been unable to generalize, has 
failed to find a ' law/ it is simply because the reciprocity 
of the relations in question has escaped him. Otherwise we 
could not understand why the child is unable to generalize, 
seeing that his habits of syncretism, of immediate analogy, 
etc. lead him to assimilate everything to everything else. 

This hypothesis will seem very plausible if reference is 
made to our analysis of the logic of relations (Chaps. II 
and III). We examined at great length the persistent 
difficulties which the child experiences in finding such 
simple reciprocal relations as that of brother and sister, 
of right and left, etc., and we saw that this lack of recip- 
rocity is what prevents children from reasoning logically. 
We may conclude from this that the absence of rigour 
from transduction is due to difficulty in handling relations, 
and particularly in grasping their reciprocity. 

Now, as we saw in the preceding section this inability 
to realize the reciprocity of relations is itself due to the 
irreversibility of thought in the child. The child either 
assimilates everything from the immediate point of view, 



i88 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

or else he juxtaposes a series of separate explanations. 
In both cases, thought is irreversible in the sense that it 
involves contradictions. In both cases, the reciprocity of 
the various perspectives is rendered impossible. 

But the example of Mull which we have just been 
examining is not sufficient to make us grasp the exact 
difference between transduction and adult deduction. 
Mull juxtaposes a series of separate explanations, and this 
is why his reasoning is not reversible. It may be objected, 
however, that in each particular sphere Mull reasons deduc- 
tively : " This pebble makes the water rise because it is 
heavy, therefore this one will do the same because it is 
heavy." This, at any rate, seems to be reasoning by 
partial analogy, and analogy is the starting-point of 
deduction. 

But transduction is something different from reasoning 
by analogy, at least in its beginnings. Let us now quote 
a case of pure transduction, because it is more primitive, 
and will lay bare the mechanism of this reasoning without 
general laws. 

Roy (age 8) tells us that the moon grows. * Half ' of 
the moon (its crescent) becomes ' the whole/ " How 
does the moon grow ? Because it gets bigger. How does 
it happen ? Because we grow ourselves. What makes it 
grow ? The clouds. How did it begin ? Because we 
began to be alive. How did the moon make herself be 
there ? Because we made ourselves be there. And did 
that make the moon grow ? Yes. How ? . . . 
Why ? The clouds made it grow," etc., etc. Roy also tells 
us that the wind walks along, " because we also walk along" 
or that the sun is not trying to go away," because sometimes 
we don't go away" 

For us these words would simply have the following 
meaning : i The moon, the wind, etc. are analogous to 
us. 2 Now we grow and walk, etc., therefore they grow 
and walk, etc. But for the child these propositions 
have a completely different meaning. i There is not 
simply analogy between the different objects Roy is 



IN THE CHILD 189 

talking about, there is syncretism. It is we who make 
the moon grow, etc., not materially, since the clouds do 
that, but ' precausally ' (through confusion of motive 
and cause. See L.T., Chap. V). The analogy is therefore 
felt, not only as a reason, but as an immediately given 
relation. Such cases are not rare. This is not the place 
to discuss them from the point of view of causality- 
This will be done in a later volume where the case of Roy 
will be analysed along with all analogous cases. It will 
be enough to say here that syncretism precedes and out- 
runs mere analogy. 2 There is therefore no general law. 
It is not in virtue of the law : " All living objects grow " 
that the moon grows ; it is quite simply and directly " be- 
cause we grow." The relation here is not merely causal, 
it is also logical. The moon is alive, " because we are alive.' 

We can see now what transduction consists in. It is 
an inference from particular to particular without any 
general law. We can see, above all, why there is no general 
law. It is because there is syncretism, i.e. immediate 
fusion of the separate terms. Now this fusion is irre- 
versible. It takes place as the accidental outcome of 
new perceptions, and deforms what is acquired, instead 
of respecting it as genuine deduction would do. Thus, 
whether there is juxtaposition of separate explanations 
as with Mull, or syncretistic fusion of separate cases, as 
with Roy, in both cases we have irreversibility, and this 
irreversibility is what explains the absence of general laws. 

In conclusion, reversibility of thought determines 
generalization, because this reversibility entails a certain 
necessity according as the phenomena to which the 
mind applies itself admit of more or less reversible experi- 
ments. The essence of thought is the attempt to make 
reality itself reversible. Thus a scientist faced with the 
hypothesis : " The water has risen because the stone is 
big, " will do his best, before knowing how to generalize, 
to find a completely reversible relation between volume 
and the water-level. He will vary the volume of the 
pebble until he has found between this volume and the 



I 9 o JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

water-level a relation that shall be no longer purely causal, 
but functional (which simply means reversible) according 
to which the level will vary " as a function of " the 
volume. This function will enable the scientist to foresee 
both the water-level, given the volume that has been 
immersed, and the volume of the pebble, given level 
that has been reached. From the moment that this neces- 
sity has been reached, even by means of only two or three 
experiments, the proposition in question can be conceived 
as entirely general. Generalization is therefore the product 
of constructions performed on particular cases, as M. Gob- 
lot maintains. But these constructions are directed not 
necessarily by previously admitted propositions but by 
the need for respecting the reciprocity of the relations 
that have been brought into play. 

It goes without saying that in experimental construc- 
tions properly so-called (the physical sciences) the pro- 
gressive generalization can be accompanied by logical 
necessity only in so far as the experiment succeeds in 
converting irreversible reality into a reality that is rever- 
sible. The peculiar property of purely mental construc- 
tions like those of mathematics is to be entirely reversible, 
and therefore entirely logical from the first. 

One could not do better in selecting the distinguishing 
mark of transduction than to describe it as an elementary 
' mental experiment/ or as Mach and Rignano have put it, 
as a combination in imagination of the relations presented to 
us by reality. Elementary mental experiment is not as yet 
a process of necessary reasoning ; there is nothing necessary 
about the observation of facts so long as the elements 
of reality so observed are not dissociated to the extent 
of supplying the material for the construction of a simpler 
and completely reversible reality. For mental experiment, 
arising as it does out of immediate perception, will necessarily 
contain syncretistic and consequently reversible elements. 

How does the transition take place in the child from 
this primitive mental experimenting which is transduction 
to logical reasoning proper ? If we are willing to incur 



IN THE CHILD 191 

the risk of artificial classification, childish reasoning may 
be divided into three principal stages of development. 

The first stage, which might be called ' the stage of 
pure transduction ' would extend up to the age of 7-8, 
and would be distinguished by the character of irreversi- 
bility which we have been describing. 

During the second stage (ages 7-8 to 11-12) the mental 
experiments tend to become reversible, which does not 
mean, however, that they all succeed in doing so on the 
same plane of thought. This reversibility can be recog- 
nized by the diminishing number of contradictions, and 
is the result of an increasing awareness of the reciprocity 
of view-points and relations. After each mental experi- 
ment the child is impelled to travel back along the road he 
has taken, i.e. to find consequences as well as causes and 
proofs as well as explanations. In other words, logical 
or theoretical necessity appears upon the scene. The 
child is no longer content to explain one phenomenon 
by another simply by recalling their common history, 
he wants to connect the two phenomena by a necessary 
relation. Transductive reasoning yields before the 
increasing need for combined induction and deduction. 
Generalization has become possible. 

But this primitive form of necessity and deduction 
is still only concerned with perception; these early 
deductions still bear only upon actual reality, upon 
premisses which are given by direct observation and 
are immediately believed by the child, as opposed to 
hypotheses which are reasoned about in order to test them, 
or assumptions which are suggested by other people. 
Only during the third stage, i.e. after the age of 11-12 are 
these restrictions removed from deduction when thought 
becomes formal and is freed from immediate beliefs of 
the moment. 

What, from our present point of view, is the distinguish- 
ing feature of this third stage to which we have already 
drawn attention in our analysis of formal thought 
(Chap. II) ? Pure transduction, as we have just seen, 



ig2 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

is a primitive mental experiment, a simple imagining or 
imitation of reality as it is perceived, viz. as irreversible. 
The second stage is that of full mental experiment in 
which imagination completes irreversible reality by a 
pictured whole of reversible relations or logical implica- 
tions, such that from A we can infer B and vice versa. 
With those two types of mental experiment it therefore 
looks as though the mind had attained the measure of 
reversibility which it needed. But this is not the case. 
If a mental experiment is to be completely reversible, it 
is necessary to substitute for the objects offered in per- 
ception other more intellectual objects which shall be 
defined in just such a manner as will allow of reversibility. 
Thus, in our recent examples, the child, in order to explain 
why the pebble makes the level of the water rise, begins 
by reasoning about 'weight/ as though this were an 
immediately given notion and bore an unequivocal relation 
to volume. He soon notices, however, that a large object 
and a small object may both have the same weight. 
Absolute weight, i.e. weight conceived as directly indicated 
by volume will therefore have to give way to relative 
weight, and henceforward the child will reason from the 
idea of weight-volume, a relation which he will formulate 
more or less as follows : " Pebble heavy for its smallness " 
or " light for its bigness/' etc. Even if the child has no 
exact scale of measurement in mind there is already 
an advance in the evolution towards greater relativity 
(Chaps. II and III), and this presupposes definitions or 
concepts that are more and more removed from immediate 
reality. Thus we saw the concepts of right and left 
gradually losing their primitive meaning and coming 
nearer and nearer to the state of well-defined relation. 
Now as soon as the mind has attained this degree of 
relativity ; as soon, that is, as it has discarded the naive 
realism bound up with primitive mental experiments, 
the problem of reversibility appears in a completely new 
light. It no longer consists in finding the reciprocal 
element to a given relation between two phenomena, 



IN THE CHILD 193 

but in finding the reciprocal counterpart to a general 
point of view. To put it differently, it is to find the key 
which will enable one to pass from the personal, momentary 
point of view to another point of view without contradict- 
ing oneself. Henceforth the mind is constantly faced 
with the following problem : how to choose suitable 
definitions, concepts or premisses, i.e. such that can be 
used from all possible points of view without contradicting 
either the results of immediate experience, or those of 
past experience or the experience of others ? In other 
words, how to select notions that will have the maximum 
amount of reversibility and reciprocity. This problem 
comes out very clearly in connexion with such reasoning 
processes as we have discussed in Chapters II and III. 
Take, for example, the question bearing upon the three 
objects in a row, of which one is to the left of the second 
and to the right of the third (Chap. Ill, 4). At the 
earliest ages the child says that the first of these objects is 
' in the middle/ and disputes the possibility of being both 
to the left and to the right. Later on, however and our 
experiments showed this very clearly round about the 
age of 11-12 the child will acquire a sufficiently relative 
notion of the relations of right and left, one that is suffi- 
ciently removed from the immediate point of view, for 
the relation to remain the same, whatever the point of 
view. Henceforward, there is reciprocity of view-points, 
and consequently complete reversibility of thought. 

Now, how will the mind be able to solve such prob- 
lems consisting in the choice of definitions or relations, 
when these are not imposed upon it by reality itself ? 
By a ' mental experiment ' ? Certainly not, if mental 
experiment is really a reproduction or an imagining 
of this self-same reality or of the operations which can be 
carried out upon it. Reality never imposes a definition. 
Definition is always the result of a choice and a decision, 
and reality occasions but does not compel this choice. We 
have here an experiment which thought makes, not on 
things, but on itself, in order to find out what greater 

N 



I 9 4 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

measure of fertility or of logical satisfaction it will gain 
from such and such a system of definitions or premisses. 
This experiment is of exactly the same order as that 
which Rauk has described in the ethical sphere. The 
individual adopts a certain rule as a hypothesis, to see 
whether by applying it he reaches a state of moral satis- 
faction, and especially whether he can remain true to him- 
self and avoid contradiction. For in all questions of choice 
or definition of premisses the criteria of contradiction 
and fertility are not external, but internal or moral. 
The question is resolved by a chain of reasoning which aims 
at discovering, not what will happen in the external 
world (as is the case in the simple ' mental experiment '), 
but what will be the state of satisfaction or dissatisfaction 
of the will which has guided the thinking process. We 
have therefore decided to call this experiment logical 
experiment, and to put forward the view that formal 
thought, i.e. deduction dealing with any hypothetical or 
merely assumed hypothesis presupposes this logical 
experiment in addition to the reversible mental experi- 
ments which supply its raw material. For logical experi- 
ment alone enables a suitable choice to be made of the 
notions which serve as starting-points, and it conse- 
quently alone enables the mind to be in harmony with 
itself and thus achieve complete reversibility. 

In conclusion, we may say that the first stage of childish 
reasoning is that of primitive or irreversible mental 
experiment, that the second is distinguished by a begin- 
ning of reversibility in the mental experiments, and that 
the third stage is marked by the appearance of formal 
deduction and logical experiment, the latter alone being 
capable of rendering the mental experiments completely 
reversible. Or again, we can say that during the first 
stage the reasoning mind does no more than to ' imitate ' 
reality as it is, without reaching any necessary implica- 
tions ; during the second stage the mind ' operates upon ' 
reality, creating partly reversible experiments and thus 
reaching the consciousness of implication between certain 



IN THE CHILD ig5 

affirmations and certain results ; finally, in the third stage, 
these operations necessitate each other in the sense that 
the child realizes that by asserting such and such a thing 
he is committing himself to asserting such and such another 
thing. He has at last attained to necessary implication 
between the various operations as such, and to a complete 
reversibility of thought. 

6. CONCLUSION : EGOCENTRISM AND LOGIC. The 
first conclusion to be drawn from our examination of the 
evolution of reasoning is the priority of the logic of 
relations. 1 True, the correct use of relations is what 
appears last, but what is last in chronological order is 
often first in the order of values. Indeed one may say that 
the possibility of reasoning logically is subordinate to that 
of handling relations correctly. In ordinary as in mathe- 
matical reasoning we deal only with particular cases, 
but by building up and combining with each other the 
different elements presented by these particular objects, 
we generalize the initial relations to the full extent that 
is required. 

Logical classes are themselves dependent upon relations. 
The group of dark-haired or of fair-haired individuals is 
obtained by means of relations and of their multiplications. 
To forget the relations which form the basis of classifica- 
tion is to rob the latter of all its value. In logic as in 
mathematics we can talk of ' wholes/ but these have 
significance for us only in so far as we remember the law 
of construction which gave them birth. And the law of 
construction is a combination of relations. 

The syllogism is therefore not reasoning proper, but a 
sort of abbreviated reasoning which consists in making 
use of the facts of inherence (membership and inclusion), 
while disregarding the relations which alone permitted 
the construction of these classes and the establishment 
of these facts. Consequently the syllogism is rigorous, 
but sterile. It is not deductive reasoning, but it allows 

1 We shall speak o'f relations (R) in contrast to facts of inherence 
(membership and inclusion). 



196 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

of the rapid application of previous results. On this 
point we join issue with M. Goblot. 

Logical addition and multiplication, whose use is, as 
we saw, not native to the child, are therefore qua consti- 
tutive of classes subservient to the logic of relations. To 
find the common element in two given classes is to con- 
struct the relations between the given individuals and 
through this construction to reach a classification. 

In short, the fertility of reasoning is due to our unlimited 
capacity for constructing new relations, two given relations 
being always sufficient to find a third by multiplication, 
and so on. The logic of classes is a snap-shot of these 
constructions ; for each relation has its own ' domain,' 
and it enables us to pass at any moment from the point of 
view of relation to that of class and inherence. The most 
ordinary of everyday reasoning processes is that dealing 
with relations ; the syllogism or enthymeme consist only 
in the application of the results obtained. All this is 
current knowledge to-day. 

The reason why the opposite view has survived for so 
long is that thought, in becoming conscious of itself, 
always reverses the order of things, and is last in reaching 
what had actually happened first. Thus classes struck 
the attention long before relations, because, being the 
residue of relations, they lingered in the mind and per- 
meated elaborated verbal thought while the actual process 
of their construction remained unnoticed. 

We are now in a position to define our genetic results 
more closely. Wherein does transduction differ from 
deduction, or what is the nature of primitive relations ? 

Primitive reasoning, we are told, is a ' mental experi- 
ment/ i.e. an imaginary combination of relations given 
directly by reality. Now, primitive relations are always 
relations between the self and things, since reality in 
these early stages is a confused mixture of ' imitation * 
and ' assimilation/ This means that the measuring factor 
which is the ego intrudes upon the measured entity which 
is the world, and every relation given by mental expert- 



IN THE CHILD 197 

ment must originally bear the traces of these two insepar- 
able terms. Now we have seen that the whole perspec- 
tive of childhood is falsified by the fact that the child, 
being ignorant of his own ego, takes his own point of view 
as absolute, and fails to establish between himself and the 
external world of things that reciprocity which alone 
would ensure objectivity. There are undoubtedly certain 
simple relations which, in so far as they are independent 
of his ego, the child can handle correctly, so that many 
childish transductions may be said to be valid. But this is 
due to chance, or at any rate applies to the existence of a 
privileged set of relations. Wherever relations, dependent 
upon the ego, are concerned and they are the crux 
of the matter the child fails to grasp the logic of relations 
for lack of having established reciprocity, first between 
himself and other people, and then between himself and 
things. 

What applies to the child is also true of science. So long 
as Physics took absolute space and time as its domain 
it reached a certain degree of development but came short 
of any fundamental solution. But from the moment that 
it was realized that the measurer was relative to what 
he measured, the resulting relativity enabled physics, 
thanks to the conditions of invariability and co-variability, 
to attain objectivity. In the same way, so long as the 
child thinks he can reason directly about things without 
taking himself into account, he will succeed neither in 
handling relations nor in reaching logical necessity. As 
soon as he brings in his own ego as an element in these 
relations, the child attains to the reciprocity of relations 
and to logical strictness. 

Transduction may therefore be defined as a combination 
of relations woven between the organism and the external 
world by action (the movements of the organism), but 
without consciousness of its own processes on the part of 
this action, and consequently without conscious realiza- 
tion of its own existence on the part of thought. Thus 
the succession of relations constructed by the sum of 



198 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

movements whether performed, begun, or imagined 
does present something that is equivalent to a reasoning 
process, but as these actions are not reversible, deduction 
has not yet appeared upon the scene. In short, transduc- 
tion is a combination of elementary relations, but without 
reciprocity of these relations amongst each other, and conse- 
quently without the element of necessity that would lead to 
generalization. As soon, on the other hand, as relations 
become completely reciprocal, the fertility of relational 
multiplication knows no bounds, and generalization be- 
comes possible. Nay, more, this reciprocity is what explains 
the reversibility of all deductions and consequently the 
character of strictness and necessity that is peculiar to the 
reasoning process. As in the case of mathematics (which 
are only a special case) all relations bear within themselves 
both their own verification and their own fertility. 



CHAPTER V 
SUMMARY AND CONCLUSIONS 

THE PRINCIPAL FEATURES OF CHILD LOGIC. 1 

ROUSSEAU loved to say that the child is not a small 
grown-up, but has needs of his own, and a mentality 
adapted to these needs. Contemporary studies of the 
language and drawing of children have okeu euipi.ctSi^ed 
the truth ol this view. Karl Groos, in his ' theory of play ' 
has given particular weight to this statement, and Clapa- 
rede has developed it extensively from the functional 
point of view. The time, therefore, seems ripe for raising 
the question whether child thought, which differentiates 
itself from every other kind of thought, both by the 
interests which guide it, and by its means of expression, 
cannot also be distinguished by its logical structure and 
method of functioning. This is the view which we shall 
now attempt to develop, at least schematically, and with- 
out renewing any detailed discussion of the phenomena. 
For the purpose of attempting this synthesis, we have 

1 This chapter summarizes Volume I (The Language and Thought of 
the Child), and the present volume, which constitutes the conclusion 
of our * Studies in Child Logic.' Given the loosely-knit character of these 
Studies, which were designed to follow the facts in all their complexity, 
we fear that the reader, having followed us so far, will experience, as 
we did, an impression of incoherence and obscurity. The present 
summary is intended to correct this impression. Starting from the 
beginning, we shall give a rapid and, if possible, complete exposition 
of what we consider to be the essential part of our results, as though 
the reader were not already familiar with the preceding chapters. In 
this way, we run a certain risk of needless repetition, in particular with 
regard to the chapters immediately preceding this conclusion, but we 
believe that by grouping the same subjects under new headings, we 
shall give a more synthetic view of our results. 

199 



200 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

in our possession a certain number of observations made 
in the course of our own studies on the thought of the child, 
or in the course of other enquiries, conducted by the 
method of tests. In addition to this, several works 
dealing with the language, the drawings, and the percep- 
tions of children have furnished us with first-rate informa- 
tion on the subject of his thought. The material collected 
in this way can be grouped under a certain 'number of 
headings : ego-centrism of thought, intellectual realism, 
syncretism, inability to understand relations, difficulties in 
using logical multiplication, etc, etc. The problem can be 
stated as follows : Do these phenomena form an incoherent 
whole, that is to say, are they due to a series of accidental 
and fragmentary causes, unrelated to each other, or do 
they form a coherent whole, and thus constitute a logic 
of their own ? The truth would seem to lie between the 
two. The child's mind shows signs of having a structure 
of its own, but its development is subject to contingent 
circumstances. The question is, where does the role 
of the original structure end and that of the contingent 
circumstances begin ? The only answer lies in the attempt 
to explain the characteristics of child logic by each other. 
If they can be synthesized in this way, even though 
the method seem for the moment to involve us in a vicious 
circle, it means that the thought of the child is coherent 
and sui generis. 

But what do we mean by explaining psychological 
phenomena ? As Baldwin has shown in his subtle analyses, 
without the genetic method in psychology, we can never 
be sure of not taking effects for causes, nor even of having 
formulated problems of explanation aright. The relation 
of cause and effect must, therefore, be superseded by 
that of genetic progression, which adds the notion of 
functional dependence, in the mathematical sense of the 
word, to that of antecedent and consequent. This will 
give us the right to say of two phenomena, A and B, 
that A is a function of B, as B is a function of A, and yet 
leave us the possibility of taking the earliest phenomenon, 



IN THE CHILD 201 

i.e. genetically speaking, the most explicative, as the 
starting-point of our description. What, then, are these 
explicative phenomena? The psychology of thought 
is always faced at this point with two fundamental factors, 
whose connexion it is her task to explain : the biological 
factor, and the social factor. The mind becomes conscious 
of itself, and consequently exists psychologically speaking 
only when it is in contact with objects or with other 
minds. We have here two different planes, theoretically 
independent of one another, and which logically one would 
wish to keep separate ; but in practice, these two planes 
will always be associated, so long as the child has parents 
who represent Society to him, and so long as he experiences 
sensations which constitute a biological environment. 
Describe the evolution of thought from the purely biological 
point of view, or as threatens to be the fashion, from the 
purely sociological point of view, and you risk leaving 
half the real process in the shade. These two poles 
must both be kept in view, and nothing must be sacrificed; 
but in order to make a beginning, we must needs choose 
one language at the expense of others. We have chosen the 
language of sociology, but wish to emphasize the point 
that there need be nothing exclusive in the choice. We 
reserve the right to revert to the biological explanation of 
child thought and to bring our present description into 
accordance with it. All we have attempted to do as a 
beginning, was to order our description from the point of 
view of social psychology, taking the most characteristic 
phenomenon as our starting-point, namely, ego-centrism 
of child thought. We have sought to trace most of the 
characteristics of child logic to ego-cetntrism ; though of 
many of these it might just as well be said that then- 
presence explains ego-centrism. This is of no consequence 
to the object of our research ; all we need do is to point 
out that these characteristics form a compact group, for 
it is this very group that defines the logic of the child. 

i. EGO-CENTRISM OF THOUGHT IN THE CHILD. 
Logical activity is not .the whole of intelligence. One 



JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

can be intelligent without being particularly logical. 
The main functions of intelligence, that of inventing 
solutions, and that of verifying them, do not necessarily 
involve one another ; the first partakes of imagination, 
the second alone is properly logical. Demonstration, 
research for truth is therefore the true function of logic. 

But on what occasions do we experience the need 
to verify our thought ? This need does not arise 
spontaneously in us. On the contrary, it appears very 
late, and for two reasons. The first is that thought 
puts itself at the service of the immediate satisfaction of 
desire long before forcing itself to seek for truth. Thought's 
most spontaneous manifestation is play, or at any rate 
that quasi-hallucinatory form of imagination which allows 
us to regard desires as realized as soon as they are born. 
All the writers who have concerned themselves with the 
play, the testimony, and the lies of children, have realized 
this. Freud has restated it with vigour by showing that 
the ' Lustprinzip ' is prior to the ' Realitatsprinzip.' Now 
the child's mind is full of these ' ludistic ' tendencies up to 
the age of 7-8, which means that before this age it is 
extremely difficult for him to distinguish between fabula- 
tion and truth. 

But this is not all. Even when thought turns away 
from immediate satisfaction and play, and gives itself 
up to disinterested curiosity in things for their own sakes 
(and this curiosity appears very soon, certainly from 
the age of 3) the individual still has the peculiar 
capacity for immediate belief in his own ideas. It 
is, therefore, not for ourselves that we try to verify 
our statements. One of the most striking things one 
finds about the child tinder 7-8, is his extreme assurance on 
all subjects. When, according to one of the well-known 
Binet-Simon tests, a subject of 4 or 5 is shown two little 
boxes of the same volume, and is asked, " Which is the 
heaviest ? " he immediately answers, " That one/' .without 
even having felt the weight of the boxes, and it is the same 
in everything. " I know I " . . . such is the only proof 



IN THE CHILD 203 

that is used for a long time in childish logic. True, the 
child is always asking questions, but up to the age of 7-8. 
a large number of the questions asked are rhetorical: 
the child knows his own answer, and often gives it 
spontaneously, without waiting for the other person to 
speak. Its strength of conviction characterizes what 
Janet has called ' the stage of belief/ l 

It must be remembered, moreover, that experience 
itself does not undeceive minds orientated in this fashion. 
Things are in the wrong, not they. The savage who calls 
down rain by a magic rite explains his failure as the work 
of an evil spirit. He is, according to a famous saying, 
'Impervious to experience.' Experience undeceives him 
only on very special technical points (cultivation, hunting 
or manufacture) ; but even this momentary and partial 
contact with facts does not react in any way upon the 
orientation of his thought. This applies even more strongly 
to the child whose every material want is anticipated by 
his parents' care. Only in his manual games does the 
child learn to understand the resistance of objects. On 
the plane of verbal thought, every idea pictures a belief. 
Round about the age of 6-7, for example,what Mr Brunsch- 
vicg calls the ' artificialist ' explanations given by chilclren, 
of natural phenomena, are very frequent : rivers, lakes, 
mountains,- sea, and rocks have been made by man. 
Obviously, this does not require the slightest proof : the 
child has never seen people digging lakes or building rocks, 
but this does not matter. He enlarges sensible reality (a 
bricklayer making a wall, or a labourer making a ditch) 
by means of the verbal and magic reality which he puts 
on to the same plane. These things are not sufficient in 
themselves to make the mind feel any need for verification, 
since things themselves have been made by the mind. On 
the contrary, the child never really comes into contact 
with things because he does not work. He plays with them, 
or simply believes them without trying to find the truth. 

1 On the stage of r pithiatic tendencies ' see British Journ. of Psych. 
(Med. Sect.), Vol. I, 1921, p. 154. 



204 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

What then gives rise to the need for verification ? 
Surely it must be the shock of our thought coming into 
contact with that of others, which produces doubt and 
the desire to prove. If there were not other people, the 
disappointments of experience would lead to over- 
compensation and dementia. We are constantly hatching 
an enormous number of false ideas, conceits, Utopias, 
mystical explanations, suspicions, and megalomaniacal 
fantasies, which disappear when brought into contact 
with other people. The social need to share the thought 
of others and to communicate our own with success is at 
the root of our need for verification. Proof is the outcome 
of argument. All this, moreover, is common knowledge 
for contemporary psychology. P. Janet has laid great 
stress on the psychological origin of reflection. Reflection 
is the act by which we unify our various tendencies and 
beliefs, in the same way as conversation and social inter- 
course unify the opinions of individuals, namely, by 
giving due weight to each, and extracting an average 
opinion from the lot. Argument is, therefore, the back- 
bone of verification, logical reasoning is an argument 
which we have with ourselves, and which reproduces 
internally the features of a real argument. Ch. Blondel 
has given an added importance to these views, by showing 
that pathological thought is the result of the given 
individual* s inability to submit to social habits of thought. 
Discursive talk and reasoning are the product of 'inter- 
course between individuals. When a man cannot fit his 
personal thoughts and emotions into this schema, when 
he ceases to think socially, the mere fact of this isolation 
destroys the logical structure of his thought. Psycho- 
analysis arrives at a very similar result from a completely 
different angle, and it is to the lasting credit of this science 
that it has discovered two ways of thinking, one, social, 
communicable, guided by the need for adapting oneself 
to others, ' logical thought/ the other, personal, incom- 
municable as such, ' autistic thought/ Now Freud and 
his disciples have shown that by the mere fact of its 



IN THE CHILD 205 

' autism/ this second way of thinking was bound to be 
confused, undirected, indifferent to truth, rich in visual 
and symbolic schemas, and above all, unconscious of 
itself and of the affective factors by which it was guided. 
In order to understand child logic, we must therefore 
begin by asking in what degree children communicate 
their" thought, and try to conform to that of others- 
In order to answer this question, the study of intercourse 
between children and adults will not at first be of very 
much use to us. Such intercourse is undoubtedly of 
fundamental importance, but it raises problems of its own, 
for the respective parts are not on an equality. The child 
feels he is inferior to the adult in every way, and is also 
for a long time under the delusion that the adult under- 
stands everything he says. Consequently, he never tries 
to express his thoughts clearly when he speaks to his 
parents, and conversely, he remembers only as much as 
he chooses of what is said by adults, because of his inability 
to enter into the world of ' grown-ups/ This is why we 
have no proof that childish beliefs held in solitude are 
the same as those which appear in his intercourse with 
adults. From this point of view, the unity of child thought 
is only a postulate. We shall, therefore, leave the question 
of intercourse between .child and adult for the moment, and 
confine ourselves to the results of conversations between 
children ; for if the child really feels any need to socialize 
his thought, he must be able to satisfy such a need to the 
full' with friends of his own age, whom he sees every day, 
and with whom he plays in freedom from restraint or 
self-consciousness. Now, experiment shows that the child's 
way of thinking occupies a place situated exactly between 
the * autistic ' and the social. We have therefore given it 
the name of ego-centric, which indicates that this type of 
thought is still autistic in its structure but that its interests 
tend not merely towards organic or ' ludistic ' satisfaction 
as in pure autism, but towards intellectual adaptation as 
in adult thought. The ego-centric character of child 
thought has been demonstrated by three special enquiries. 



206 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

In the first place (L.T., Chap. I), after making verbatim 
reports at the Maison des Petits (attached to the Institut 
J. J. Rousseau at Geneva) of the language of several 
children over a period of about one month each, we dis- 
covered that between the ages of 5-7, 44-47% of their 
spontaneous remarks were still ego-centric, although these 
children were free to work, play, and talk exactly as they 
chose. Between the ages of 3 and 5, the proportions were 
54-60%. These ego-centric remarks, as opposed to 
question, orders, or adapted information, consisted, for 
the most part, of soliloquies, and of a kind of pseudo- 
conversation or ' collective monologue ' in the course of 
which the children speak to themselves and pay no atten- 
tion to each other. The chief function of this ego-centric 
language is, therefore, to serve as an accompaniment to 
the thought or action of the individual. We have here 
something of a remnant of that ' cry accompanying action/ 
which Janet has spoken of in his studies on language. At 
any rate, we are very far removed from any genuine 
interchange of ideas. This characteristic of a large 
portion of childish talk points to a certain ego-centrism 
of thought itself, the more so as in addition to the words 
with which he marks the rhythm of his own action, 
there must be an enormous number of thoughts which the 
child keeps to himself, because he is unable to express 
them. And these thoughts are inexpressible precisely 
because they lack the means which are fostered only by 
the desire to communicate with others, and to enter into 
their point of view. 

A second study (L.T., Chap. II) showed that even in the 
socialized portion of childish language, conversation passed 
through a certain number of primitive stages before 
becoming a genuine interchange of ideas. Not until about 
the age of 7-8, does argument, in particular, become what 
it is for the adult, namely the change from one point of 
view to the other, accompanied by the effort to motivate 
one's own and to understand that of the interlocutor. 
Before this, argument is nothing but a conflict of contrary 



IN THE CHILD 207 

affirmations, affirmations without understanding, and with- 
out motivation. 

Finally, a third study (L.T., Chap. Ill) served as a 
counter-test and enabled us to specify the causes of this 
ego-centrism. If children talk so little to each other, 
and if, in particular, their best thoughts towards adapta- 
tion to adult thought and to the external world are 
performed in solitude, this may be for two quite separate 
reasons. It may be either that they prefer their own 
company, or it may be that they are permanently under 
the impression that they understand each other, and have 
no suspicion of the ego-centric character of their thought. 
As a matter of fact, the second solution is the right one. 
Not only do children believe that they are talking and 
actually listening to one another, but they also have a 
tendency to think that each of their thoughts is common 
to all the others, that they can all discern it, and understand 
it, even if it never finds distinct expression. For even if 
children are ego-centric, they are ignorant of the nature of 
thought, or rather by the mere fact that they talk only 
for themselves, they are saying aloud everything that they 
can express verbally, and therefore believe that they are 
always understanding one another. 

One is tempted to wonder whether this habit which 
children have of always believing themselves to be under- 
stood, does not, in fact, prevent them from understanding 
each other when they take the trouble to explain them- 
selves. Our third study was devoted to the solution of 
this question of verbal understanding between children 
of the same age. Naturally, when children are playing 
together, or are all handling the same material, they under- 
stand each other, because, however elliptical their language 
may be, it is accompanied by gesture and mimicry which 
is a beginning of action and serves as an example to the 
interlocutor. But it can be questioned whether verbal 
thought and language itself are really understood among 
children, whether, in other words, children understand 
each other when they speak without acting. This prob- 



208 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

lem is of fundamental importance, since it is on the verbal 
plane that the child makes the chief effort of adaptation 
to adult thought and to the acquisition of logical habits. 
Moreover, as it is partly from his verbal thought and not 
as it is presented to him in direct sensation, that the child 
views the world, the verbal plane permeates his whole 
conception of reality. 

For the solution of this problem, we chose fifty child- 
dren from the same class, between the ages 6-7 and 7-8, 
and we made them relate to each other in pairs, a set 
story, and the explanation of a drawing showing the 
mechanism of a tap and of a syringe. Now, it will be 
remembered that although the child who had to explain 
(and each did so in turn) generally had a clear idea of what 
he was explaining, his interlocutor generally failed to 
grasp this explanation, although of course he imagined 
he had been understanding it perfectly well. We need 
not recapitulate the numbers which enabled us to estimate 
the degree of understanding between child and adult, and 
between one child and another. We need only recall the 
fact that lack of understanding between children is due 
as much to faulty expression on the part of the explainer, 
whose very language is ego-centric, as to faulty adaptation 
on the part of the interlocutor who does not listen because 
he thinks all along that he can understand everything, 
and because he assimilates everything he hears to his own 
point of view. 

These are the three groups in support of the hypothesis 
that the thought of the child is more ego-centric than 
ours and that it is half-way between ' autism ' proper, 
and socialized thought. Such a statement is indeed 
hypothetical. There is still a great deal of work to be 
done on the intercourse between children of different ages, 
between brothers and sisters, and above all, between 
parents and children. But the hypothesis is close to 
common sense. However intimately the child may be 
connected to his surroundings in his affective life, there 
is still an enormous portion of his thought that is 



IN THE CHILD 209 

incommunicable, partly because the adult cannot turn 
himself into a child, partly because the child cannot 
measure the limits of adult understanding, nor find 
language that will logically convey his various shades of 
meaning. The fact of childish ego-centrism, therefore, 
seems to us to be beyond dispute. The point is whether 
ego-centrism entails the difficulties in expression and the 
logical phenomena which we shall presently examine, or 
whether the reverse is the case. But surely from the 
genetic point of view, we must start from the child's 
activity, if we want to explain his thought. Now, this 
activity is unquestionably ego-centric and egotistical. 
The social instinct is late in developing. The first critical 
stage occurs at the age of 7-8, and it is precisely at this 
age that we can place the first period of reflection and 
logical unification, as well as the first attempts to avoid 
contradiction. 

2. THE DIFFICULTIES OF CONSCIOUS REALIZATION, 
AND THE SHIFTING 1 OF OPERATIONS ON TO THE PLANE 
OF THOUGHT. Many adults are still ego-centric in their 
way of thinking. Such people interpose between them- 
selves and reality an imaginary or mystical world, and 
they reduce everything to this individual point of view. 
Unadapted to ordinary conditions, they seem to be 
immersed in an inner life that is all the more intense. 
Does this make them more conscious of themselves ? 
Does ego-centrism point the way to a truer introspection ? 
On the contrary, it can easily be seen that there is a way of 
living in oneself that develops a great wealth of inexpres 
sible feelings, of personal images and schemas, while at the 
same time it impoverishes analysis and consciousness of 
self. The work done by M. Ch. Blondel constitutes a 
complete demonstration of this view. The concept of 
autism in psycho-analysis throws full light upon the fact 

1 French ' decalage/ which literally means the lowering of an object 
by removing wedges or supports from under it. The reader must 
therefore bear in mind that the metaphor employed describes a down- 
ward, dropping movement from one plane to another rather than the 
horizontal movement implied in the word ' shifting ' [Translator's note]. 
O 



2io JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

that the incommunicable character of thought involves 
a certain degree of unconsciousness. In short, the claim 
is not too bold that we became conscious of ourselves 
to the extent that we are adapted to other people. Our 
discovery that other people do not spontaneously under- 
stand us nor we them is the gauge of the efforts we make 
to mould our language out of the thousand and one acci- 
dents created by this lack of adaptation and the measure 
of our aptitude for the simultaneous analysis of others 
and of ourselves. 

But how about the child ? Does his ego-centrism go 
hand in hand with a certain degree of unconsciousness 
which would explain of itself a large number of the features 
of childish logic ? The question is of interest only if it is 
raised within the realm of exact experiment. Unless the 
child's unconsciousness of himself is submitted to precise 
technical definition, its existence can naturally only be 
stated as one of the truths of common sense. 

Now a study which we made of certain types of arith- 
metical reasoning (J.R., 1 Chap. IV, i) brought us into 
close contact with a very interesting fact in this connexion. 
When we questioned children between the ages of 7 
and 9 about little problems connected with the notion of 
fractions or about certain verbal expressions, such as 
' x times more/ ' x times less/ we discovered that the 
very diverse answers we received obeyed a law of develop- 
ment which we were able to state more and more definitely. 
But it was a long time before we were able to give 
an immediate interpretation of the children's answers, 
precisely because the child was incapable of telling us how 
he had set about the task in each particular case. He 
appeared in a manner to be unconscious of his own reason- 
ing process, or at any rate incapable of immediate intro- 
spection or retrospection. To recall an example: the 
expression ' 5 times faster than 50 minutes ' was sometimes 
identified with '45 minutes/ As such, this answer has 
no particular interest for us. But the method and the 

1 The initials J.R. designate the present volume. 



IN THE CHILD 211 

degree of consciousness in the reasoning process are sugges- 
tive. As the number of questions was increased, analysis 
showed that the child simply takes away 5 minutes, as 
though " 5 times less " meant " 5." But when he is asked 
to explain what he has done, he can neither describe his 
process of reasoning nor even say that he has ' taken 
away 5 ' from 50. He answers, " I tried " or " I found 
45." If we go on to ask " How did you find ? " and press 
him to reveal the steps of his reasoning, the child invents 
a new calculation which is perfectly arbitrary and pre- 
supposes the answer 45. One boy, for example, told 
us : " I took 10 and 10, and then 10 and 10 and then I 
added 5." 

In short, as soon as the problem contains ever so little 
complexity the child seems to conduct his reasoning 
process much as we do ours in the course of a purely 
empirical problem (such as a puzzle, etc.) ; i.e. he keeps 
no record of his successive attempts, and his mind proceeds 
by -a series of fumbling movements, each of which is 
conscious, but that does not easily admit of retrospection 
as a whole. If after this is over, we ask the child to 
describe his search, all he gives us is a device for finding 
the solution, and a device which presupposes the solution 
in question. Never does he succeed in describing his 
reasoning process as such. 

The reader may consider these introspective difficulties 
insufficient to prove the faint degree of consciousness 
present in childish reasoning, but a number of other facts 
lead us to the same conclusion. One of the clearest is 
the inability of children to give definitions (J.R., Chap. IX, 
2). There are many children between the ages of 7 and 
9 who regard as ' alive ' all self -moving bodies animals, 
sun, moon, wind, etc. But these children are usually 
incapable of giving a reason for their choice. It is we 
who have to make them aware of their own definition of 
life by asking them, for example, why clouds are not alive 
(answer : Because the wind pushes them) . Spontaneously, 
therefore, the child * practised ' or ' acted ' his definition, 



212 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

often even consistently, but without knowing it and 
without being able to express it verbally. 

This feature of children's arithmetical reasoning and 
of their definitions shows in itself that childish reasoning 
cannot consist of a deductive sequence about which the 
subject knows how and why he is carrying it out. It 
consists of a series of discontinuous judgments which 
determine one another extrinsically and not intrinsically, 
or, to put it differently, which entail one another like uncon- 
scious acts, and not like conscious judgments. Childish 
reasoning before the age of 7-8 is in the strict sense of 
the word the ' mental experiment ' of Mach. It resembles 
a physical action during which one arm -movement 
will bring about another arm-movement, but in which 
the subject is unaware of the determinism of these succes- 
sive movements. In other words, the operations remain 
unconscious, and the determinism which rules them has 
not yet become logical necessity. Of course, it may 
be objected that in this determinism there is virtually 
contained a logical implication. But of such the child is 
not aware, so that we have no right to speak of logical 
deduction. There is here, if one likes, a logic of action 
but as yet no logic of thought. 1 

Clapar&de has shown in some exceedingly interesting 
experiments that consciousness of resemblance appears 
earlier in the child than consciousness of difference. As 
a matter of fact, tfye child simply adopts an identical 
attitude to all objects that lend themselves to assimilation, 
but does not need to be aware of this identity of attitude. 
He ' acts ' resemblance, in a manner of speaking, before 
' thinking it/ Difference between objects on the other 

1 The notion of ' unconscious reasoning ' is singularly elastic. Either 
we assign to the unconscious a logic similar to that of reflective thought 
in which we are making a gratuitous assumption, or else we are thinking 
of some special process analogous to that which will be described later 
on. But then the problem arises of how to distinguish this process 
from conscious ' reasoning/ and nothing but confusion can come from 
giving the same name at the outset to operations which are perhaps very 
different from each other. 



IN THE CHILD 213 

hand creates disadaptation, and this disadaptation is 
what occasions consciousness. Claparede has taken this 
fact as the foundation of the law which he had called 
loi de prise de conscience : the more we make use of a 
relation the less conscious we are of it. Or again : We 
only become conscious in proportion to our disadaptation. 
This law seems to us fundamental for establishing 
relations between the functional factors of childish 
thought, particularly between ego-centrism and the 
absence of social needs, and the structural features which 
define childish logic. For this ' law of conscious realiza- 
tion ' is alone in explaining why childish ego-centrism 
should involve the inability to be conscious of logical 
relations. For in so far as he is thinking only for himself, 
the child has no need to be aware of the mechanism 
of his reasoning (J.R., Chap. I, 2 and 4). His attention 
is wholly turned towards the external world, towards 
action, in no way directed towards thought as a medium 
interposed between the world and himself. In so far, 
on the other hand, as the child seeks to adapt himself to 
others, he creates between himself and them a new order 
of reality, a new place of thought, where speech and 
argument will henceforth hold their sway, and upon 
which operations and relations which till then have been 
the work of action alone will now be handled by imagina- 
tion and by words. The child will therefore have to become 
conscious to the same extent of these operations and rela- 
tions which till then had remained unconscious because 
they were sufficient for the purposes of action. 

How does this conscious realization take place ? Clapa- 
r&de's law is a functional law, and only indicates when the 
individual does or does not require to become conscious. 
The structural problem remains. What are the means 
and the obstacles to this conscious realization ? In order 
to answer this question, we shall have to introduce a 
second law, the law of ' shifting/ For to become conscious 
of an operation is to make it pass over from the plane of 
action to that of language ; it is therefore to re-invent it 



214 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

in imagination in order to express it in words. As regards 
reasoning in particular, to become conscious of its opera- 
tions means, as Mach, Rignano and Goblot have said, to 
re-make 'mentally' mental experiments that one has 
already made in action. Consequently, given this per- 
petual necessity for re-invention, whenever a child 
attempts to speak an operation, he will probably relapse 
into the difficulties which he had already conquered on 
the plane of action. In other words, the process of learning 
an operation on the verbal plane will reproduce the same 
incidents as had arisen when this operation was being 
learned on the plane of action ; a process of shifting will 
take place from one apprenticeship to the other. The 
dates will differ, but the rhythms will probably be 
analogous. This shifting from action to thought can be 
observed at every turn. It is of fundamental importance 
to the understanding of child logic and explains all the 
phenomena which have been the object of our enquiry. 
For example, the child has difficulty in realizing that a 
part or a fraction is relative to a whole. He has difficulty, 
when told that a given colour is both darker than one 
and lighter than a third, in discovering which of the three 
is the lightest. Now these difficulties still show very 
clearly on the verbal plane between the years of 7 to n, 
whereas on the plane of action they have ceased to exist. 
But the way the child has to grope and feel in order to 
overcome these difficulties reproduces what a few years 
ago he had known on the plane of action. For on this 
plane too he was unable to divide a whole into two or 
four parts without forgetting the whole, and of comparing 
the features of three objects without committing the fallacies 
which reappear at a later date in his thinking. Thus, the 
mere fact of thinking an operation instead of actually 
carrying it out causes circumstances to reappear that 
had been forgotten long ago on the plane of action (J.R., 
Chaps. II and II). 

This shifting of external experience on to the verbal 
plane has not always received due attention. To Associa- 



IN THE CHILD 215 

tionism it is incomprehensible ; for if our conscious 
reasoning were the direct result of previous experiences, 
then, clearly, once these experiences were over, the 
individual ought to be able to re-enact them in thought, or 
imagination upon the verbal plane. If, however, the 
mental experiment which appears at a given moment on 
the verbal plane is really, as Claparede maintains, due to 
a failure to adapt to new requirements, it will not be a 
mere translation of the subject's most recent and most 
highly evolved external experiments, but will, on the 
contrary, entail a whole process of learning over again. 
It is in this sense in which the past is shifted on to the 
present. The evolution of intelligence is therefore not, 
as was claimed in the Ass6ciationism of Taine and Ribot, 
continuous, but rhythmical ; it seems at times to go back 
upon itself, it is subject to waves, to interferences, and to 
' periods ' of variable length. 

All these statements are the merest truisms nowadays, 
but they are truisms which it is dangerous to neglect 
when we are analysing the reasoning processes of children. 
For we may either confuse verbal aptitude with an apti- 
tude for handling relations in action, or neglect the verbal 
element altogether, as though all the operations of logic 
had not at one time or another to be learnt over again 
on the plane of discursive thought, if they are to be of 
any use in social intercourse. 

Most of the phenomena of child logic can be traced 
back to general causes. The roots of this logic and of its 
shortcomings are to be found in the ego-centrism of child 
thought up to the age of 7-8, and in the unconsciousness 
which this ego-centrism entails. Between the ages of 
7-8 and 11-12 these difficulties are shifted on to the verbal 
plane, and child logic is reminiscent at this point of 
factors which were active at a period prior to this. 

3. INABILITY TO HANDLE THE LOGIC OF RELATIONS, 
AND NARROWNESS OF THE FIELD OF ATTENTION. One 
of the first results of childish ego-centrism is that every- 
thing is judged from the individual's own point of view. 



216 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

The child experiences the greatest difficulty in entering 
into anyone else's point of view. Consequently, his judg- 
ment is always absolute, so to speak, and never relative, 
for a relative judgment involves the simultaneous aware- 
ness of at least two personal points of view. 

Moreover, we are not speaking of any logical relations 
in general but solely of what the logicians call a 'judgment 
of relation ' in contrast to a ' predicative judgment/ Now 
a predicative judgment such as ' Paul is a boy ' only pre- 
supposes a single point of view, mine or Paul's, it does 
not matter which. A judgment of relation such as " Paul 
is my brother/' on the contrary, presupposes at least two 
points of view : mine, for Paul is no one else's brother, 
not even his own, and Paul's, for in his mouth the judgment 
would change its form and become " I am the brother 
of. ..." The same applies to all judgments of relation 
which connect at least two individuals and change in 
form according to the point of view of each. Now the 
child is so accustomed to thinking from his own individual 
point of view, and so incapable of taking that of anyone 
else, that such simple relations as those of brother and 
sister give rise in him to all sorts of difficulties, at any 
rate on the verbal plane. The child tends to deform 
relational judgments that are proposed to him, and to 
reduce them all to the simpler, because absolute form of 
the predicative judgment. 

Two of our former studies (J.R., Chaps. II and III) 
showed us that the child has a tendency, in connexion 
with such statements as " I have brothers," to confuse 
the point of view of inclusion or of the predicative judg- 
ment (" We are x brothers ") with that of relation. It is 
to such causes as these that we must attribute the diffi- 
culties arising out of the Binet-Simon test of absurd 
phrases ("I have three brothers, Paul, Ernest, and myself ": 
a 10-11 years' test, according to the district). In addition 
to this, up to the age of 10, three-quarters of the children 
are unable to indicate simultaneously both how many 
brothers and sisters there are in their own family and how 



IN THE CHILD 217 

many brothers and sisters each brother or sister possesses. 
The typical answer is as follows. The child says, for 
example, that there are two brothers in his family, which 
is correct. " And how many brothers have you got ? 
One, Paul. And has Paul got a brother ? No. But 
you are his brother, aren't you ? Yes. Then he has a 
brother? No" etc. Such a phenomenon is clearly under 
the domination of ego-centrism. There is no reasoning in 
the real sense of the word. The child has never asked 
himself the question and makes no attempt to answer by 
reasoning. The phenomenon consists rather in what 
might be called an illusion of point of view. The habit 
of thinking solely from his own point of view prevents the 
child from taking up that of others and consequently 
from handling the judgment of relation, i.e. from realizing 
the reciprocity of view-points. 

A further enquiry showed us that this explanation can 
be made to cover phenomena connected with more complex 
relations, such as those of right and left (J.R., Chap. III). 
A five-year-old child (in Geneva) can show his left and 
his right hand, but these qualities possess for him an 
absolute meaning. They are the names of the hands, and 
the names of all objects situated in a certain way in relation 
to the child's body. Thus, up to the age of 8, the child 
is unable to point to the left or right hand of anyoiie 
placed opposite him, for the same reason that his own 
point of view is felt to be the only one. At the age of 8, 
the child succeeds in adopting his interlocutor's point 
of view, but this does not mean that he can place himself 
at the point of view of the actual objects. If a pencil 
and a knife are placed on the table, he will be able to 
say whether the pencil is to the left or to the right of 
the knife, but this is still from his own point of view. 
It is not till he is n years old that he will know when 
presented with three objects in a row whether they are 
to the left or to the right of one another when they are 
taken in pairs. In short, his progress seems to run as 
follows: personal view-point, view-point of others, and 



218 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

finally, view-point of objects or of the relational judgment 
in general. 

Ego-centrism seems therefore to be responsible for 
the difficulty which children experience in handling 
relative notions, and for their tendency to deform relational 
judgments by moulding them on the pattern of judgments 
of membership or inclusion. 

In a recently published study l we had occasion to 
analyse in some detail a phenomenon of this kind in 
connexion with a Burt test. Take three little girls, of 
whom the first is fairer than the second and darker than 
the third. The question asked is which of the three is 
the darkest. The children whose reasoning processes 
we analysed make no attempt to compare by taking 
account of the relations that are indicated. They trans- 
form the relational judgments into predicative judgments, 
by means of a mechanism which may be schematized as 
follows. The first and the second of those little girls are 
fair, the first and the third are dark ; therefore the third 
is the darkest of all, the second is the fairest and the 
first stands midway between the two. The result is the 
exact opposite of what it would have been if the relational 
logic of the adult mind had been applied. 

In order to explain this phenomenon, we simply appealed 
to the narrow field of attention in the child (although we 
reminded the reader that this was a static, and therefore 
a provisional way of describing things). For a fax wider 
field of attention is required to handle a relational judg- 
ment than to handle a predicative judgment ; or at any 
rate, as Revault d'Allonnes would put it, there is need 
for more complex ' attentional schemas.' Every relation 
requires that the subject be conscious of at least two 
objects at the same time. P. Janet has often drawn atten- 
tion to this point. Supposing the child's field of attention 
to be narrower, i.e. less synthetic than ours, this means 
that he will be unable to take in all the data of the test 

1 " Un cas de comparaison verbale chez 1'enfant," Arch, de Psych., 
Vol. XVIII. * 



IN THE CHILD 219 

at a single grasp. He will take the objects in one after 
another and not as a whole. This alone will be sufficient 
to transform relational judgments into a series of predica- 
tive judgments, and comparison will take place, not during 
the act of attention, but after it. We were able, moreover, 
to confirm this hypothesis by an examination of the 
different stages traversed by children from 7-8 up to 11-12 
years old in connexion with this comparison test. 

But on this hypothesis it still remains to be explained 
why the child has a narrower field of attention than ours. 
We showed in the last section of this chapter that the 
child's awareness of his own thought and reasoning 
process is fainter than ours. But this is no reason why 
attention that is directed towards the external world 
(attention in perception, understanding of language, etc.) 
should obey the same law. Childish attention might very 
well, like childish memory or the memory of feeble-minded 
persons, be more plastic than ours. The difference would 
then reside in the degree of organization, in the structure 
of the schema of attention. This is the solution we must 
look for. 

Now it is our belief that childish ego-centrism exerts a 
profound influence upon this schematism of attention 
in preventing from adopting the point of view of several 
different objects simultaneously, or more generally, of 
objects themselves. The ego-centric way of thinking 
in relation to one's immediate neighbours (of which we 
have just been examining examples in connexion with 
the notions of brother and sister, right and left) brings 
with it a certain number of habits or schemas which may 
be characterized as realistic in analogy to the many 
realistic illusions which occur in the early history of 
science (geocentric hypothesis, etc.) (J.R., Chap. Ill, 
5-7)- The child therefore takes his own immediate 
perception as absolute. Most of the boys in Geneva go 
on believing till they are 7-8 years old that the sun or 
the moon follows them on their walks because they 
always happen to be above them. They are greatly 



220 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

perplexed when they have to say which of two boys 
walking in different directions is being accompanied by 
these heavenly bodies. (I was able to make sure that 
this was due neither to invention nor to deformation 
of adult talk.) This amounts to practically the same 
thing as ignorance of relational notions and avoidance of 
comparison. This is why, in the opinion of young 
Genevans up to the age of 7-8, wood floats upon water 
because it is light (in the absolute sense), and not because 
it is lighter than water. Their language alone is sufficient 
to make this clear. But what is most significant is that 
in the presence of equal volumes of water and wood they 
maintain that the wood is the heavier of the two, This 
estimate changes after the age of 8-9. In other words 
comparison and relation, even imagined, have no interest 
in connexion with natural phenomena before this age. 
Immediate perception is the measure of all things. 

Such habits of thought, acquired as they are over 
a period of many years, will naturally have some effect 
upon the schematism of attention. In the first place this 
realism prevents the child from looking at things as they 
are in themselves. He sees them always in terms of the 
momentary perception which is taken as absolute and, 
in a manner of speaking, hypostasized. He therefore 
makes no attempt to find the intrinsic relations existing 
between things. Again, by the mere fact of not being 
considered in their internal relations, but only as presented 
by immediate perception, things are either conglomerated 
into a confused whole (syncretism), or else considered 
one by one in a fragmentary manner devoid of synthesis. 
Herein lies the narrowness of the child's field of attention. 
The child sees a great many things, often many more 
than we do ; he observes, in particular, a whole mass of 
detail which escapes our notice, but he does not organize 
his observations, he is incapable of thinking of more 
than one thing at a time. Thus he squanders his data 
instead of synthesizing them. His ' multiple attention/ 
as Revault d'AUonnes puts it, is out of proportion to his 



IN THE CHILD 221 

apperceptive attention, just as the organization of his 
memories is out of proportion to the plasticity of his 
retentiveness. 

Thus, while ego-centrism of thought may hardly be said 
to involve a narrow field of attention it may yet be claimed 
that ego-centrism and such an attentional schematism are 
closely bound up with one another. Both arise from primi- 
tive habits of thought, which consist in taking immediate 
personal perception as something absolute, and both bring 
in their wake an inability to handle the logic of relations. 

4. SYNTHETIC INCAPACITY AND JUXTAPOSITION. This 
narrowness of the field of attention in children and the 
peculiar character of their schema of attention carry yet 
further consequences. They explain a whole set of pheno- 
mena such as the synthetic incapacity which appears in 
children's drawings, the inability to establish interference 
between logical classes, the inability to understand 
partitive relations, etc. all of which, in the verbal sphere, 
can be brought together under the heading of juxtaposition 
(J.R., Chap. I). 

For if things are perceived in the light of the moment, 
without order or organization, if the work of rational 
attention is to deal with them one by one and not in groups, 
then the child will naturally juxtapose things and events 
in his mind, without achieving their synthesis. M. Luquet 
has described this phenomenon under the name of 
synthetic incapacity in connexion with the drawings of 
children. The child artist will juxtapose pieces of one 
and the same whole, but will be unable to connect them 
together. He will draw, for example, an eye alongside 
of a head, and so on. Now, even in drawing, one realizes 
that this phenomenon outweighs many technical factors 
(clumsiness in handling a pencil) and has its roots in the 
thought of the child. We have published a very clear 
example of this the drawings of bicycles between the 
ages of 5 and y. 1 In Geneva, 7-8 is the age when the 

1 " Pour l'tude des explications d'enfants," L'Educateur, Vol. 
LVTII, 4 th, Feb. 1922. 



222 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

mechanism of bicycles is properly understood by boys. 
In the earlier stages, even though the child is well aware 
that a gear, a chain, and pedals are required to make the 
bicycle move, he is unable to bring out clearly the details of 
contact and the exact causal sequence between these 
pieces. Now the a!ge of correct causal explanation given 
verbally is also the age of correct drawing. But at the 
age when explanation is fragmentary, drawing is either 
primitive or accomplished, but always characterized by 
synthetic incapacity. Thus, between the two big wheels 
of the bicycle, gear, pedals and two horizontal lines 
representing the chain will be juxtaposed in complete 
separation from each other. The synthetic incapacity 
of the drawing is repeated here in a 5 synthetic incapacity 
of thought itself. 

Synthetic incapacity survives for a long time after this, 
at least if the concept be extended so as to cover all the 
similar phenomena which we designate under the name of 
phenomena of ' juxtaposition/ Thus there is a tendency 
in childish reasoning to juxtapose classes and propositions 
rather than to establish their exact hierarchy. We went 
into this in connexion with the difficulties raised by 
logical multiplication. 1 The child is given, for example, 
a test of the form : "If this animal has long ears it is a 
mule or a donkey; if it has a thick tail it is a mule or 
a horse. Well, this animal has long ears and a thick tail, 
What is it." Instead of finding the exact interference of 
the two classes and saying that the animal in question 
is a mule, boys, even of 10 or n years old, add up the 
conditions and juxtapose the classes instead of excluding 
the unwanted elements. In this way, they reach the 
conclusion that the animal might just as well be a horse, 
a donkey, or a mule. This shows the true nature of the 
phenomenon of juxtaposition. The child begins by 
considering the existence of long ears, and concludes 
that the animal must be a donkey or a mule. He then 
considers the existence of the thick tail. If this new 

1 Journ. de Psych., Vol. XIX (1922), p. 222. 



IN THE CHILD 223 

condition were made to interfere with the preceding one, 
the child would eliminate the donkey since it has not got 
a thick tail. But the child considers this new condition 
separately, he juxtaposes it instead of contrasting it 
with the former condition, and he concludes that the animal 
may be a horse or a mule. Each judgment is therefore 
juxtaposed and not assimilated to the judgment that 
precedes it. Finally, the child merges these two judgments 
into a single whole, but this whole constitutes a mere 
juxtaposition not a hierarchy. For the child comes to 
the conclusion that all three cases are possible. He 
therefore eliminates nothing. He juxtaposes without 
choosing. In a sense then, this is synthetic incapacity, 
since all synthesis implies choice and hierarchy, and 
differs from mere juxtaposition (J.R., Chap. IV, 2). 

This feature of childish judgment naturally excludes 
any kind of syllogistic reasoning. For the syllogism is a 
succession of logical additions and multiplications, and 
the child who is incapable of these operations will by this 
fact alone remain a stranger to the syllogism. There must 
therefore be no question of giving children explicit 
syllogisms to comment upon or to complete. The form 
given to the syllogisms in logical text-books is one that 
is of very little use. We think by enthymemes rather 
than by syllogisms, and, as the method of induced intro- 
spection has shown, we often think by enthymemes that 
can be formulated. It is permissible, however, without 
incurring the charge of artificiality, to give the child tests 
of the form : " Some of the inhabitants of the town of 
St Marcel were Bretons. All the Bretons from the town of 
St Marcel were killed in the war. Are there any inhabitants 
left in St Marcel ? " a Now a large proportion of the boys 
of lo-n whom we questioned by means of tests of this 
kind in Paris failed to perform this logical multiplication. 
They concluded that there were no inhabitants left in 
St Marcel. 
This test leads us on to the consideration of a second 

i Joum. de Psych., Vol. XVIII (1921), p. 463. 



224 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

form under which the phenomenon of juxtaposition may 
appear. We mean the difficulty which children have in 
grasping the relation of part to whole 1 and fractional 
relations in general. These difficulties reappear at 
various stages, first in the plane of action and perception, 
then later on that of verbal thought. On the first plane 
the child (before the age of 7-8) will draw part of an object 
and will be unable to attribute it to the whole, or more 
simply, he will forget about the whole (synthetic in- 
capacity) ; or else in attempting to divide 8 or 10 matches 
into two equal piles he will forget all about the total that 
is to be divided half-way through the operation. In short, 
by the mere fact of his tendency to juxtapose instead of 
establishing a hierarchy, the child is led to regard the 
parts of a whole as discontinuous fragments independent 
of each other and independent of the whole. Now once 
these difficulties have been overcome on the plane of 
perception they reappear on the verbal plane. On the 
one hand, when one says to the child "A part of my 
flowers . . .," etc., the child, in spite of the genitive * of ' 
has a tendency not to look for the whole but to consider 
this ' part ' simply as a small incomplete whole. On the 
other hand, and in intimate connexion with this capacity 
for thinking of a part without relating it to a whole, the 
genitive 'of is not taken as partitive. " A part of my 
flowers" therefore means "a bunch of flowers" (J.R., 
Chap. Ill, 6). 

But the tendency to juxtapose instead of synthesizing 
is not to be found only in the schematism of judgments 
as in the preceding examples, it also characterizes implica- 
tion itself. What is meant by this was shown by our study 
of the conjunctions of logical and causal relation (because) 
and of the conjunctions of discordance (although) (J.R., 
Chap. I). In his language, the child frequently omits 
from between his successive judgments such relations 
as we would expect to find, and is content to juxtapose 
these judgments without any conjunctions or simply by 

* Jouvn. de Psych., Vol. XVIII (1921), p, 449. 



IN THE CHILD 225 

means of the term ' and.' Thus in the explanations 
that take place between children (L.T., Chap. Ill, i) 
there are hardly any explicit causal relations. Explana- 
tion takes on the character of a narrative. Relations are 
only indicated by ' and then ' even in connexion with 
mechanical phenomena. This is why, when a child of 
7-8 is asked to complete a sentence containing ' because/ 
he will sometimes do so correctly and sometimes invert 
the relation indicated by ' because/ For example, " The 
man fell off his bicycle because he was ill afterwards." The 
word ' because ' is often used correctly by the child to 
indicate psychological relations (such as motivation : 
" because Daddy won't let me "). But instances of 
' because ' indicating relations of physical causality or 
logical relations are almost completely absent from the 
spontaneous talk of the child, and when their use is 
induced, mistakes such as those we have quoted tend to 
occur. For a long time, finally, the word ' therefore ' 
(done) does not exist in child language. It is replaced 
by the term ' and then ' (alors) ; but for a considerable 
period this term only indicates succession in time and 
not the relation of consequence. 

All these facts agree in proving a certain synthetic 
incapacity in the thought of the child, and show that this 
incapacity bears primarily upon the schematism of judg- 
ment or upon the relations existing between judgments. 
But does this mean that the mind of the child is peopled 
with a multitude of juxtaposed ideas and judgments 
unconnected by any bond, as appears to be the case to 
an outsider ? In other words, has the child himself a 
feeling of chaos and discontinuity ? It is obvious that 
nothing could be farther from the truth, and that for any 
deficiency in objective relations there is a corresponding 
excess of subjective relations. This is shown to be the 
case by the phenomenon of syncretism which seems to be 
the opposite, but is really the complement of juxtaposition. 
There is one particular feature in the structure of childish 
ideas which serves as a transition between juxtaposi- 



226 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

tion and syncretism ; we mean the relation which unites 
terms that have been separated by synthetic incapacity. 
When there is no occasion, such as drawing or language 
for the child to break up objects by analysis, these are, 
as will be shown in a moment, perceived syncretically. 
But once they have been broken up and that synthetic 
incapacity renders their synthesis impossible, what is the 
relation which gathers the juxtaposed elements into a 
group ? M. Luquet has noted with great truth that it is 
a relation of membership and not of inclusion, by which 
he means (no regard being paid to the logical meaning of 
these terms) that an arm drawn alongside of a manikin is 
conceived by the child as ' going with ' the manikin not 
as ' forming part of ' his body. We have often come across 
this relation in the ideas of children, and have given it 
the name of relation of property, so as to avoid confusion 
with the vocabulary of logic. This is how in the expression 
" A part of my posy " the term ' of ' indicates neither a 
partitive nor an attributive relation, but, as it were, a 
mixture of the two : " the part that is with my posy/' 
such is the translation which a child gave us. And it is in 
the same way that our young Genevans, though they knew 
for the most part that Geneva is in Switzerland, yet 
declare themselves to be Geneva and not Swiss, because 
they cannot imagine being both at the same time (J.R., 
Chap. Ill, 6). For them, Geneva ' goes with ' Switzer- 
land, but they see no sign here of a part and a whole, and 
make no attempt to define the spatial contacts. Finally 
if comparison may be made between heterogeneous 
cases this is how judgments of juxtaposition come to be 
accompanied by a ' feeling of juxtaposition/ although 
this feeling never becomes an awareness of causality or 
of implication. Children who draw a bicycle chain along- 
side of a gear-wheel and a pedal know that these things 
' go together ' ; but if they are urged to be more precise 
in their statements, they ^ill sometimes say that gear- 
wheel sets the cogged chain in motion, sometimes that 
it is the other way about. These two statements co-exist 



IN THE CHILD 227 

within the same individual, and prove very clearly that 
in this case the consciousness of causality does not go 
beyond a simple " feeling of relation/' 

Juxtaposition and synthetic incapacity do not therefore 
stand for disharmony. These phenomena are accompanied 
by relational feelings, either static (relation of property) or 
dynamic (feeling of causal relation), feelings of which the 
explanation is supplied by our analysis of syncretism. 
For they constitute a substitute for syncretism when the 
unity which the latter supplied has been broken up, and 
no fresh unity has been built up again. 

5. SYNCRETISM. Syncretism is related to nearly all 
the phenomena we have been calling to mind. In the 
first place, as we said a moment ago, it seems like the 
contrary but is really the complement of juxtaposition. 
For if childish perception considers objects in their imme- 
diate, fragmentary and unrelated aspect, and if either in 
language or in drawing these objects are simply juxtaposed 
instead of being arranged in a hierarchy, it is perhaps 
because these objects, before being broken up by the 
exigencies of drawing or conversation, were too intimately 
related to one another, too deeply sunk in comprehensive 
schemas, and too thoroughly implicated in one another to 
be broken up with impunity. The reason why this related- 
ness given in the original perception of objects offers so 
little resistance to the disintegrating effects of drawing 
or conversation is perhaps that it was exaggerated and 
consequently, subjective. Now to say that child thought 
is syncretistic means precisely this, that childish ideas 
arise through comprehensive schemas and through sub- 
jective schemas, i.e. schemas that do not correspond to 
analogies or causal relations that can be verified by every- 
body. If, therefore, the child possesses neither the logic 
of relations nor the synthetic capacity which would enable 
him to conceive of things as objectively related to one 
another, it must be because his way of thinking is 
syncretistic. For in the mind of the child everything is 
connected with everything else, everything can be justified 



228 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

by means of unforeseen allusions and implications. But 
we have no suspicion of this wealth of relations, precisely 
because this very syncretism which causes it is without 
the means of expression that would render it communic- 
able. 

This last remark leads one to suppose that syncretism, 
besides being bound up with the phenomenon of juxta- 
position and with inability to handle the logic of relations, 
is also the direct outcome of childish ego-centrism. Ego- 
centric thought is necessarily syncretic. To think ego- 
centrically means on the one hand that one does not 
adapt oneself to the sayings nor to the view-points of 
other people, but brings everything back to oneself, and 
on the other hand, that one takes one's own immediate 
perception as something absolute, precisely to the extent 
that one fails to be adapted to the perceptions of other 
people. Under both these aspects the ego-centric tendency 
leads to the same result, which is to be ignorant of objective 
relations in favour of subjective relations, to impose 
arbitrary schemas upon the world of external objects, 
to be constantly assimilating new experiences to ancient 
schemas, in a word, to replace adaptation to the external 
world by assimilation to the self. Syncretism is the expres- 
sion of this perpetual assimilation of all things to subjective 
schemas and to schemas that are comprehensive because 
they are unadapted. 

Syncretism therefore permeates the thought of the child. 
Claparde has pointed out its importance in perception. 
Cousinet has described, under the name of ' immediate 
analogy/ the prompt and unhesitating process by which 
the child identifies new objects with old schemas. In 
the meantime, we have discovered in the understanding 
and reasoning of the child under 7-8 and in the under- 
standing and verbal thought of the child between 8 and 
11-12, a tendency which is common to all syncretism. 
On the one hand, childish understanding undergoes a 
process which is completely unanalytic. A sentence 
heard is not broken up into distinct terms, but gives rise 



IN THE CHILD 229 

to a general schema which is vague and indissociable. 
On the other hand, the child does not reason by explicit 
inferences, but by projecting these schemas into one 
another, and by fusing images according to laws which 
are more often those of ' condensation ' than of logic. 
Let us recall quite shortly how syncretism makes its 
appearance before the age of 7-8, then what it becomes 
once it has been shifted on to the verbal plane between 
7-8 and II-I2. Before the age of 7-8, syncretism may 
be said to be bound up with all mental events and with 
nearly all the judgments that are made. For any two 
phenomena perceived at the same moment become caught 
up in a schema which the mind will not allow to become 
dissociated, and which will be appealed to whenever a 
problem arises in connexion with either of these two 
phenomena. Thus, when children of 5-6 are asked : 
" Why do the sun and moon not fall down ? " the answer 
does no more than to invoke the other features appertain- 
ing to the sun and the moon, because these features, 
having been perceived en bloc and within the same whole 
as the feature requiring explanation, seem to the child 
a sufficient reason for the latter. Such answers as these 
would be absurd if they did not point to a reciprocal 
implication of features that have been perceived together, 
far more powerful than would be the case for a non- 
syncretistic mentality. Here are some examples : The 
sun does not fall down " because it is hot. The sun stops 
there. How? Because it is yellow" (Leo, age 6). "And 
the moon, how does it stop there ? The same as the sun t 
because it is lying down on the sky " (Leo). " Because it 
is very high up, because there is no [no more] sun, because 
it is very high up " (Ba, age 5), etc. Or again, if one 
shows the child a glass of water and if, after putting a 
small pebble into it so as to make the level of the water 
rise, one asks the child why the water has risen, the only 
explanation given will often be a simple description of 
what has happened; but because of syncretism this 
description will possess explanatory value for the child. 



230 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

In Tor's opinion (age 7$) the water rises because the 
pebble is heavy. When wood is used, the water rises 
because the wood is light, and so on. Incidentally, these 
answers, when submitted to analysis, showed that to the 
child, weight meant something more dynamic than it 
does to us ; but what is most remarkable is that two 
contradictory reasons can be invoked by the same sub- 
ject. Either such facts as these are due to the n'importe 
quisme of which Binet and Simon have spoken (and this 
would hardly apply to cases where the child is interested 
in the experiment in which he is taking part), or else 
description has a greater explanatory value for the child 
than for us, because features bound together within the 
raw material of observation seem to him to be related 
to one another by causal connexions. This immediate 
relation is what constitutes syncretism. 

In all these cases and they are without number 
syncretism seems to describe the following course. First 
of all two objects or two features are given simultaneously 
in perception. Henceforth the child perceives or conceives 
them as connected or rather as fused within a single schema. 
Finally, the schema acquires the strength of reciprocal 
implication, which means that if one of the features is 
isolated from the whole, and the child is asked for its 
reason, he will simply appeal to the existence of the 
other features by way of explanation or justification. 

This facility in connecting everything with everything 
else, or to speak more accurately, this inability on the 
part of childish perception and understanding to isolate 
the elements of all-round schemas, is to be found again 
on the verbal plane after the age of 7-8. For after this 
age perception becomes more analytical, causal explana- 
tion begins to play its part in a mentality which up till 
then was precausal (see 8) ; in short, syncretism tends 
to disappear from the subject's view of the external 
world. But on the verbal plane, which, with the increasing 
mental intercourse between children and between children 
and adults, becomes the habitual sphere of reasoning, 



IN THE CHILD 231 

the old difficulties survive and even reappear in new forms. 
For sentences and statements heard in the mouth of other 
people give rise to a mass of syncretistic verbal manifesta- 
tions which are due, as before, to analytical weakness, and 
the tendency to connect everything with everything else. 

We have already had occasion to publish certain facts 
connected with the syncretism of reasoning in the child, 1 
which show very clearly the child's difficulty in isolating 
the elements of a schema. Here, for example, is one of 
Burt's tests which raises insurmountable difficulties : 
" If I have more than a franc I shall go either by taxi or 
by train. If it rains, I shall go either by train or by bus. 
Now it is raining, and I have half a louis (10 francs). 
Which way do you think I shall go ? " The child cannot 
succeed in isolating the two elements from one another. 
Since you take the train or the bus if it rains, you must 
take the train or a taxi if it does not rain. Of this he feels 
convinced. Consequently, most of the subjects deem that 
you will go by bus, since the train is to be found in both 
terms of alternation, and is bound up with the condition 
' fine weather/ Thus syncretism prevents analysis, and 
prevents deductive reasoning. Such cases also show how 
syncretism explains the child's inability to perform logical 
multiplication, and reveal his tendency to put juxtaposi- 
tion in the place of synthesis. 

Another and very different case of syncretism which we 
discovered is equally suggestive from the point of view 
of the analytical weakness shown by the child whenever 
there is any question of connecting propositions or even 
of understanding words independently of the schemas 
in which they are enveloped (L.T., Chap. IV). The child 
is given a certain number of easy proverbs and a certain 
number of corresponding sentences jumbled together, 
but each meaning the same thing as one of the given 
proverbs. He is then asked to find the connexion. Now 
up till the age of 11-12 the child chooses the corresponding 
sentence more or less at random, or at any rate by means 

1 Journ. de Psych., Vol. XIX (1922), pp. 222-261, passim (op. cit.). 



232 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

of accidental and purely superficial analogies. But the 
significant thing is that at the moment of choosing the 
corresponding sentence the child fuses proverb and 
sentence into a single schema which subsumes them both 
and justifies the correspondence. We have here a 
syncretistic capacity which at first sight seems due to pure 
invention ; but analysis shows that it comes from the 
child's inability to dissociate comprehensive perceptions 
or to restrain the tendency that wants to simplify and 
condense everything. For instance, a child of 9 assimilates 
the proverb " White dust will ne'er come out of sack of 
coal," to the corresponding sentence, " People who waste 
their time neglect their business." According to him, 
these two propositions mean ' the same thing/ because coal 
is black and can be cleaned. Similarly, people who waste 
their time neglect their children, who then become black 
and can no longer be cleaned. The uniformity shown 
by these answers to which we need not return at this point, 
excludes the hypothesis of invention. It shows how 
universal is the tendency ,of the child to create compre- 
hensive schemas in his imagination, and to condense the 
various images into each other. 

Such, then, is syncretism : immediate fusion of hetero- 
geneous elements, and unquestioning belief in the objective 
inter-implication of elements condensed in this way. Syncre- 
tism is therefore necessarily accompanied by a tendency 
to justify things at any price. Now this is exactly what the 
facts show to be the case. The child can always find a 
reason, whatever may happen to be in question. His fertility 
in framing hypotheses is disconcerting, and recalls the in- 
tellectual vagaries of ' interpreters ' rather than the imagi- 
native constructions of normal adults. The experiment in 
proverbs of which we have just been speaking bears testi- 
mony to this. The same tendency appears very clearly in 
children's ideas about natural phenomena. It partly ex- 
plains why the idea of chance is absent from the thought of 
the child before the age of 7-8, and this constitutes one of 
the principal reasons for the phenomenon of precausality. 



IN THE CHILD 233 

6. TRANSDUCTION, AND INSENSIBILITY TO CONTRA- 
DICTION. Does reasoning in the child obey the laws of 
adult logic ? Above all, does it obey the law of contra- 
diction ? If it be borne in mind, in the first place, that 
child thought is ignorant of the logic of relations, that 
addition and multiplication of logical classes are unknown 
to it (juxtaposition being constantly chosen in preference 
to hierarchical arrangement) : if it be remembered, 
moreover, that the various relations created by syncretism 
are comprehensive and do not admit of analysis, then 
nothing will prevent us from concluding that the process 
of reasoning in the child is, as Stern has put it, neither 
inductive nor deductive, but transductive. By this Stern 
means that child thought proceeds neither by an ampli- 
fying induction nor by an appeal to general propositions 
which are designed to prove particular propositions, but 
that it moves from particular to particular by means of 
a reasoning process which never bears the character of 
logical necessity. For instance, a child of 7 who is asked 
whether the sun is alive, answers : " Yes. Why ? 
Because it moms [moves along]/' But he never says that 
" All things that move are alive." This appeal to a general 
proposition has not yet come into being. The child seeks 
neither to establish such a proposition by means of suc- 
cessive inductions, nor to postulate it for the purposes of 
deduction. On the contrary, if we try to make him aware 
of a general rule, we shall find that it is by no means the 
rule for which we were prepared. In the above example 
it cannot be " All things that move are alive," because 
certain things " that move " are conceived as inanimate, 
ELS for example clouds (" Because the wind pushes them " ; 
they are therefore not self-moving). In a word, the child's 
reasoning is concerned only with individual cases and does 
not attain to logical necessity. This is why it is transductive. 

But Stern's description requires to be completed. For 
recent discussions on deduction and induction and M. 
Goblot's work in particular have altered these conceptions 
in such a way that if we were to accept Stern's definition 



234 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

of transduction it would be found not to differ from adult 
deduction that deals with singular cases (as, for example, 
in mathematics). 

What seems to us the distinguishing feature of trans- 
duction is therefore its lack of logical necessity; the 
fact that thia type of reasoning deals only with individual 
cases is certainly important, but cannot be said to be 
fundamental. As a result of his ego-centrism, the child 
does not as yet feel any desire for demonstration ; he 
makes no attempt to connect his judgments with bonds 
that bear the mark of necessity. Childish judgments of 
which a chain constitutes precisely what we have called 
transduction are therefore connected to each other in 
the same manner as are our tentative movements, viz. 
without consciousness of the uniting relations. What 
welds these momentary judgments together is some one 
aim, external to the act of judging, or some one action 
carried out upon the world of reality. But outside such 
extrinsic systematization there exist between these judg- 
ments no conscious implication and no demonstrative links. 
The psychologist will certainly succeed in finding the 
logical reason for a child's judgment, but the child himself 
looks for no such filiation between his propositions. At 
this stage, therefore, implication constitutes a motor 
rather than a mental phenomenon, and it is no exaggera- 
tion in this sense to say that there is no logical reasoning 
before the age of 7-8. For the justifications arising out of 
syncretism are devoid of logical necessity. As to the 
motor implications which have produced the reasoning 
process, they are still below the level of consciousness. 

For by the term ' reasoning ' should be understood the 
work of controlling and proving hypotheses, which work 
alone creates conscious implications among judgments. 
Clapar^de has distinguished with great clarity three 
distinctly separate moments in intellectual activity: 
question, invention of hypothesis, and control. Now, the 
question is only the manifestation of a desire ; the 
hypothesis is framed by the imagination to fill up the gap 



IN THE CHILD 235 

created by this desire. Reasoning therefore appears only 
at the moment when the hypothesis is verified. Up till 
then there has been no logical activity. How then does 
the control take place ? To use the current formula, by 
means of a mental experiment. But this formula is 
slightly ambiguous and there are, in our opinion, three 
genetically distinct types of mental experiment: that 
which we find in the child before the age of 7-8, that which 
we find between 7-8 and 11-12, and finally, that of the 
adult. We also believe it necessary to point out that 
this third type of mental experiment is accompanied by 
an experiment which might be called ' logical experiment/ 
Unless this is done there is a certain element of ambiguity 
in the descriptions of Mach, of Rignano, and even of 
Goblot. The difference between extreme instances of these 
types is as follows : 

Mental experiment is a reproduction in thought of 
events as they actually succeed one another in the course 
of nature ; or again, it is an imagined account of events 
in the order which they would follow in the course of an 
experiment which one would actually carry out, if it 
were technically possible to do so. As such, mental 
experiment knows nothing of the problem of contradiction ; 
it simply declares that a given result is possible or actual, if 
we start from a given point, but it never reaches the con- 
clusion that two judgments are contradictory of each 
other. Consequently, mental experiment, like actual 
physical experiment, is irreversible, which means that? 
starting from a and finding i, it will not necessarily be 
able to find a again, or if it does so, it will not be able to 
prove that what it has found is really a and not a become 
a'. Similarly, if it finds 6 again after starting from c or 
from d, and not from a, it will have no means of proving 
that what it has found is really 6 and not & become V . 
And these defects in mental experiment are the same 
as those which characterize childish reasoning, for the 
latter is content to imagine or to reproduce mentally actual 
physical experiments or external sequences of fact. 



236 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

The logical experiment which intervenes from the age 
of 11-12 is certainly derivative from this process and has 
no other material than that of the mental experiment 
itself. It also deals mostly with individual cases, and 
does no more than combine the different relations exist- 
ing between things, with or without the aid of syllogisms. 
But this logical experiment which comes as the completion 
of mental experiment and which alone confers upon it 
the quality of true ' experiment/ introduces nevertheless, 
a new element which is of fundamental importance : it 
is an experiment upon the subject himself as a thinking- 
subject, an experiment analogous to those which one 
makes upon oneself in regulating one's moral conduct. 
It is therefore an attempt to become conscious of one's 
own operations (and not only of their results), and to 
see whether they imply, or whether they contradict one 
another. 

In this sense, logical experiment is very different from 
mental experiment. The first is the construction of 
reality and the awareness of this reality, the second is 
awareness and ordering of the actual mechanism of the 
construction. Now this ordering, which is the mark of 
logical experiment, has a considerable effect upon mental 
experiment : it makes it reversible. This means that the 
subject is led to lay down only such premisses as are 
capable of entertaining reciprocal relations to each other 
and of remaining each identical with themselves through- 
out during the mental experiment. (This feature is one 
whose importance may not be evident to introspection, 
but is nevertheless fundamental from the genetic point of 
view, because it appears very late and is in no way implied 
in the mechanism of mental experiment pure and simple.) 
Premisses which are the necessary requisite of logical 
experiment will therefore contain decisive judgments, 
which means that they will necessitate the use of conven- 
tional definitions, of assumptions, and so on, and that they 
will consequently extend beyond the sphere of mere 
fact and observation. This is the price of reversibility in 



IN THE CHILD 237 

mental experiment. Logical experiment is therefore an 
experiment carried out on oneself for the detection of 
contradiction. This process is undoubtedly founded on 
mental experiment, but on mental experiment which it 
fashions for itself, and which differs from primitive 
mental experiment as widely as does the work of the 
physicist from the observations of the man in the street. 
The necessity resulting from mental experiment is a 
necessity of fact ; that which results from logical experi- 
ment is due to the implications existing between the 
various operations : it is a moral necessity due to the 
obligation of remaining true to oneself. 

We are now in a position to understand how this first 
stage of childish reasoning is to be distinguished from 
logical reasoning proper. We were saying just now that the 
judgments of children before the age of 7-8 do not imply 
each other, but simply follow one another, after the manner 
of successive actions or perceptions which are psycho- 
logically determined without being logically necessitated 
by each other. For transduction is nothing but a mental 
experiment unaccompanied by logical experiment. It is 
either a simple account of events in succession, or a 
sequence of thoughts grouped together by one and the 
same aim or by one and the same action ; it is not yet a 
reversible system of judgments, such that each will be 
found to have remained identical with itself after no 
matter what kind of transformation. 

Here are the proofs. We began by making a verbatim 
report during certain hours of the day of the spontaneous 
talk of six children between the ages of 3 and 6 (yielding 
a total of some 10,000 remarks). Now, in these 10,000 
utterances there is not a single process of explicit reasoning. 
There are either simple isolated assertions, or else sequences 
of individual statements connected in the two following 
ways, which are both of them characteristic of pure 
mental experiment. In the one case, the subject foresees 
what will happen to him if he actually carries out a given 
experiment. For example, Lev (age 6|) is making a 



238 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

cardboard desk. " I can shut it if I want to, that is why 
I don't make it stick. Afterwards [if I want to], I won't 
be able to shut it any more." In the second case the subject 
foresees a sequence of events that is independent of him. 
Reasoning is then equivalent to a simple description. 
At the age of 6| : " Why do balloons go up? They 
can fly too, they [people] blow them up, they [the balloons] 
like the air, so when we let them go, they go up into the sky. 9 ' 
All these transductive reasonings are therefore simply 
descriptive or explanatory. The logical justification of 
statements is never given, for it would mean appealing to 
a definition or a law. Expressions such as " They like 
the air" appear at first sight to be the equivalents of 
laws, or seem to show that laws are implicit in the child's 
mind, and might be made more explicit, but, as we shall 
presently show, the child's insensibility to contradiction 
makes this hypothesis untenable. For one and the same 
statement made by a child may lead, according to the 
context, to completely contrary results. It is therefore a 
completely artificial procedure to bridge over the trans- 
ductions of children by means of implicit demonstrations 
or definitions. At this stage, mental experiment is still 
devoid of the element peculiar to logical experiment. 

The counter-test of this may be made in the following 
way. The children are asked to think out little physical 
problems, such as why a pebble dropped into a glass of 
water causes the level of the water to rise. It will then be 
seen that the child reasons about individual cases with- 
out generalizing. Mull (age 8) tells us that a pebble makes 
the water rise because it is heavy, and that a piece of 
wood (lighter than the pebble) does so because it is big. 

Why, in a case like this, does the child fail to generalize ? 
It is because he can handle neither the logic of relations 
nor the elementary operations of the logic of classes 
(logical addition and multiplication), both of which are 
themselves dependent upon the logic of relations. He can 
find neither the reciprocal counterpart to a relation (if a 
pebble makes the water rise because it is heavy, then a 



IN THE CHILD 239 

light object ought not to make it rise at all), nor the 
element that is common to both relations (if the pebble 
and the piece of wood both make the water rise, the 
common element which makes the water rise must be 
volume). 

In short, the mere fact of reversing or multiplying rela- 
tions, even in a single experiment, leads to the discovery 
of general laws. Consciousness of the necessity resulting 
from the reciprocity of individual relations is sufficient 
for generalization. Transduction does not generalize 
because it cannot handle relations. This is why it is an 
irreversible process. 

The irreversibility of primitive reasoning may be 
recognized by the further circumstance (J.R. Chap. VI, 
4-5) tka-t th e subject cannot keep a premiss identical 
with itself throughout a mental experiment. This is 
because while he is ' constructing ' by means of this 
premiss a whole series of new results, he has no means 
(unless he takes the decisions that regulate the experiment 
itself) of knowing whether this premiss has varied or not 
in the course of the mental experiment. -Or again, there is 
no means of knowing whether a concept to which one has 
been led by different paths is really the same under these 
different forms, and does not contain any contradictions. 
In reality, neither of these questions exists for the child 
before the age of 7-8, and his habit of reasoning only about 
individual cases, of applying judgments which, though 
universal in appearance are particular in fact, leaves him 
in almost complete ignorance of the problem. 

Childish concepts bear abundant testimony to this, at 
least in so far as they are implicit, i.e. such as the 
child applies before having become conscious of their defini- 
tion. For instance, we can take a list of objects specially 
selected so as to avoid suggestion, and ask children of 7-8 
whether such and such an object is alive, or has force, 
and so on. We shall then immediately realize that a 
concept like that of ' life ' is frequently determined by 
two or three heterogeneous components. For example, 



240 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

the same child will agree that the sun, the moon, wind, and 
fire are alive, because they 'move/ but that neither 
streams, nor lakes, nor clouds are alive, because the wind 
pushes them and they consequently have no movement 
of their own. On the other hand, clouds are alive, because 
they " make rain/' the lake, because it ' runs ' ; both, in 
short, because they perform some activity which is useful 
to man. Thus the two components ' self-movement ' 
and 'useful activity' define between them the concept 
of life. But owing to the schematism of childish judg- 
ment which we have described, these components do not 
multiply, or to put it differently, they do not interfere, 
but remain juxtaposed without synthesis in such a way 
that they only act one at a time, and make the child say, 
for instance, sometimes that the lake is alive, and some- 
times that it is not. The idea of force, again, is defined 
by movement, by solidity and by activity, all of them 
components that define the adult idea of force, but which 
in the child remain thrown together without any hier- 
archical order. It is in this sense that childish reasoning 
is irreversible. According to the turn taken by the mental 
experiment, the child will discover on the way facts which 
will cause him to alter his definitions, modify his premisses, 
and which will completely change the nature of one and 
the same concept by reason of the path taken to reach it. 
This, moreover, is only the direct result of the schematism 
of childish judgments. On the one hand, the logic of 
relations is foreign to the child along with all the adult 
habits of logical multiplication, of hierarchical arrange- 
ment of classes and of propositions. This is one cause 
of irreversibility. The child can certainly reach a con- 
clusion from given premisses, but he cannot perform the 
return journey without deviating from his path. On the 
other hand, syncretism, which makes the child connect 
everything with everything else, and prevents him from 
making the excisions and distinctions necessary to analy- 
tical thought, will have the natural consequence of making 
him concentrate heterogeneous elements within a single 



IN THE CHILD 241 

word. We have here a second cause of irreversibility. 
The concepts of children are systems which are not in 
equilibrium, to borrow a term from chemistry. They have 
a pseudo-equilibrium, which means that their seeming 
immobility is simply due to their viscosity. In consequence 
of this they do not remain identical, but vary imperceptibly 
throughout a reasoning process. 

We can now lay our finger upon the real cause of contra- 
diction in the child. There can be no doubt that up to the 
age of 7-8, child thought teems with contradictions. This 
strikes one particularly when the child is asked to explain 
a natural phenomenon, like the fact of boats floating or 
of clouds moving. These are not artificial events, i.e. 
such as are occasioned only by the experiment, for it is 
obvious that the various factors which the child invokes 
in the course of his explanation were already present in 
his mind, though without order or connexion. On the 
other hand, it is certainly at about the age of 7-8 that 
these mental phenomena diminish in intensity. And as 
these contradictions to which the child seems completely 
insensible are of two kinds, it is important to distinguish 
very clearly between them. 

To begin with, there is what may be called contradiction 
'by amnesia/ which, incidentally, has no particular in- 
terest for us. The child has two contradictory opinions 
about one object, and hesitates between them. When he is 
questioned he will affirm one of these, but a moment later 
he will forget what he has said, and affirm the other, 
and so on. For instance, a child believes that rivers are 
dug out and made entirely by the hand of man. Then he 
learns that the water coming from their sources has been 
sufficient to produce them. But for a long time he fluctu- 
ates between these two explanations, neither of which he 
finds completely satisfactory, so that when questioned, he 
will give first one, then the other, forgetting each time 
what he has previously asserted. This type of contradic- 
tion is more frequent in the child than in us, but it does 
not differ in ijs nature from the hesitations of an adult 
9 



242 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

in the throes of a problem that has not yet been mastered. 
It only points by its frequency to greater degree of irre- 
versibility of thought than exists in our minds. 

The second type of contradiction, on the other hand, 
strikes us as peculiarly characteristic of child thought. It 
is what might be called contradiction " by condensation/' 
The child, unable to choose between two contradictory 
explanations of one and the same phenomenon, agrees to 
both simultaneously and even fuses them into each other. 
Nor must it be thought that this is in any way an attempt 
at synthesis. The child is never in the presence of two 
terms which are first conceived as separate and then 
condensed, faute de mie^lx. It is rather a certain lack of 
restraint that allows new elements to be constantly heaped 
on the old ones, regardless of synthesis. Such schemes 
inherit their character from these syncretistic habits of 
thought which lead the subject to simply add up and con- 
dense his impressions instead of synthesizing them. And 
this is the immediate consequence of what we were saying 
just now about the irreversibility of child thought. For 
one and the same concept being different according to 
the path along which the child has reached it, the various 
components of which this concept is the product are 
bound to be heterogeneous and to lead to incessant 
contradictions. 

Let us recall an example. A boy of 7 J tells us that boats 
float because they are light. As to big boats, they float 
because they are heavy. Theoretically, this reasoning 
is legitimate. In the first case, the water is thought of as 
strong and supporting the boat, in the second case the 
boat is thought of as strong and supporting itself. But 
as a matter of fact, the child is not aware of this opposition. 
He is subject to contradiction because he is unable to 
resolve this condensation of heterogeneous explanations. 

Such facts as these are extremely frequent. The child 
either reasons about individual cases without looking 
for any links between these cases (which in actual fact 
axe contradictory), or else, in his unbridled way, he con- 



IN THE CHILD 243 

denses his statements without attempting to conciliate 
them. 

We may also conclude that transductive reasoning, in 
so far as it consists purely in mental experiment, is still 
irreversible and consequently powerless to detect contra- 
diction. The reason for this is quite simple. Conscious- 
ness of contradiction arises from an awareness of mental 
operations, and not from observation of nature, whether 
this observation be actual or imaginary. Now, up to the 
age of 7-8, childish judgments entail each other without 
any awareness of implications. They succeed, but do 
not justify each other. It is therefore perfectly natural 
that contradictory judgments should be added straight 
away to the pile by simple condensation. Only if the 
child became conscious of the definitions he has adopted 
or of the steps by which his reasoning proceeds, would 
these judgments seem to him to contradict one another. 

After the age of 7-8, however, comes a stage lasting 
till about the age of 11-12, and during which the following 
fundamental changes take place. Little by little the 
child becomes conscious of the definition of the concepts 
he is using, and acquires a partial aptitude for intro- 
specting his own mental experiments. Henceforward, a 
certain awareness of implications is created in his mind, 
and this gradually renders these experiments reversible, 
removing at least such contradictions as are the fruit of 
condensation. Does this mean that these are finally 
disposed of, and that the child is now fit to reason formally, 
i.e. from given or merely hypothetical premisses ? We 
have shown that this is not the case, and that formal 
thought does not appear till about the age of 11-12. 
From 7-8 till 11-12 syncretism, contradiction by con- 
densation, etc., all reappear independently of observation, 
upon the plane of verbal reasoning, in virtue of the law of 
shifting. It is therefore not until about the age of 11-12 
that we can really talk of ' logical experiment/ The age of 
7-8, nevertheless, marks a considerable advance, for logical 
forms have entered upon the scene of the mind in perception. 



244 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

Within the sphere of direct observation the child 
becomes capable of amplifying induction and of necessary 
deduction. 

It is not without interest to recall that these advances 
in logic are connected with the definite diminution of 
ego-centrism at the age of 7-8. The result of this last 
phenomenon is on the one hand to give birth to the need 
for proof and verification, and on the other to induce a 
relative awareness of the way thought moves. We have 
here a remarkable instance of the influence of social 
factors on the functioning of thought. 

7. MODALITY OF CHILD THOUGHT, INTELLECTUAL 
REALISM, AND INCAPACITY FOR FORMAL REASONING. 
The question of reasoning and particularly of contra- 
diction in the child is closely bound up with the problem 
of modality or of the different planes of reality on which 
the child uses his thought. For if contradiction ' by 
amnesia ' is so frequent before the age of 7-8, in other 
words, if the child has the faculty for permanently 
hesitating between two contradictory views and of 
always forgetting the view he held a moment previously, 
this is to a great extent because he has the power of 
passing far more swiftly than we can from a state of belief 
to a state of invention or of play. In thinking about 
reality, the child has a whole scale of planes which are 
probably devoid of any sort of hierarchy, and therefore 
favourable to logical incoherence. We have here at any 
rate a problem worth discussing. * 

Before entering upon this discussion, two truths should 
be remembered. The first is that for ego-centric thought 
the supreme law is play. It is one of the merits of psycho- 
analysis to have shown that autism knows of no adaptation 
to reality, because pleasure is its only spring of action. 
Thus the sole function of autistic thought is to give 
immediate and unlimited satisfaction to desires and 
interests by deforming reality so as to adapt it to the 
ego. For reality is infinitely plastic for the ego, since 
autism is ignorant of that reality shared by all, which 



IN THE CHILD 245 

destroys illusion and enforces verification. In so far then 
as child thought is still permeated with ego-centrism, the 
question of modality will have to be embodied in the 
following somewhat biased formula : Does there exist 
for the child only one reality, that is to say one supreme 
reality which is a touchstone of all others (as is the world 
of the senses for one adult, the world constructed by 
science, or even the invisible world of the mystic for 
another) ? Or does the child, finding himself, according 
as he is in an ego-centric or in a socialized state of being, 
in the presence of two worlds which are equally real, and 
neither of which succeeds in supplanting the other ? It 
is obvious that the second hypothesis is the more probable. 
Nay, more and this is the second truth to remember 
there is nothing to prove that the child is any the worse 
for this bi-polar nature of reality. Seen from the outside 
his attitude seems disharmonious : at one moment he is 
believing, at the next he is playing. As Baldwin has said : 
" The object, therefore, not only exists, but always exists 
as fulfilling the interest which motives its apprehension." a 
But seen from the inside there may be nothing particularly 
uncomfortable about this attitude. For us adults lack 
of harmony and hierarchy between states of belief and 
play would be unbearable, but that is because of a desire 
for inner unity which is perhaps very late in appearing. 
For it is chiefly in relation to other people that we are 
obliged to unify our beliefs, and to place on different 
planes those that are not compatible with each other, so 
that we gradually build up within ourselves a plane of 
reality, a plane of possibility, a plane of fiction, and so on. 
The hierarchy of these planes is therefore determined by 
their degree of objectivity, and the capacity for objectivity 
depends in its turn upon the socialization of thought, 
since we have no other criterion of objectivity than the 
agreement of different minds. If our thinking remains 
shut up within the ego, if it cannot place itself at the 
point of view of others, disparity between objective and 

1 J. M. Baldwin, Thoughts and Things (London, 1911). 



246 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

subjective will be through this alone seriously endangered. 
For the child whose thought is still ego-centric there will 
be no possible hierarchy between these different realities, 
and this absence of hierarchy will not even make itself 
felt, for lack of continuous contact on the part of the 
subject with the thought of others. At certain moments, 
the child, shut up within his ego, will believe in his 
fictions, and make light of his previous beliefs, at others, 
and especially when he resumes his contact with other 
people's thought, he will forget what he has just believed, 
and return to the second pole of what for him constitutes 
reality. 

In conclusion, there may be several realities for the 
child, and these realities may be equally real in turn instead 
of being arranged in a hierarchy as with us. It may be, 
moreover, that the disharmony resulting from this fact 
is in no way a source of discomfort to the child (L.T., 
Chap. V, 9). The facts show this very clearly. Four 
stages can be picked out in the evolution of modality. 
The first lasts till the age of 2-3, the second extends from 
2-3 to 7-8, the third from 7-8 to 11-12, and the fourth 
begins at this age. During the first stage, reality may be 
said to be simply and solely what is desired. Freud's 
'pleasure principle' deforms and refashions the world 
to its liking. The second stage marks the appearance of 
two heterogeneous but equal realities the world of play 
and the world of observation. The third marks the 
beginning of hierarchical arrangement, and the fourth 
marks the completion of this hierarchy, thanks to the 
introduction of a new plane that of formal thought and 
logical assumptions. 

Stern has noted that round about the age of 3 such 
expressions as 'to think/ 'to believe/ etc., begin to 
appear, which indicates that the child has detected a 
shade of difference between two kinds of existence what 
is true and what is simply imagined. And as a matter of 
fact, from this date onwards children distinguish better 



IN THE CHILD 247 

and better between ideas that are believed pour de vrai 
as the young Genevans say, and ideas that are believed 
pour s'amuser. But we must not allow ourselves to regard 
this as indicating two hierarchical planes. When the 
child is directed towards one of these poles, he turns his 
back on the other. Until he reaches the age of 7-8, the 
question of modality very rarely occurs to him at all. He 
does not try to prove whether such or such of his ideas 
does or does not correspond to reality. When the 
question is put to him, he evades it. It does not interest 
him, and it is even alien to his whole mental attitude. 
The rare cases when he spontaneously asks himself such a 
question (" Do they exist sometimes ? " etc., 5 cases out 
of 750 questions asked by a boy of 6) are due to necessary 
friction with the thought of others. Outside circum- 
stances such as these, the child from 2-3 to 7-8 is certainly 
acquainted with two planes, or two orders of reality, that 
of play and that of observation, but they are juxtaposed 
and not hierarchisized, in the sense that when he is in 
the presence of one it seems to him the only true one, and 
he forgets the other. 

In consequence, these two planes, that of play and that 
of sensuous observation, are very different for the child 
from what they are for us, and in particular they are less 
distinct. This probably explains the lack of hierarchy ; 
for two still partially indifferentiated elements obstruct 
one another far more than when a clear differentiation 
has shed light upon their opposing qualities. In the 
first case the contradictions involved by the lack of 
differentiation produce antagonism, in the second case, the 
oppositions make synthesis possible. 

For, for us, play rests on fiction. But for the child it 
is something much more. It is not enough to say, with 
Groos, that it is a ' voluntary illusion/ for this attitude 
presupposes in the child the power to resist illusion, 
or rather to contrast certain beliefs that are volun- 
tary with certain others that are necessary. As a 



248 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

matter of fact play cannot be contrasted to reality, 
because in both, cases belief is arbitrary, or rather devoid 
of logical reasons. Play is a reality which the child 
chooses to believe in by himself, just as reality is a game 
which the child chooses to believe in with grown-ups and 
with anyone else who believes in it. In both cases the 
belief is either very strong or very weak, according as it is 
characterized by its momentary intensity or by its dura- 
tion, but in neither case does it require any intrinsic 
justification. Childish play may therefore be said to 
constitute an autonomous reality, by which we mean that 
' true ' reality to which it stands in contrast is far less 
true for the child than for us. 

Thus, sensible or ' true ' reality is also quite different 
for the child from what it is for us. To us, this reality is 
given by experimentation, and its laws are submitted to 
incessant control. For the child, sensible reality is 
observed and experimented upon to a much lesser degree, 
and its laws are hardly submitted to any control whatso- 
ever ; it is made up almost in its entirety by the mind and 
by the decisions of belief. 

We are dealing here with the phenomenon of ' intellectual 
realism/ as studied by specialists in children's drawings 
and by M. Luquet in particular, and which we have 
extended to cover the concept of child thought in general. 1 

For we have already seen (L.T., Chap. V, 3) that in 
consequence of his ego-centrism, the child's picture of the 
world is always moulded OP his immediate, sectional, and 
personal point of vkw. Relations between things will 
therefore not be what is yielded by experimentation or 
fashioned by comparison of view-points ; they will be 
what child logic, and especially what syncretism makes 
Ihem. By reason of the same cause which prevented 
him from adapting himself to other people, the child will 
fail to be adapted to the observation of the senses. He 
does not analyse the contents of his perceptions, but 
weighs it down with a load of previously acquired and 

1 Journ. de Psych., Vol. XIX (1922), pp. 256-257. 



IN THE CHILD 249 

ill-digested material. In short, he sees objects, not as 
they really are, but as he would have imagined them, if, 
before seeing them, he had per impossible described them 
to himself. This is why the early stages of children's 
drawings are not characterized by visual realism, i.e. by 
a faithful copy of the model in question, but by intellectual 
realism, such that the child draws only what he already 
knows about things and copies only an ' inner model/ 
Childish observation follows the same lines. The child 
often sees only what he already knows. He projects the 
whole of his verbal thought into things.' He sees mountains 
as built by men, rivers as dug out with spades, the sun 
and moon as following us on our walks. The field of 
attention seems wide in this sense that things are observed 
in large numbers, but it is narrow in the sense that things 
are schematized in accordance with the child's own point 
of view, instead of being perceived in their intrinsic 
relations. 

Intellectual realism is the picture of the world that is 
most natural to ego-centric thought. It points, on the 
one hand, to an incapacity for objective observation 
(visual realism). On the other hand, it is realism none 
the less, for the child is neither an intellectualist (his 
disregard of logical system is complete) nor a mystic. 
His ego-centrism is, moreover, perpetually leading him 
into realistic delusions, such as confusing words and things, 
thought and the objects of thought, etc. ; in a word, he 
is conscious of nothing but his own- subjectivity. 

In conclusion, there exist before the age of 7-8 two 
planes of reality play and the reality of ordinary life, 
but they are juxtaposed instead of being compared and 
ordered in a hierarchy, and each taken by itself is different 
from what it is for us. But at about the age of 7-8, 
certain changes take place in the modality of childish 
judgment which are in close relation to the appearance of 
a desire for a system and non-contradiction. This stage 
is characterized on the one hand by the beginnings of a 
positive observation of the external world, and on the 



250 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

other by an awareness of the implications contained in 
such reasoning as is connected with actual observation. 
These two facts tend to make the child dissociate objective 
reality from verbal reality, to dissociate, that is, the 
world of direct observation from that of stories, of fantasies, 
and of things conceived or heard of, but never seen. This 
is therefore the decline of intellectual realism, so far as 
actual observation is concerned. 

But in virtue of the law of shifting, all the phenomena 
which up till now have stood in the way of complete 
adaptation to the external world (inability to handle 
relations, syncretism, juxtaposition, etc.), are shifted on 
to the verbal plane, and stand in the way of the child's 
awareness of his own reasoning process. This gives rise 
to two consequences which are closely bound up with 
each other, one being concerned with modality, the other 
with the structure of the reasoning process. 

Here is the first. As regards the faculty of perception, 
the different planes of reality, stand in hierarchical order. 
The categories of the possible and of the necessary in 
particular (which alone enable the different orders of 
reality to be grouped in relation to each other) appear in 
the conception of nature, and allow the child to conceive 
of some phenomena as due to chance (for this notion first 
appears at the age of 7-8), and of others as bound by a 
necessity that is physical and not moral. But as regards 
the verbal faculty, these different planes have not yet come 
to be distinguished, so that the child is incapable of 
conceiving on the one hand of a purely logical necessity 
(If we say that . . . then we must say that . . .), on the 
other hand of a plane inhabited by pure hypothesis or by 
logical assumption (Let us say that . . .). 

Childish reasoning between the years of 7-8 and 11-12 
will therefore present a very definite feature (J.R., Chap. 
II) : reasoning that is connected with actual belief, or in 
other words, that is grounded on direct observation, will be 
logical. But formal reasoning will not yet be possible. For 
formal reasoning connects assumptions propositions, that 



IN THE CHILD 251 

is, in which one does not necessarily believe, but which one 
admits in order to see what consequences they will lead to. 

At about the age of 11-12, on the contrary, modality 
in the thought of the child becomes more or less what it is 
with us, or at least, with the uneducated adult. The 
various planes of reality play, verbal reality, observation 
are set in a hierarchy that is defined in relation to a single 
criterion experience. And this hierarchy is possible, 
thanks to the notions of necessity and possibility which 
are now extended to verbal thought. 

This evolution in the structure of childish reasoning 
has very important consequences. We have already 1 put 
forward the view, which has since been confirmed by a 
more recent study, that formal thought does not appear 
till the age of 11-12, at the period, therefore, when the 
child comes to reason about pure possibility. For to 
reason formally is to take one's premisses as simply 
given, without enquiring whether they are well-founded 
or not ; belief in the conclusion will be motivated solely 
by the form of the deduction. Previous to this, and even 
in the minds of children from 7-8 to 11-12, deduction is 
never pure, by which we mean that belief in the validity 
of the conclusion is still bound up with belief in the validity 
of the premisses. For before the age of 7-8, there is no 
awareness of logical implications. Thought is still realistic, 
and in reasoning, the child looks always to an ' inner 
model ' which is considered as true reality, even when his 
reasoning beai;s upon it all the marks of deduction. This 
is mental experiment pure. The pseudo-assumptions of 
children of 6-7 are of this type. ("If I was an angel 
and had wings and if I flew up into the fir-trees, would 
the squirrels run away or would they stay . . /'). Be- 
tween the years of 7-8 and 11-12, there is certainly 
awareness of implications when reasoning rests upon 
beliefs and not upon assumptions, in other words, when 
it is founded on actual observation. But such deduction 

1 Jown. de Psych., Vol. XIX (1922), p. 222. (" Essai sur la multipli- 
cation logique et les d6buts de la pens^e formelle chez Venfant.") 



252 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

is still realistic, which, means that the child cannot reason 
from premisses without believing in them. Or even if he 
reasons implicitly from assumptions which he makes on 
his own, he cannot do so from those which are proposed 
to him. Not till the age of 11-12 is he capable of this 
difficult operation, which is pure deduction, and proceeds 
from any assumption whatsoever. Take, for instance, 
the absurd-phrase test which Binet gives as one for 10 
years, but is really an n- or 12-year-old test : "If one 
day I kill myself from despair, it will not be on a Friday, 
because Friday is an unlucky day, . . . etc." Before 
the age of 11-12 the child cannot make the assumption. 
He either accepts the data and fails to see the absurdity, 
or else he rejects them as absurd and fails to see the 
formal absurdity of the argument. 

11-12 is therefore the age at which we must situate 
the appearance of what a little earlier we called ' logical 
experiment/ Logical experiment, in conclusion, pre- 
supposes and may be defined by the two following con- 
ditions : i A ' mental experiment ' carried out on the 
plane of pure hypothesis or of pure possibility, and not as 
before on the plane of reality reproduced in thought ; and 
2 an ordering and awareness of the operations of thought 
as such, as for example of definitions or assumptions that 
one has made and has decided to retain identical with 
themselves. 

It is not without interest to note that this new aware- 
ness is once again under the dependence of social factors, 
and that conversely, incapacity for formal thought is 
very directly the result of childish ego-centrism. For 
what prevents the child from reasoning from data that 
he does not agree to but is asked simply to ' assume/ is 
that he is untutored in the art of entering into other 
people's points of view. For him, there is only one 
comprehensible point of view his own. Hence the fact 
that up till the age of 11-12, physical reality is not accom- 
panied by subjective reality (the child being unaware of 
the personal character of his opinions, his definitions, and 



IN THE CHILD 253 

even his words), nor, consequently, even by a logical 
reality in which everything conceivable would be possible. 
Previous to this, there is only the real and the unreal. 
There is undoubtedly a plane of physical possibility, but 
there is no plane of logical possibility. The real alone is 
logical. At about the age of 11-12, on the contrary, 
social life starts on a new phase, and this obviously has 
the effect of leading children to a greater mutual under- 
standing, and consequently of giving them the habit of 
constantly placing themselves at points of view which 
they did not previously hold. This progress in the use of 
assumptions is probably what lends greater suppleness to 
the child's conception of modality, and teaches him the 
use of formal reasoning. 

8. PRECAUSALITY IN THE CHILD. We have now 
reached the end of our outline of child logic. We must 
nevertheless recall in a few short words a certain question 
which so far we have asked rather than answered. What 
is the picture of the world which goes hand in hand with 
such a logic ? What are the notions of causality which 
the child constructs at his different stages of develop- 
ment ? We ought perhaps to have begun with this. 
But by making a direct study of children's talk about the 
phenomena which surround them, we would have exposed 
ourselves to the risk of either taking them literally or of 
deforming them, for lack of having analysed their logical 
structure. We consider ourselves to be now sufficiently 
armed against this danger. 

How, then, are we to formulate the problem of causality 
in the child ? Undoubtedly, by a study of his spontaneous 
questions and especially of his ' whys.' To this end we 
collected during ten months 1125 questions from one 
and the same child of 6-7 years old (L.T., Chap. V). The 
results of the analysis and classification of these questions 
were as follows. The desire for causal explanation proper 
was found to be extremely weak, and the ' whys ' pointed 
to a sort of indiff erentiation between physical causality and 
logical or psychological justification, which character of 



254 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

indifferentiation is precisely what we shall select as the 
distinguishing feature of precausality. 

Let us recall the facts. Out of 360 ' whys/ there were 
found to be only 5 " whys of logical justification/' and 103 
" whys of causal explanation/' But of these 103 ' whys ' 
the greater portion showed signs either of animism, of 
artificialism, or of finalism ; only 13 of them could be 
interpreted as pointing unambiguously to a desire for 
mechanical explanation by means of spatial contact. It 
is possible, therefore, to foresee that childish explanation 
will be equally far from constituting a proof or a logical 
deduction as it is from appealing to spatial insertion with 
regard to things that are set in motion. Childish explana- 
tion is neither logical nor spatial. In addition to this, a 
large number of these questions showed us that the idea 
of chance is absent from child thought before the age of 
7-8. Before this date, the world is conceived as an 
assemblage of willed and well-regulated actions and 
intentions, which leave no room for fortuitous and, as 
such, inexplicable events. Everything can be justified ; 
we need only appeal to an arbitrary factor, which is not 
the equivalent of chance but resembles rather the whim 
of all-powerful wills. 

This, then, is the sense in which we can speak of pre- 
causality: indifferentiation between physical causality 
and psychological or logical motivation. What are the 
roots of this precausality, whose dual fruit is childish 
animism and artificialism ? Once again, we believe the 
answer to be : ego-centrism and the resultant intellectual 
realism which it brings in its wake. 

Ego-centrism helps, as we saw, to make the child 
unconscious of himself. But this unconsciousness goes 
far beyond the difficulties in introspection which we 
described ; it goes so far as to prevent the child under 
7-8 from being aware of the phenomenon of thought as a 
subjective phenomenon, and even to prevent him from 
establishing the exact limit between his own ego and the 
external world. Baldwin has laid great stress upon this 



' IN THE CHILD 255 

* adualistic ' character of primitive thought. We have 
ourselves described a very definite phase (about the age of 
7) during which the child knows that his dreams are 
subjective (a person standing beside him could neither 
see nor touch them), and nevertheless locates them in 
front of himself in the room. 1 A large number of facts of 
this order has led us to admit that the child is ignorant 
of his own thought, and projects it in its entirety into 
things. He is therefore a ' realist ' in the sense in which 
one talks of the realistic illusions of thought. But this 
realism keeps its possessor in ignorance of the distinction 
between the physical and the psychical, and consequently 
leads him to regard the external world as endowed with 
both these qualities at the same time. Hence the tendency 
to ' precausality.' 

On the other hand, and for the same reasons, childish 
realism is intellectual and not visual (see preceding 
paragraph) ; the child only sees what he knows, and sees 
the external worlds as though he had previously con- 
structed it with his own mind. Childish causality is 
therefore not visual, in other words is not interested in 
spatial contacts nor in mechanical causation. It is 
intellectual, that is to say, full of considerations that are 
foreign to pure observation : justification of all phenomena, 
syncretistic tendency to connect everything with every- 
thing else (see 5), in short, confusion of physical causality 
with psychological or logical motivation. Hence, once 
again, pre-causality. 

In this sense, then, precausal mentality, as we defined 
it above, will be seen to be the type of mentality 
most in agreement with ego-centrism of thought and 
with all the logical peculiarities which this ego-centrism 
entails. 

But once again, we must remind the reader that we 
have just raised an enormous problem by drawing attention 
to these few characteristics of childish causality, and that 
we are still very far from guessing its solution. 

i See Arch, de P$yck,, Vol. XVIII (1923), P- 288. 



256 JUDGMENT AND REASONING 

CONCLUSION. On the other hand, we believe that we 
have solved the problem which we set ourselves at the 
beginning of our enquiry. The features of child thought 
which we have described really do constitute a coherent 
whole, such that each of its terms partially implies a 
portion of the other terms. To be sure, child thought 
cannot be isolated from the factors of education, and all 
the various influences which the adult exercises upon 
the child. But these influences do not imprint them- 
selves upon the child as on a photographic plate ; they are 
' assimilated/ i.e. deformed by the living being who comes 
under their sway, and they are incorporated into his own 
substance. It is this psychological substance (psycho- 
logically speaking) of the child's, or rather this structure 
and functioning peculiar to his thought that we have 
tried to describe, and in a certain measure, to explain. 

It is therefore our belief that the day will come when 
child thought will be placed on the same level in relation 
to adult, normal, and civilized thought, as ' primitive 
mentality' as defined by Levy-Bruhl, as autistic and 
symbolical thought as described by Freud and his disciples, 
and as ' morbid consciousness/ in the event of this last 
concept, which we owe to M. Ch. Blondel, being eventually 
identified with the former. But we must beware of the 
danger of drawing parallels in which functional divergen- 
cies are forgotten. Moreover, we have already taken our 
stand on the subject of the relations which exist between 
the thought of the child and symbolic thought ; though 
perhaps we did not at the time sufficiently emphasize the 
differences which separate these two kinds of thought. 1 
Let us therefore not be in too great a hurry to follow a 
path so full of the pitfalls of Comparative Psychology. 
Patient analysis of the child's mentality keeps on safer 
ground, which though not yet thoroughly cleared, offers 
so sure a realm of investigation that wisdom forbids us to 
leave it forthwith. 

1 " La pensSe symWique'et la pensSe de I'eafanV' Arch, de Psych 
Vol. XVIII (1923). J '* 



APPENDIX 

NOTE ON THE COEFFICIENT OF EGO-CENTRISM 

Since the publication of our first volume (L.T.) we have 
continued our collection of remarks made by various 
children in the Maison des Petits in order to establish 
how the coefficient of ego-centrism varies with age. Here 
axe the results which we have obtained up to date, 
including the coefficients of Lev and Pie, which have 
already been published. 

q , . , A Number of Coefficient of 

ouojecis. Age. Remarks Classified. Ego-centrism. 

Dan 3 years 1500 0-56 

Jan 3 years 1000 0-56 

Ad 4 years 1500 0-60 

Ad 5 years 800 0-46 

Pie 6 years 1500 0-43 

Lev 6 years 1400 0-47 

Clau 7 years 800 0-30 

Lev 7 years 600 0-27 

It can be seen at once that round about the age of 7 
ego-centrism diminishes rapidly after having gradually 
decreased up to that point. The mean variations con- 
tinued to be weak (0*02 as a rule). We found nothing 
particularly significant in -the details of the categories of 
language as they developed with age. 
,/We wish to express our warmest gratitude to Miles 
Berguer, Fiaux, and Gonet, who were kind enough to 
undertake the thankless task of collecting and classifying, 
which enabled us to carry on our research. 

R 267 



INDEX 



Ambivalence of emotion, 170 Escher, 97 

Amnesia, contradiction by, 125, Ethical judgments, 164, 194, 236, 

161, 164, 165, 166, 167, 169, 218 237. 

Animism, 136, 150, 151, 254 
Arithmetic (see Mathematical Fiaux, 9, 257 

reasoning) - 

Associations m, 214, 215 
Autism, n, 158, 204, 205, 208, 209, 



Freud, 175, 202, 204, 246, 256 



244 



Goblot, 36, 185, 1^6, -2 14, 233, 235 

Gonet, 9, 257 

, , . f Groos, 199, 247 

Baldwin, 26, 174, I79> 200, 245, G uex, 150 

254 

Bergue?9,2 5 7 Hahnloser, ,13, 181 

Binet and Simon, 147, 230, 252 Hanhart, 97 

Binet-Simon tests, 62, 63, 64, 76, H * ra <^.us, 171 
77, 84, 85, 86, 92, 93, 97, 101, 

102, 103, 202, 2l6 

Bleuler, n, 170 
Blondel, 204, 209, 256 
Bovet, 33, 149 
Brunschvicg, 203 
Buerger, 9 

Burt tests, 87, 88, 89, no, 112, 125, 
161,218 



f Innocence' of judgment, 90, 91 
Janet, 179, 203, 204, 206, 218 
Krafft, 150 



Cartalis, 62 

Claparede, 22, 65, 114, 134, 143, 
199,212,213,214,228, 234 



Levy-Bruhl, 256 
Luquet, 3, 221, 226, 248 
Lustprinzip) 145, 202 

Mach, 185, 186, 190, 212, 214, 235 



Classes, logic of, 127, 134, 195, Mathematical reasoning, 36, 37 et 



196, 238 
Cousinet, 73, 228 



seg. 9 185, 186, 195, 198, 210, 234 
Matthes, i 
Mill, 184 



Ogres, belief in, 165 
Over-determination, Freud's, 157 

Passello, 131 



d'Allonnes, Revault, 218, 220 
Decroey, 108 
Delacroix, 109 
Descoeudres, 41, 76, 80, 108 

Dottrens, i 

Drawings, children's, 3, 4, 58, 127, Ferret"^ 

128, 199, 221, 222, 226, 227, 249 Physics, relativity in, 147 
Dreams, 11, 145, i?5> *77 Piaget, 67, 87, 90, 125, 158, i6i> 

166, 221 et seq.) 231, 248, 251, 
Enthymeme, 181, 196, 223 255 

9159 



26o INDEX 

Piaget, Mme J., 150 Rignano, 190, 214, 235 

Play, 72, 177, 199, 202, 203, 207, Roud, 137 

244 et seg. 9 251 Ruskin, 90, 94 
Pleasure Principle, 145, 246 

Psycho-analysis, 204, 209, 244 Stern, 36, 184, 233, 246 

Syllogism, 162, 181, 182, 185, 186, 

Rauk,i 9 4 co 195 ,,' 1 ? 6 ',? 23 < 

RetdiWs Prinzip, 202 Syndoxic laws, 26 

Reichenbach, 131 ' Synnomic laws, 26 
Resemblance and difference, 143, 

144,212 Taine, 215 

Ribot, 47, 145, 184, 215 Terman, 147 



PRINTED IN GREAT BRITAIN BY 
THE EDINBURGH PRESS, 9 AND H YOUNG STREET, EDIWIUKGH 



